Paper_title
Large graph mining: patterns, cascades, fraud detection, and algorithms.
Word storms: multiples of word clouds for visual comparison of documents.
Discovering emerging entities with ambiguous names.
Efficient estimation for high similarities using odd sketches.
Test-driven evaluation of linked data quality.
RDF analytics: lenses over semantic graphs.
Taming the web.
Understanding spatial homophily: the case of peer influence and social selection.
Formalisation and experiences of R2RML-based SPARQL to SQL query translation using morph.
Local business ambience characterization through mobile audio sensing.
Robust multivariate autoregression for anomaly detection in dynamic product ratings.
Effective named entity recognition for idiosyncratic web collections.
Knowledge base completion via search-based question answering.
Social bootstrapping: how pinterest and last.fm social communities benefit by borrowing links from facebook.
Random walks based modularity: application to semi-supervised learning.
Advertising in a stream.
BuzzRank ... and the trend is your friend.
Relationalizing RDF stores for tools reusability.
Who Benefits from the "Sharing" Economy of Airbnb?
CWS: a comparative web search system.
Video summarization via transferrable structured learning.
Google news personalization: scalable online collaborative filtering.
The use of XML to express a historical knowledge base.
Collaborative filtering for orkut communities: discovery of user latent behavior.
Executing Provenance-Enabled Queries over Web Data.
Conversation specification: a new approach to design and analysis of e-service composition.
Integrating web directories by learning their structures.
A Game Theoretic Model for the Formation of Navigable Small-World Networks.
Tag-based social interest discovery.
TrueView: Harnessing the Power of Multiple Review Sites.
Children Seen But Not Heard: When Parents Compromise Children's Online Privacy.
Using link analysis to improve layout on mobile devices.
Predicting positive and negative links in online social networks.
OPAL: automated form understanding for the deep web.
An exploration of improving collaborative recommender systems via user-item subgroups.
Redundancy detection in service-oriented systems.
A better uncle for OWL: nominal schemas for integrating rules and ontologies.
Efficient interactive fuzzy keyword search.
Just in Time: Controlling Temporal Performance in Crowdsourcing Competitions.
Statistically Significant Detection of Linguistic Change.
A densitometric analysis of web template content.
Distributed Estimation of Graph 4-Profiles.
Topical TrustRank: using topicality to combat web spam.
To randomize or not to randomize: space optimal summaries for hyperlink analysis.
Using content and interactions for discovering communities in social networks.
Planetary-scale views on a large instant-messaging network.
Model bloggers' interests based on forgetting mechanism.
Collective privacy management in social networks.
A large-scale study of robots.txt.
MASTH proxy: an extensible platform for web overload control.
Efficient resource allocation and power saving in multi-tiered systems.
What are the most eye-catching and ear-catching features in the video?: implications for video summarization.
Adaptive faceted browser for navigation in open information spaces.
Learning search engine specific query transformations for question answering.
Dynamic placement for clustered web applications.
OCTOPUS: aggressive search of multi-modality data using multifaceted knowledge base.
The chatty web: emergent semantics through gossiping.
Mining tag clouds and emoticons behind community feedback.
Webformulate: a web-based visual continual query system.
Question answering on top of the BT digital library.
Rapid development of spreadsheet-based web mashups.
Periodic transfers in mobile applications: network-wide origin, impact, and optimization.
Strong authentication in web proxies.
Addressing Complex and Subjective Product-Related Queries with Customer Reviews.
Object-Z web environment and projections to UML.
Dynamic personalized pagerank in entity-relation graphs.
Collaborative Nowcasting for Contextual Recommendation.
Graph-based concept identification and disambiguation for enterprise search.
Which to View: Personalized Prioritization for Broadcast Emails.
Staging transformations for multimodal web interaction management.
Evaluating a new approach to strong web cache consistency with snapshots of collected content.
Using Shortlists to Support Decision Making and Improve Recommender System Performance.
Ranking a stream of news.
Performance of compressed inverted list caching in search engines.
Review spam detection.
A uniform approach to accelerated PageRank computation.
On optimal service selection.
Vinci: a service-oriented architecture for rapid development of web applications.
Efficient overlap and content reuse detection in blogs and online news articles.
Structured objects in owl: representation and reasoning.
StatSnowball: a statistical approach to extracting entity relationships.
On building graphs of documents with artificial ants.
Query parsing in mobile voice search.
Spam and popularity ratings for combating link spam.
The value of socially tagged urls for a search engine.
RerankEverything: a reranking interface for browsing search results.
Building taxonomy of web search intents for name entity queries.
Averaging Gone Wrong: Using Time-Aware Analyses to Better Understand Behavior.
Identifying featured articles in wikipedia: writing style matters.
Budget constrained bidding in keyword auctions and online knapsack problems.
Collective context-aware topic models for entity disambiguation.
A link classification based approach to website topic hierarchy generation.
Discovering geographical topics in the twitter stream.
General auction mechanism for search advertising.
Robust methodologies for modeling web click distributions.
Analyzing spammers' social networks for fun and profit: a case study of cyber criminal ecosystem on twitter.
Using landing pages for sponsored search ad selection.
Browsing on small screens: recasting web-page segmentation into an efficient machine learning framework.
Estimating the prevalence of deception in online review communities.
Web scale NLP: a case study on url word breaking.
Optimizing budget allocation among channels and influencers.
Detecting image spam using local invariant features and pyramid match kernel.
Implementing optimal outcomes in social computing: a game-theoretic approach.
A foundation for tool based mobility support for visually impaired web users.
A password stretching method using user specific salts.
Utility analysis for topically biased PageRank.
Measuring credibility of users in an e-learning environment.
Adaptive bidding for display advertising.
Topic initiator detection on the world wide web.
Price modeling in standards for electronic product catalogs based on XML.
Protecting the web: phishing, malware, and other security threats.
Context-sensitive query auto-completion.
Parallel crawlers.
WS3: international workshop on context-enabled source and service selection, integration and adaptation (CSSSIA 2008).
Efficiently evaluating graph constraints in content-based publish/subscribe.
Falcons: searching and browsing entities on the semantic web.
PageSim: a novel link-based measure of web page aimilarity.
Falconer: once SIOC meets semantic search engine.
An ontology for internal and external business processes.
The spoken web: software development and programming through voice.
Overcoming Relational Learning Biases to Accurately Predict Preferences in Large Scale Networks.
Pay as you browse: microcomputations as micropayments in web-based services.
Support concepts for Web navigation: a cognitive engineering approach.
Crawling English-Japanese person-name transliterations from the web.
Learning information diffusion process on the web.
Declarative platform for data sourcing games.
Heat-seeking honeypots: design and experience.
Who, What, When, and Where: Multi-Dimensional Collaborative Recommendations Using Tensor Factorization on Sparse User-Generated Data.
Navigational complexity in web interactions.
Analysis of interacting BPEL web services.
WAP5: black-box performance debugging for wide-area systems.
Classification-enhanced ranking.
Wherefore art thou r3579x?: anonymized social networks, hidden patterns, and structural steganography.
Towards Mobile Query Auto-Completion: An Efficient Mobile Application-Aware Approach.
Anti-aliasing on the web.
Discovering Meta-Paths in Large Heterogeneous Information Networks.
Competing for users' attention: on the interplay between organic and sponsored search results.
Computing minimum cost diagnoses to repair populated DL-based ontologies.
SCAD: collective discovery of attribute values.
A machine learning based approach for table detection on the web.
Information diffusion through blogspace.
How to consume linked data on the web: tutorial description.
Towards content trust of web resources.
Learning information intent via observation.
Testing google ionterfaces modified for the blind.
LN-Annote: An Alternative Approach to Information Extraction from Emails using Locally-Customized Named-Entity Recognition.
Upgrading relational legacy data to the semantic web.
Behavioral profiles for advanced email features.
Modeling anchor text and classifying queries to enhance web document retrieval.
Sub-document queries over XML with XSQirrel.
An e-market framework for informed trading.
A matrix density based algorithm to hierarchically co-cluster documents and words.
A browser for a public-domain SpeechWeb.
The Digital Life of Walkable Streets.
How accurately can one's interests be inferred from friends.
Search engines and their public interfaces: which apis are the most synchronized?
Evolution of Conversations in the Age of Email Overload.
Detecting near-duplicates for web crawling.
Aliasing on the world wide web: prevalence and performance implications.
Extraction and mining of an academic social network.
Cantina: a content-based approach to detecting phishing web sites.
AutoPerf: an automated load generator and performance measurement tool for multi-tier software systems.
Query-Less: Predicting Task Repetition for NextGen Proactive Search and Recommendation Engines.
A software framework for matchmaking based on semantic web technology.
Web service derivatives.
Mining Aspect-Specific Opinion using a Holistic Lifelong Topic Model.
Tagging and navigability.
Deciphering mobile search patterns: a study of Yahoo! mobile search queries.
An initial investigation on evaluating semantic web instance data.
Context-aware citation recommendation.
Batch rekeying for secure group communications.
What Links Alice and Bob?: Matching and Ranking Semantic Patterns in Heterogeneous Networks.
Exploration of query context for information retrieval.
SCULPT: A Schema Language for Tabular Data on the Web.
N-gram over Context.
CiteSeerx: an architecture and web service design for an academic document search engine.
Measuring the web crawler ethics.
Collaborative ICT for Indian business clusters.
Multi-modality in one-class classification.
How semantics make better wikis.
Visualizing structural patterns in web collections.
Learning from the past: answering new questions with past answers.
WebKhoj: Indian language IR from multiple character encodings.
The ODESeW 2.0 semantic web application framework.
Clarifying the fundamentals of HTTP.
User Review Sites as a Resource for Large-Scale Sociolinguistic Studies.
Detecting image spam using visual features and near duplicate detection.
A logical framework for modeling and reasoning about semantic web services contract.
OpenRuleBench: an analysis of the performance of rule engines.
Using XForms to simplify Web programming.
Mobile shopping assistant: integration of mobile applications and web services.
YouTube around the world: geographic popularity of videos.
Ranking the web frontier.
Data summaries for on-demand queries over linked data.
Improved Theoretical and Practical Guarantees for Chromatic Correlation Clustering.
Ranking and classifying attractiveness of photos in folksonomies.
Duplicate detection in click streams.
A content and structure website mining model.
Hierarchical substring caching for efficient content distribution to low-bandwidth clients.
Keys for XML.
Inferring relevant social networks from interpersonal communication.
Finding the right facts in the crowd: factoid question answering over social media.
Structuring namespace descriptions.
Estimating the web robot population.
On integrating catalogs.
Consideration set generation in commerce search.
Focused crawling: experiences in a real world project.
Rapid prototyping of web applications combining domain specific languages and model driven design.
A decentralized CF approach based on cooperative agents.
First workshop on targeting and ranking for online advertising.
Estimating required recall for successful knowledge acquisition from the web.
Larger is better: seed selection in link-based anti-spamming algorithms.
Optimizing user interaction for web-based mobile tasks.
Authoring and annotation of web pages in CREAM.
An information state-based dialogue manager for making voice web smarter.
Estimating web site readability using content extraction.
The Role of Data Cap in Optimal Two-part Network Pricing.
Do not crawl in the DUST: different URLs with similar text.
Mechanism Design for Mixed Bidders.
Privacy-enhancing personalized web search.
The future of online social interactions: what to expect in 2020.
A probabilistic approach to automated bidding in alternative auctions.
REST-based management of loosely coupled services.
The "Map Trap"?: an evaluation of map versus text-based interfaces for location-based mobile search services.
Automatic construction of a context-aware sentiment lexicon: an optimization approach.
The largest scholarly semantic network...ever.
On revenue in the generalized second price auction.
Representing a web page as sets of named entities of multiple types: a model and some preliminary applications.
Making RDF presentable: integrated global and local semantic Web browsing.
Challenges and practices in deploying web acceleration solutions for distributed enterprise systems.
Improving recommendation lists through topic diversification.
Exploring social annotations for information retrieval.
Statically locating web application bugs caused by asynchronous calls.
Context-based page unit recommendation for web-basedsensemaking tasks.
Using graph matching techniques to wrap data from PDF documents.
Mining newsgroups using networks arising from social behavior.
Finding algorithms in scientific articles.
Detecting spam web pages through content analysis.
Dynamic coordination of information management services for processing dynamic web content.
Bootstrapping semantics on the web: meaning elicitation from schemas.
Why is connectivity in developing regions expensive: policy challenges more than technical limitations?
Beyond the Baseline: Establishing the Value in Mobile Phone Based Poverty Estimates.
Expertise networks in online communities: structure and algorithms.
Thresher: automating the unwrapping of semantic content from the World Wide Web.
Objective Variables for Probabilistic Revenue Maximization in Second-Price Auctions with Reserve.
Identifying Web Queries with Question Intent.
Web customization using behavior-based remote executing agents.
Tell Me About Yourself: The Malicious CAPTCHA Attack.
Less talk, more rock: automated organization of community-contributed collections of concert videos.
Characterizing typical and atypical user sessions in clickstreams.
Interactive search in XML data.
Dynamical classes of collective attention in twitter.
Scaling personalized web search.
Learning causality for news events prediction.
A new suffix tree similarity measure for document clustering.
Random sampling from a search engine's index.
Web annotation sharing using P2P.
Are search engine users equally reliable?
POLYPHONET: an advanced social network extraction system from the web.
Community gravity: measuring bidirectional effects by trust and rating on online social networks.
VoiKiosk: increasing reachability of kiosks in developing regions.
Using urls and table layout for web classification tasks.
Efficient application placement in a dynamic hosting platform.
Modeling user behavior in recommender systems based on maximum entropy.
Antourage: mining distance-constrained trips from flickr.
Folksoviz: a subsumption-based folksonomy visualization using wikipedia texts.
Supporting synchronous social q&a throughout the question lifecycle.
Topic sentiment mixture: modeling facets and opinions in weblogs.
Microformats: a pragmatic path to the semantic web.
Privacy preserving frequency capping in internet banner advertising.
Web montage: a dynamic personalized start page.
A self-training approach for resolving object coreference on the semantic web.
FormSys: form-processing web services.
Economics of BitTorrent communities.
Restful web services vs. "big"' web services: making the right architectural decision.
Trains of thought: generating information maps.
Compiling cryptographic protocols for deployment on the web.
Learning Global Term Weights for Content-based Recommender Systems.
Linking Users Across Domains with Location Data: Theory and Validation.
A new paradigm for ranking pages on the world wide web.
Analysis of community structure in Wikipedia.
Density-friendly Graph Decomposition.
Index structures and algorithms for querying distributed RDF repositories.
Towards multi-granularity multi-facet e-book retrieval.
Scalable Methods for Adaptively Seeding a Social Network.
Time is of the essence: improving recency ranking using Twitter data.
Using Google distance to weight approximate ontology matches.
A web-based kernel function for measuring the similarity of short text snippets.
Gsp-exr: gsp protocol with an exclusive right for keyword auctions.
A pattern tree-based approach to learning URL normalization rules.
Yet another paper ranking algorithm advocating recent publications.
Modeling and predicting behavioral dynamics on the web.
Generalized distances between rankings.
Is high-quality vod feasible using P2P swarming?
Opinion Spam Detection in Web Forum: A Real Case Study.
Situation detection and control using spatio-temporal analysis of microblogs.
RQL: a declarative query language for RDF.
Semantic wiki aided business process specification.
XJ: facilitating XML processing in Java.
Answering search queries with CrowdSearcher.
Where to adapt dynamic service compositions.
Summarization of online image collections via implicit feedback.
Using annotations in enterprise search.
Parallel boosted regression trees for web search ranking.
Personalized social & real-time collaborative search.
Exploring social dynamics in online media sharing.
BlogScope: spatio-temporal analysis of the blogosphere.
Groupme!
Online team formation in social networks.
Open user profiles for adaptive news systems: help or harm?
SCAN: a small-world structured p2p overlay for multi-dimensional queries.
Leveraging Pattern Semantics for Extracting Entities in Enterprises.
Ontology-based legal information retrieval to improve the information access in e-government.
Combining anchor text categorization and graph analysis for paid link detection.
Enhancing diversity, coverage and balance for summarization through structure learning.
Internet Collaboration on Extremely Difficult Problems: Research versus Olympiad Questions on the Polymath Site.
Simple authentication for the web.
The structure of broad topics on the web.
Mining anchor text for query refinement.
Partitioning of Web graphs by community topology.
Offline matching approximation algorithms in exchange markets.
Web-scale information extraction in knowitall: (preliminary results).
Towards a theory model for product search.
Anchor-based proximity measures.
Genealogical trees on the web: a search engine user perspective.
Combining RDF and XML schemas to enhance interoperability between metadata application profiles.
Capturing the essentials of federated systems.
Modeling semantics and structure of discussion threads.
An information retrieval approach to spelling suggestion.
Mining topic-specific concepts and definitions on the web.
sTeam - Designing an integrative infrastructure for Web-based computer-supported cooperative learning.
Exploiting Collective Hidden Structures in Webpage Titles for Open Domain Entity Extraction.
Patch-based skin color detection and its application to pornography image filtering.
LINKREC: a unified framework for link recommendation with user attributes and graph structure.
Personalized multimedia web summarizer for tourist.
Web page rank prediction with markov models.
Automatically refining the wikipedia infobox ontology.
Learning transportation mode from raw gps data for geographic applications on the web.
Netprobe: a fast and scalable system for fraud detection in online auction networks.
Evaluating the effectiveness of search task trails.
Hidden sentiment association in chinese web opinion mining.
Algorithms and programming models for efficient representation of XML for Internet applications.
The seamless browser: enhancing the speed of web browsing by zooming and preview thumbnails.
NIFTY: a system for large scale information flow tracking and clustering.
AMIE: association rule mining under incomplete evidence in ontological knowledge bases.
Which vertical search engines are relevant?
Expressive languages for selecting groups from graph-structured data.
Google+Ripples: a native visualization of information flow.
Security implications of password discretization for click-based graphical passwords.
Question answering on interlinked data.
IncApprox: A Data Analytics System for Incremental Approximate Computing.
Fluid annotations through open hypermedia: using and extending emerging web standards.
HeteroMF: recommendation in heterogeneous information networks using context dependent factor models.
Potential networks, contagious communities, and understanding social network structure.
Measurement and analysis of child pornography trafficking on P2P networks.
The role of web hosting providers in detecting compromised websites.
Exploring and exploiting user search behavior on mobile and tablet devices to improve search relevance.
The cost of annoying ads.
Inferring dependency constraints on parameters for web services.
The self-feeding process: a unifying model for communication dynamics in the web.
Evaluating and predicting user engagement change with degraded search relevance.
Enforcing strict model-view separation in template engines.
Web page classification with heterogeneous data fusion.
Automatic searching of tables in digital libraries.
Max algorithms in crowdsourcing environments.
Enabling full service surrogates using the portable channel representation.
Finding influentials based on the temporal order of information adoption in twitter.
A flexible generative model for preference aggregation.
Subgraph frequencies: mapping the empirical and extremal geography of large graph collections.
Researcher homepage classification using unlabeled data.
Mining expertise and interests from social media.
Spatio-temporal dynamics of online memes: a study of geo-tagged tweets.
Voices of victory: a computational focus group framework for tracking opinion shift in real time.
Wisdom in the social crowd: an analysis of quora.
Is this app safe for children?: a comparison study of maturity ratings on Android and iOS applications.
Web usage mining with semantic analysis.
Google+ or Google-?: dissecting the evolution of the new OSN in its first year.
Bitsquatting: exploiting bit-flips for fun, or profit?
Plurality: a context-aware personalized tagging system.
XVM: a bridge between xml data and its behavior.
Generating summaries for large collections of geo-referenced photographs.
Data-Fu: a language and an interpreter for interaction with read/write linked data.
Faceted exploration of image search results.
A pragmatic application of the semantic web using SemTalk.
XML Query Forms (XQForms): Declarative Specification of XML Query Interfaces
People and Cookies: Imperfect Treatment Assignment in Online Experiments.
Machine learning in an auction environment.
Table Cell Search for Question Answering.
Statistical properties of community structure in large social and information networks.
Modeling relationship strength in online social networks.
Highly scalable web applications with zero-copy data transfer.
Web service interfaces.
Learning block importance models for web pages.
Breadth-first crawling yields high-quality pages.
Mobile web publishing and surfing based on environmental sensing data.
Web browsing performance of wireless thin-client computing.
Detection and analysis of drive-by-download attacks and malicious JavaScript code.
Chaff from the wheat: characterization and modeling of deleted questions on stack overflow.
Invasive browser sniffing and countermeasures.
Agent-based semantic web services.
Quite a mess in my cookie jar!: leveraging machine learning to protect web authentication.
Fine-grained privilege separation for web applications.
The wisdom of minority: discovering and targeting the right group of workers for crowdsourcing.
Reappraising cognitive styles in adaptive web applications.
Automated runtime recovery for QoS-based service composition.
Designing and deploying online field experiments.
Codewebs: scalable homework search for massive open online programming courses.
Temporal QoS-aware web service recommendation via non-negative tensor factorization.
Contextual and dimensional relevance judgments for reusable SERP-level evaluation.
Similarity-based web browser optimization.
The bursty dynamics of the Twitter information network.
Unveiling group characteristics in online social games: a socio-economic analysis.
Exploring the filter bubble: the effect of using recommender systems on content diversity.
Automatic Discovery of Attribute Synonyms Using Query Logs and Table Corpora.
Organizing the unorganized - employing IT to empower the under-privileged.
A community-aware search engine.
From devices to people: attribution of search activity in multi-user settings.
The company you keep: mobile malware infection rates and inexpensive risk indicators.
Mining novelty-seeking trait across heterogeneous domains.
Optimal revenue-sharing double auctions with applications to ad exchanges.
Don't like RDF reification?: making statements about statements using singleton property.
Fast topic discovery from web search streams.
Revenue monotone mechanisms for online advertising.
Price competition in online combinatorial markets.
Crowd Fraud Detection in Internet Advertising.
Introduction to social recommendation.
Understanding the Detection of View Fraud in Video Content Portals.
An assessment of tag presentation techniques.
A general framework for adaptive and online detection of web attacks.
Data extraction and label assignment for web databases.
Bootstrapped extraction of class attributes.
we.b: the web of short urls.
A search-based method for forecasting ad impression in contextual advertising.
Bimodal invitation-navigation fair bets model for authority identification in a social network.
Mining models of human activities from the web.
ChangeDetector[tm]: a site-level monitoring tool for the WWW.
P-TAG: large scale automatic generation of personalized annotation tags for the web.
A quality-aware model for sales prediction using reviews.
A systematic approach for cell-phone worm containment.
SecuBat: a web vulnerability scanner.
Learning based access control in online social networks.
The design and implementation of the redland RDF application framework.
Computers and iphones and mobile phones, oh my!: a logs-based comparison of search users on different devices.
Strengthening Weak Identities Through Inter-Domain Trust Transfer.
Summarizing Entity Descriptions for Effective and Efficient Human-centered Entity Linking.
Towards intent-driven bidterm suggestion.
Towards language-independent web genre detection.
Finding community structure in mega-scale social networks: [extended abstract].
Topic-sensitive PageRank.
Ontology engineering using volunteer labor.
Time-dependent semantic similarity measure of queries using historical click-through data.
Construction by linking: the linkbase method.
Modeling redirection in geographically diverse server sets.
Protecting electronic commerce from distributed denial-of-service attacks.
Supporting Ethical Web Research: A New Research Ethics Review.
Web search engine metrics: (direct metrics to measure user satisfaction).
Winning Arguments: Interaction Dynamics and Persuasion Strategies in Good-faith Online Discussions.
Analysis of topological characteristics of huge online social networking services.
Mining contiguous sequential patterns from web logs.
Compiling XSLT 2.0 into XQuery 1.0.
Implementing physical hyperlinks using ubiquitous identifier resolution.
INEX+DBPEDIA: a corpus for semantic search evaluation.
Performing grouping and aggregate functions in XML queries.
Querying and maintaining a compact XML storage.
Image annotation by hierarchical mapping of features.
Bayesian network based sentence retrieval model.
Stress Testing the Booters: Understanding and Undermining the Business of DDoS Services.
Analyzing seller practices in a Brazilian marketplace.
Cat and mouse: content delivery tradeoffs in web access.
Probabilistic question recommendation for question answering communities.
Extrapolation methods for accelerating PageRank computations.
An SPath-based preference language for P3P.
Personalized web exploration with task models.
A hybrid approach for searching in the semantic web.
A generic framework for collaborative multi-perspective ontology acquisition.
SweetDeal: representing agent contracts with exceptions using XML rules, ontologies, and process descriptions.
CETR: content extraction via tag ratios.
No Honor Among Thieves: A Large-Scale Analysis of Malicious Web Shells.
The anatomy of an ad: structured indexing and retrieval for sponsored search.
Consistency-preserving caching of dynamic database content.
Where Can I Buy a Boulder?: Searching for Offline Retail Locations.
Probabilistic query expansion using query logs.
Anycast-aware transport for content delivery networks.
A web-based resource migration protocol using WebDAV.
One document to bind them: combining XML, web services, and the semantic web.
Cracking Classifiers for Evasion: A Case Study on the Google's Phishing Pages Filter.
Grading the Graders: Motivating Peer Graders in a MOOC.
Purely URL-based topic classification.
Efficient search in large textual collections with redundancy.
Flickr tag recommendation based on collective knowledge.
Cross-lingual knowledge linking across wiki knowledge bases.
Latent Space Model for Multi-Modal Social Data.
Retagging social images based on visual and semantic consistency.
Model-theoretic semantics for the web.
Analyzing search engine advertising: firm behavior and cross-selling in electronic markets.
Trend detection model.
Highly efficient algorithms for structural clustering of large websites.
Image collector III: a web image-gathering system with bag-of-keypoints.
Adaptive policies for selecting groupon style chunked reward ads in a stochastic knapsack framework.
Design and Analysis of Benchmarking Experiments for Distributed Internet Services.
Privacy-enhanced sharing of personal content on the web.
Cooperative leases: scalable consistency maintenance in content distribution networks.
Discovering user profiles.
A teapot graph and its hierarchical structure of the chinese web.
Identifying vertical search intention of query through social tagging propagation.
Malicious interface design: exploiting the user.
Internet-scale collection of human-reviewed data.
The next wave of the web.
The web structure of e-government - developing a methodology for quantitative evaluation.
Enquiring Minds: Early Detection of Rumors in Social Media from Enquiry Posts.
Exploring searcher interactions for distinguishing types of commercial intent.
Instance-based probabilistic reasoning in the semantic web.
Beyond dwell time: estimating document relevance from cursor movements and other post-click searcher behavior.
Semantic navigation on the web of data: specification of routes, web fragments and actions.
A search-based Chinese word segmentation method.
Homepage live: automatic block tracing for web personalization.
Web based device independent mobile map applications.: the m-CHARTIS system.
Getting More for Less: Optimized Crowdsourcing with Dynamic Tasks and Goals.
Mining web logs to improve website organization.
Status of the African Web.
Bringing communities to the semantic web and the semantic web to communities.
Exploiting information redundancy to wring out structured data from the web.
Lightweight automatic face annotation in media pages.
Extending the compatibility notion for abstract WS-BPEL processes.
Estimation of user interest in visited web page.
Personalizing E-commerce applications with on-line heuristic decision making.
Predicting Pinterest: Automating a Distributed Human Computation.
Query Suggestion and Data Fusion in Contextual Disambiguation.
On the analysis of cascading style sheets.
Wake-on-WLAN.
Logical structure based semantic relationship extraction from semi-structured documents.
Learning to evaluate the visual quality of web pages.
A hierarchical monothetic document clustering algorithm for summarization and browsing search results.
Paid placement strategies for internet search engines.
Analyzing collective view of future, time-referenced events on the web.
Discovery of Topical Authorities in Instagram.
User behavior oriented web spam detection.
Robust web content extraction.
Automatic geotagging of Russian web sites.
When Does Improved Targeting Increase Revenue?
Detectives: detecting coalition hit inflation attacks in advertising networks streams.
YouServ: a web-hosting and content sharing tool for the masses.
DiTaBBu: automating the production of time-based hypermedia content.
Building term suggestion relational graphs from collective intelligence.
Deep mashup: a description-based framework for lightweight integration of web contents.
TailGate: handling long-tail content with a little help from friends.
Online mining of frequent query trees over XML data streams.
Automatic Online Evaluation of Intelligent Assistants.
Web projections: learning from contextual subgraphs of the web.
Background knowledge for ontology construction.
Hidden Topic Sentiment Model.
A refreshing perspective of search engine caching.
Path summaries and path partitioning in modern XML databases.
Semantic personalization of web portal contents.
Beyond Collaborative Filtering: The List Recommendation Problem.
The utility of tweeted URLs for web search.
A fault model and mutation testing of access control policies.
A search engine for natural language applications.
On deep annotation.
Extracting community structure through relational hypergraphs.
Provably Fast Inference of Latent Features from Networks: with Applications to Learning Social Circles and Multilabel Classification.
Visualizing tags over time.
Highlighting disputed claims on the web.
TribeFlow: Mining & Predicting User Trajectories.
Using Metafeatures to Increase the Effectiveness of Latent Semantic Models in Web Search.
The impact of online music services on the demand for stars in the music industry.
Compressed web indexes.
HTML2RSS: automatic generation of RSS feed based on structure analysis of HTML document.
Probabilistic Bag-Of-Hyperlinks Model for Entity Linking.
Automatic matchmaking of web services.
Factorizing personalized Markov chains for next-basket recommendation.
Three theses of representation in the semantic web.
Yes, there is a correlation: - from social networks to personal behavior on the web.
GoCAD: GPU-Assisted Online Content-Adaptive Display Power Saving for Mobile Devices in Internet Streaming.
Improved annotation of the blogosphere via autotagging and hierarchical clustering.
Unsupervised, Efficient and Semantic Expertise Retrieval.
Detecting semantic cloaking on the web.
Csurf: a context-driven non-visual web-browser.
Organizing and sharing distributed personal web-service data.
Web 2.0: blind to an accessible new world.
Access: news and blog analysis for the social sciences.
Externalities in online advertising.
Exploring social annotations for the semantic web.
Enabling entity-based aggregators for web 2.0 data.
An adaptive, fast, and safe XML parser based on byte sequences memorization.
Profiling the Potential of Web Tables for Augmenting Cross-domain Knowledge Bases.
An abuse-free fair contract signing protocol based on the RSA signature.
Efficient search for peer-to-peer information retrieval using semantic small world.
Towards network-aware service composition in the cloud.
Image classification for mobile web browsing.
Addressing people's information needs directly in a web search result page.
A stochastic learning-to-rank algorithm and its application to contextual advertising.
Incremental formalization of document annotations through ontology-based paraphrasing.
Enterprise and desktop search.
Generative models for name disambiguation.
How can scientists help to spread the web to all sections of the society.
Efficient training on biased minimax probability machine for imbalanced text classification.
Differences in the mechanics of information diffusion across topics: idioms, political hashtags, and complex contagion on twitter.
C-SPARQL: SPARQL for continuous querying.
ZoomRDF: semantic fisheye zooming on RDF data.
XQuery containment in presence of variable binding dependencies.
Mining cultural differences from a large number of geotagged photos.
Tagging Personal Photos with Transfer Deep Learning.
GERBIL: General Entity Annotator Benchmarking Framework.
Advertising keyword generation using active learning.
A probabilistic approach to spatiotemporal theme pattern mining on weblogs.
Accessible On-Line Floor Plans.
User-centric Web crawling.
SOFIE: a self-organizing framework for information extraction.
Organizing and searching the world wide web of facts -- step two: harnessing the wisdom of the crowds.
The Communication Network Within the Crowd.
Future User Engagement Prediction and Its Application to Improve the Sensitivity of Online Experiments.
Graffiti: node labeling in heterogeneous networks.
Resource management for scalable disconnected access to Web services.
HyperANF: approximating the neighbourhood function of very large graphs on a budget.
Web mashup scripting language.
Extracting article text from the web with maximum subsequence segmentation.
GeoTV: navigating geocoded rss to create an iptv experience.
Echoes of power: language effects and power differences in social interaction.
System II: a hypergraph based native rdf repository.
Model checking cobweb protocols for verification of HTML frames behavior.
A game based approach to assign geographical relevance to web images.
Handling forecast errors while bidding for display advertising.
Semantic analytics on social networks: experiences in addressing the problem of conflict of interest detection.
Web application security assessment by fault injection and behavior monitoring.
Effective Construction of Relative Lempel-Ziv Dictionaries.
Behavior Driven Topic Transition for Search Task Identification.
iRIN: image retrieval in image-rich information networks.
Towards environment generated media: object-participation-type weblog in home sensor network.
A CRM system for social media: challenges and experiences.
Modeling/predicting the evolution trend of osn-based applications.
RuralCafe: web search in the rural developing world.
Optimized query planning of continuous aggregation queries in dynamic data dissemination networks.
Semantic lexicon adaptation for use in query interpretation.
Globetp: template-based database replication for scalable web applications.
Understanding internet video sharing site workload: a view from data center design.
Tweeting Cameras for Event Detection.
The Case for Robotic Wireless Networks.
CS AKTive space: representing computer science in the semantic web.
Guanxi in the chinese web - a study of mutual linking.
On automated composition for web services.
Measuring semantic similarity between words using web search engines.
From cookies to cooks: insights on dietary patterns via analysis of web usage logs.
Is it time for a career switch?
Spectral analysis of communication networks using Dirichlet eigenvalues.
Live web search experiments for the rest of us.
Community detection in incomplete information networks.
Safeguard against
Keyword extraction for social snippets.
Effort estimation: how valuable is it for a web company to use a cross-company data set, compared to using its own single-company data set?
Clustering user queries of a search engine.
When experts agree: using non-affiliated experts to rank popular topics.
A high-performance interpretive approach to schema-directed parsing.
Better abstractions for secure server-side scripting.
What's really new on the web?: identifying new pages from a series of unstable web snapshots.
Detecting web page structure for adaptive viewing on small form factor devices.
Seeing the whole in parts: text summarization for web browsing on handheld devices.
Gimme' the context: context-driven automatic semantic annotation with C-PANKOW.
Spam double-funnel: connecting web spammers with advertisers.
HeteroSales: Utilizing Heterogeneous Social Networks to Identify the Next Enterprise Customer.
Collaborative location and activity recommendations with GPS history data.
Exposing private information by timing web applications.
Automatic Detection of Information Leakage Vulnerabilities in Browser Extensions.
How people use the web on mobile devices.
TrackMeOrNot: Enabling Flexible Control on Web Tracking.
DIANE: an integrated approach to automated service discovery, matchmaking and composition.
Electoral search using the VerkiezingsKijker: an experience report.
Semantic web integration of cultural heritage sources.
What do they think?: aggregating local views about news events and topics.
How effective is targeted advertising?
Regular expressions considered harmful in client-side XSS filters.
Accessibility: a Web engineering approach.
Web4CE: accessing web-based applications on consumer devices.
Floatcascade learning for fast imbalanced web mining.
Summary attributes and perceived search quality.
Preserving XML queries during schema evolution.
Earthquake shakes Twitter users: real-time event detection by social sensors.
A Neural Click Model for Web Search.
A web middleware architecture for dynamic customization of content for wireless clients.
Distributed nonnegative matrix factorization for web-scale dyadic data analysis on mapreduce.
Toward tighter integration of web search with a geographic information system.
Forcehttps: protecting high-security web sites from network attacks.
Exploring web scale language models for search query processing.
Keyword extraction for contextual advertisement.
Ensuring required failure atomicity of composite Web services.
Here's my cert, so trust me, maybe?: understanding TLS errors on the web.
Pick-a-crowd: tell me what you like, and i'll tell you what to do.
Compact explanation of data fusion decisions.
Timespent based models for predicting user retention.
Competitive analysis from click-through log.
A framework for learning web wrappers from the crowd.
When relevance is not enough: promoting diversity and freshnessin personalized question recommendation.
No country for old members: user lifecycle and linguistic change in online communities.
DIGTOBI: a recommendation system for Digg articles using probabilistic modeling.
One-class collaborative filtering with random graphs.
Structured query suggestion for specialization and parallel movement: effect on search behaviors.
Applications of open search tools.
Mining the peanut gallery: opinion extraction and semantic classification of product reviews.
Sketcha: a captcha based on line drawings of 3D models.
Evaluation with informational and navigational intents.
Learning to map between ontologies on the semantic web.
WWW 2008 workshop on social web search and mining: SWSM2008.
Law-governed peer-to-peer auctions.
The Lifecycles of Apps in a Social Ecosystem.
Discovering the staring people from social networks.
Defection detection: predicting search engine switching.
A characterization of online browsing behavior.
Texquery: a full-text search extension to xquery.
Bilingual web page and site readability assessment.
Towards lightweight and efficient DDOS attacks detection for web server.
Automatic web image selection with a probabilistic latent topic model.
Online expansion of rare queries for sponsored search.
Measuring the similarity between implicit semantic relations from the web.
Understanding User Economic Behavior in the City Using Large-scale Geotagged and Crowdsourced Data.
Identifying ambiguous queries in web search.
FLUX: fuzzy content and structure matching of XML range queries.
The ScratchPad: sensemaking support for the web.
A browser for browsing the past web.
User Latent Preference Model for Better Downside Management in Recommender Systems.
A system for principled matchmaking in an electronic marketplace.
Buzz-based recommender system.
Template guided association rule mining from XML documents.
Measurement and analysis of an online content voting network: a case study of Digg.
Unlocking the semantics of multimedia presentations in the web with the multimedia metadata ontology.
Speeding up web service composition with volatile information.
Query-free news search.
Visualizing web site comparisons.
Unsupervised query segmentation using generative language models and wikipedia.
Asymmetric Minwise Hashing for Indexing Binary Inner Products and Set Containment.
The Eigentrust algorithm for reputation management in P2P networks.
Unsupervised query segmentation using click data: preliminary results.
CubeSVD: a novel approach to personalized Web search.
GlobeDB: autonomic data replication for web applications.
SafeVchat: detecting obscene content and misbehaving users in online video chat services.
Tag-oriented document summarization.
Cross-domain sentiment classification via spectral feature alignment.
DemIL: an online interaction language between citizen and government.
Is Sniping A Problem For Online Auction Markets?
Debugging standard document formats.
Autonomous resource provisioning for multi-service web applications.
WPBench: a benchmark for evaluating the client-side performance of web 2.0 applications.
Webanywhere: enabling a screen reading interface for the web on any computer.
Building a companion website in the semantic web.
Using semantic rules to determine access control for web services.
Triplify: light-weight linked data publication from relational databases.
System for reminding a user of information obtainedthrough a web browsing experience.
Compare&contrast: using the web to discover comparable cases for news stories.
Mapping Temporal Horizons: Analysis of Collective Future and Past related Attention in Twitter.
Spanning Edge Centrality: Large-scale Computation and Applications.
Parallel Streaming Signature EM-tree: A Clustering Algorithm for Web Scale Applications.
Multimedia meets computer graphics in SMIL2.0: a time model for the web.
Text-based video blogging.
Exploiting single-user web applications for shared editing: a generic transformation approach.
Constructing virtual documents for ontology matching.
Mapping the world's photos.
Privacy in dynamic social networks.
Generating diverse and representative image search results for landmarks.
Context-sensitive QoS model: a rule-based approach to web service composition.
How useful are your comments?: analyzing and predicting youtube comments and comment ratings.
Race: finding and ranking compact connected trees for keyword proximity search over xml documents.
Find me if you can: improving geographical prediction with social and spatial proximity.
Site level noise removal for search engines.
Link based small sample learning for web spam detection.
An infrastructure for searching, reusing and evolving distributed ontologies.
Microscale evolution of web pages.
ATMEN: a triggered network measurement infrastructure.
Estimating sizes of social networks via biased sampling.
Network-aware forward caching.
Model-based version and configuration management for a web engineering lifecycle.
Spatio-temporal models for estimating click-through rate.
Near real time information mining in multilingual news.
Using the wisdom of the crowds for keyword generation.
Determining user's interest in real time.
On the lack of typical behavior in the global Web traffic network.
The slashdot zoo: mining a social network with negative edges.
A novel clustering-based RSS aggregator.
Topigraphy: visualization for large-scale tag clouds.
Service-oriented data denormalization for scalable web applications.
Answering bounded continuous search queries in the world wide web.
Semantic Tagging of Mathematical Expressions.
Track globally, deliver locally: improving content delivery networks by tracking geographic social cascades.
Network-based Origin Confusion Attacks against HTTPS Virtual Hosting.
Towards comment-based cross-media retrieval.
Designing ethical phishing experiments: a study of (ROT13) rOnl query features.
The credibility of the posted information in a recommendation system based on a map.
Newsjunkie: providing personalized newsfeeds via analysis of information novelty.
Knowledge modeling and its application in life sciences: a tale of two ontologies.
Tracking the Trackers.
SCTP: an innovative transport layer protocol for the web.
Constructing folksonomies by integrating structured metadata.
Learning to re-rank: query-dependent image re-ranking using click data.
QuickSuggest: character prediction on web appliances.
Searching with numbers.
The web of topics: discovering the topology of topic evolution in a corpus.
MapWatch: Detecting and Monitoring International Border Personalization on Online Maps.
Delay tolerant applications for low bandwidth and intermittently connected users: the aAQUA experience.
The world wide telecom web browser.
From Diversity-based Prediction to Better Ontology & Schema Matching.
Web search/browse log mining: challenges, methods, and applications.
Browsing fatigue in handhelds: semantic bookmarking spells relief.
Towards the theoretical foundation of choreography.
Beyond PageRank: machine learning for static ranking.
ASDL: a wide spectrum language for designing web services.
Efficient vectorial operators for processing xml twig queries.
Reliable QoS monitoring based on client feedback.
Improving understanding of website privacy policies with fine-grained policy anchors.
Optimization of html automatically generated by wysiwyg programs.
Finding experts and their eetails in e-mail corpora.
Piazza: data management infrastructure for semantic web applications.
XML design for relational storage.
Money, glory and cheap talk: analyzing strategic behavior of contestants in simultaneous crowdsourcing contests on TopCoder.com.
The web of nations.
Mining search engine query logs for query recommendation.
Collaborative knowledge semantic graph image search.
A convenient method for securely managing passwords.
Pivotbrowser: a tag-space image searching prototype.
Talking about data: sharing richly structured information through blogs and wikis.
A dual-mode user interface for accessing 3D content on the world wide web.
Web-based framework for spatiotemporal screen real estate management of interactive public displays.
Information spreading in context.
Transfer learning for behavioral targeting.
Enabling secure digital marketplace.
GoGetIt!: a tool for generating structure-driven web crawlers.
Content hole search in community-type content.
Real and the future of digital media.
Graph based crawler seed selection.
An integrated method for social network extraction.
Semantics and Expressive Power of Subqueries and Aggregates in SPARQL 1.1.
Disinformation on the Web: Impact, Characteristics, and Detection of Wikipedia Hoaxes.
Empirical comparison of algorithms for network community detection.
No Escape From Reality: Security and Privacy of Augmented Reality Browsers.
What is Twitter, a social network or a news media?
Communities from seed sets.
Diagnoses, Decisions, and Outcomes: Web Search as Decision Support for Cancer.
Make it fresh, make it quick: searching a network of personal webservers.
A large-scale evaluation and analysis of personalized search strategies.
Visualization of Geo-annotated pictures in mobile phones.
Test case prioritization for regression testing of service-oriented business applications.
Temporal views over rdf data.
Limiting the spread of misinformation in social networks.
Visualizing an historical semantic web with Heml.
Language Understanding in the Wild: Combining Crowdsourcing and Machine Learning.
Intelligent ad resizing.
Understanding and combating link farming in the twitter social network.
Mining Missing Hyperlinks from Human Navigation Traces: A Case Study of Wikipedia.
Scaling up all pairs similarity search.
Designing an architecture for delivering mobile information services to the rural developing world.
Joint relevance and freshness learning from clickthroughs for news search.
Selective early request termination for busy internet services.
Releasing search queries and clicks privately.
Scalable Parallel EM Algorithms for Latent Dirichlet Allocation in Multi-Core Systems.
Opinion integration through semi-supervised topic modeling.
Understanding task-driven information flow in collaborative networks.
Inferring query intent from reformulations and clicks.
The scale-free nature of semantic web ontology.
The Semantic Web and the Semantics of the Web: Where Does Meaning Come From?
Streaming speech
A flexible dialogue system for enhancing web usability.
Sessionlock: securing web sessions against eavesdropping.
Wishful search: interactive composition of data mashups.
Shout out: integrating news and reader comments.
WS-replication: a framework for highly available web services.
XML-based XML schema access.
Map adaptation for users of mobile systems.
visKQWL, a visual renderer for a semantic web query language.
Efficient web pages identification for entity resolution.
Recrawl scheduling based on information longevity.
Retroactive answering of search queries.
A Piggyback System for Joint Entity Mention Detection and Linking in Web Queries.
Linked data on the web (LDOW2008).
Predictive caching and prefetching of query results in search engines.
Lattice games and the economics of aggregators.
Super-peer-based routing and clustering strategies for RDF-based peer-to-peer networks.
Supporting anonymous location queries in mobile environments with privacygrid.
Personalized search and exploration with mytag.
Robust web page segmentation for mobile terminal using content-distances and page layout information.
Brand awareness and the evaluation of search results.
Adapting databases and WebDAV protocol.
Frankenplace: Interactive Thematic Mapping for Ad Hoc Exploratory Search.
Meaning on the web: evolution vs intelligent design?
Geospatial mapping and navigation of the web.
Semi-supervised truth discovery.
Economic Recommendation with Surplus Maximization.
Click chain model in web search.
Exploit sequencing views in semantic cache to accelerate xpath query evaluation.
Accountable key infrastructure (AKI): a proposal for a public-key validation infrastructure.
Interactive exploratory search for multi page search results.
Exploiting innocuous activity for correlating users across sites.
Ad impression forecasting for sponsored search.
From query to question in one click: suggesting synthetic questions to searchers.
Enhancing personalized search by mining and modeling task behavior.
Towards a robust modeling of temporal interest change patterns for behavioral targeting.
A biterm topic model for short texts.
Lightweight server support for browser-based CSRF protection.
How to grow more pairs: suggesting review targets for comparison-friendly review ecosystems.
TopRec: domain-specific recommendation through community topic mining in social network.
Diversified recommendation on graphs: pitfalls, measures, and algorithms.
Distributed large-scale natural graph factorization.
On cognition, emotion, and interaction aspects of search tasks with different search intentions.
Modeling User Exposure in Recommendation.
Micropinion generation: an unsupervised approach to generating ultra-concise summaries of opinions.
Predictive web automation assistant for people with vision impairments.
A predictive model for advertiser value-per-click in sponsored search.
Traveling the silk road: a measurement analysis of a large anonymous online marketplace.
Mashroom: end-user mashup programming using nested tables.
Geographically focused collaborative crawling.
Recommending questions using the mdl-based tree cut model.
Conceptual linking: ontology-based open hypermedia.
P2Cast: peer-to-peer patching scheme for VoD service.
An adaptive model for optimizing performance of an incremental web crawler.
Rethinking Security of Web-Based System Applications.
Do social explanations work?: studying and modeling the effects of social explanations in recommender systems.
Probabilistic group recommendation via information matching.
Hierarchical geographical modeling of user locations from social media posts.
Aggregating crowdsourced binary ratings.
Making the most of your triple store: query answering in OWL 2 using an RL reasoner.
Content-aware click modeling.
Trade area analysis using user generated mobile location data.
Groundhog day: near-duplicate detection on Twitter.
ClausIE: clause-based open information extraction.
When tolerance causes weakness: the case of injection-friendly browsers.
The FLDA model for aspect-based opinion mining: addressing the cold start problem.
Two years of short URLs internet measurement: security threats and countermeasures.
Foundations of JSON Schema.
Sampling search-engine results.
Rants: a framework for rank editing and sharing in web search.
A scalable machine-learning approach for semi-structured named entity recognition.
Multiway SLCA-based keyword search in XML data.
Active objects: actions for entity-centric search.
Hardening Web browsers against man-in-the-middle and eavesdropping attacks.
Raise semantics at the user level for dynamic and interactive SOA-based portals.
Smart caching for web browsers.
Feature weighting in content based recommendation system using social network analysis.
All your contacts are belong to us: automated identity theft attacks on social networks.
A larger scale study of robots.txt.
Graph theoretical framework for simultaneously integrating visual and textual features for efficient web image clustering.
Enhanced hierarchical classification via isotonic smoothing.
Automatic identification of user goals in Web search.
Unsupervised learning of soft patterns for generating definitions from online news.
Actively predicting diverse search intent from user browsing behaviors.
Design and development of learning management system at universiti Putra Malaysia: a case study of e-SPRINT.
Discovering event evolution graphs from newswires.
Supporting management reporting: a writable web case study.
Using symbolic objects to cluster web documents.
HTML templates that fly: a template engine approach to automated offloading from server to client.
XQuery in the browser.
PRIVE: anonymous location-based queries in distributed mobile systems.
Architecture of a quality based intelligent proxy (QBIX) for MPEG-4 videos.
Mining the search trails of surfing crowds: identifying relevant websites from user activity.
Towards domain-independent information extraction from web tables.
A flexible framework for engineering "my" portals.
Tackling the Achilles Heel of Social Networks: Influence Propagation based Language Model Smoothing.
Demographic prediction based on user's browsing behavior.
Providing SCORM with adaptivity.
Discovering Structure in the Universe of Attribute Names.
Random web crawls.
A RTP to HTTP video gateway.
Enabling knowledge representation on the Web by extending RDF schema.
Networked graphs: a declarative mechanism for SPARQL rules, SPARQL views and RDF data integration on the web.
From adaptation engineering to aspect-oriented context-dependency.
Substructure similarity measurement in chinese recipes.
Scaling up Dynamic Topic Models.
Collaborative filtering on skewed datasets.
Generating maps of web pages using cellular automata.
Co-browsing dynamic web pages.
A measurement-driven analysis of information propagation in the flickr social network.
Application of bitmap index to information retrieval.
Unparsing RDF/XML.
AdHeat: an influence-based diffusion model for propagating hints to match ads.
How much is your personal recommendation worth?
Extracting client-side web application code.
ActiveRDF: object-oriented semantic web programming.
idMesh: graph-based disambiguation of linked data.
Semi-supervised correction of biased comment ratings.
A messaging API for inter-widgets communication.
Size matters: word count as a measure of quality on wikipedia.
sMash: semantic-based mashup navigation for data API network.
From SPARQL to rules (and back).
Page-level template detection via isotonic smoothing.
Improving web browsing performance on wireless pdas using thin-client computing.
Wiki content templating.
How much can behavioral targeting help online advertising?
Sitemaps: above and beyond the crawl of duty.
A generalised cross-modal clustering method applied to multimedia news semantic indexing and retrieval.
Information flow modeling based on diffusion rate for prediction and ranking.
Designing personalized web applications.
DNS-enhanced web for faster content delivery.
Fine grained access control for SOAP E-services.
A framework for rapid integration of presentation components.
Learning to classify short and sparse text & web with hidden topics from large-scale data collections.
Competition on Price and Quality in Cloud Computing.
A unified platform for data driven web applications with automatic client-server partitioning.
Introduction and evaluation of Martlet: a scientific workflow language for abstracted parallelisation.
Knowledge sharing and yahoo answers: everyone knows something.
Why we search: visualizing and predicting user behavior.
In a World That Counts: Clustering and Detecting Fake Social Engagement at Scale.
Finding similar pages in a social tagging repository.
Fast and parallel webpage layout.
Recommendation Subgraphs for Web Discovery.
FACTO: a fact lookup engine based on web tables.
Effective Techniques for Message Reduction and Load Balancing in Distributed Graph Computation.
LSH forest: self-tuning indexes for similarity search.
Predicting group stability in online social networks.
Unified entity search in social media community.
Group chats on Twitter.
User profiling in an ego network: co-profiling attributes and relationships.
Crowdsourcing Annotations for Websites' Privacy Policies: Can It Really Work?
Psychological maps 2.0: a web engagement enterprise starting in London.
Towards a multimedia formatting vocabulary.
Privacy wizards for social networking sites.
Optimal audio-visual representations for illiterate users of computers.
Description logic programs: combining logic programs with description logic.
Improving mobile internet usability.
WebPod: persistent Web browsing sessions with pocketable storage devices.
Certified email with a light on-line trusted third party: design and implementation.
Branded with a scarlet "C": cheaters in a gaming social network.
Composing and optimizing data providing web services.
Geotracker: geospatial and temporal RSS navigation.
Local collaborative ranking.
Simrank++: query rewriting through link analysis of the clickgraph (poster).
A hierarchical Dirichlet model for taxonomy expansion for search engines.
Statistical inference in two-stage online controlled experiments with treatment selection and validation.
CoBaFi: collaborative bayesian filtering.
Was this review helpful to you?: it depends! context and voting patterns in online content.
The dual-sparse topic model: mining focused topics and focused terms in short text.
Acquisition of open-domain classes via intersective semantics.
Reduce and aggregate: similarity ranking in multi-categorical bipartite graphs.
Improvement of HITS-based algorithms on web documents.
Online change detection in individual web user behaviour.
Sequential Hypothesis Tests for Adaptive Locality Sensitive Hashing.
Fully automatic wrapper generation for search engines.
Mining Online Social Data for Detecting Social Network Mental Disorders.
We know who you followed last summer: inferring social link creation times in twitter.
Measuring extremal dependencies in web graphs.
Search result re-ranking based on gap between search queries and social tags.
Monitoring the evolution of cached content in Google and MSN.
Analysis of multimedia workloads with implications for internet streaming.
An evaluation of TCP splice benefits in web proxy servers.
Who killed my battery?: analyzing mobile browser energy consumption.
Enriching Structured Knowledge with Open Information.
Accelerated focused crawling through online relevance feedback.
PriVaricator: Deceiving Fingerprinters with Little White Lies.
Is question answering an acquired skill?
Detecting online commercial intention (OCI).
Is there anything worth finding on the semantic web?
Modeling the temporal dynamics of social rating networks using bidirectional effects of social relations and rating patterns.
Scrolling behaviour with single- and multi-column layout.
As we may perceive: finding the boundaries of compound documents on the web.
Optimal rare query suggestion with implicit user feedback.
Network bucket testing.
Build your own music recommender by modeling internet radio streams.
TripleProv: efficient processing of lineage queries in a native RDF store.
Timeline generation: tracking individuals on twitter.
The dynamics of repeat consumption.
Monitoring web browsing behavior with differential privacy.
Using proxy cache relocation to accelerate Web browsing in wireless/mobile communications.
An incremental XSLT transformation processor for XML document manipulation.
Immersive Recommendation: News and Event Recommendations Using Personal Digital Traces.
HTML2RSS: automatic generation of RSS feed based on structure analysis of HTML document.
A service creation environment based on end to end composition of Web services.
A game theoretic formulation of the service provisioning problem in cloud systems.
Characterizing web-based video sharing workloads.
The case for multi-user design for computer aided learning in developing regions.
Alhambra: a system for creating, enforcing, and testing browser security policies.
Gathering Additional Feedback on Search Results by Multi-Armed Bandits with Respect to Production Ranking.
Search is dead!: long live search.
Workshop on social web and knowledge management (SWKM2008).
From "Selena Gomez" to "Marlon Brando": Understanding Explorative Entity Search.
Scalable discovery of contradictions on the web.
Effective web-scale crawling through website analysis.
Preference-based selection of highly configurable web services.
GigaHash: scalable minimal perfect hashing for billions of urls.
Joint Recognition and Linking of Fine-Grained Locations from Tweets.
Addressing the testing challenge with a web-based e-assessment system that tutors as it assesses.
Constructing travel itineraries from tagged geo-temporal breadcrumbs.
Impact of search engines on page popularity.
Improving web spam detection with re-extracted features.
A Field Guide to Personalized Reserve Prices.
Sparse hidden-dynamics conditional random fields for user intent understanding.
A probabilistic model based approach for blended search.
CaTTS: calendar types and constraints for Web applications.
Nearest-neighbor caching for content-match applications.
Two birds with one stone: a graph-based framework for disambiguating and tagging people names in web search.
The web beyond popularity: a really simple system for web scale RSS.
Combining classifiers to identify online databases.
useKit: a step towards the executable web 3.0.
Mining RDF metadata for generalized association rules: knowledge discovery in the semantic web era.
ARROW: GenerAting SignatuRes to Detect DRive-By DOWnloads.
A large-scale study of the evolution of web pages.
Measuring a commercial content delivery network.
Web people search: results of the first evaluation and the plan for the second.
Non-Linear Mining of Competing Local Activities.
PAKE-based mutual HTTP authentication for preventing phishing attacks.
Towards automating regression test selection for web services.
A possible simplification of the semantic web architecture.
A framework for querying graph-based business process models.
Search shortcuts: driving users towards their goals.
On representation of a highlight on the Web: the amber room as a cultural phenomenon in progress.
Compressed data structures for annotated web search.
Comparing apples and oranges: normalized pagerank for evolving graphs.
Who says what to whom on twitter.
Proximity within paragraph: a measure to enhance eocument retrieval performance.
An In-depth Study of Mobile Browser Performance.
Improved techniques for result caching in web search engines.
High-performance spatial indexing for location-based services.
Towards robust trust establishment in web-based social networks with socialtrust.
A novel collaborative filtering-based framework for personalized services in m-commerce.
Volunteer computing: a model of the factors determining contribution to community-based scientific research.
Searching with context.
HTTP database connector (HDBC): RESTful access to relational databases.
Automated construction of web accessibility models from transaction click-streams.
?-Queries: enabling querying for semantic associations on the semantic web.
The social honeypot project: protecting online communities from spammers.
Academic web search engine: generating a survey automatically.
An Optimization Framework for Weighting Implicit Relevance Labels for Personalized Web Search.
Debugging OWL ontologies.
Web-based personalization and management of interactive video.
DoNet: a semantic domotic framework.
PageRank as a function of the damping factor.
Scalable querying services over fuzzy ontologies.
Improving Web search efficiency via a locality based static pruning method.
Adaptive ranking of web pages.
Caching search engine results over incremental indices.
Capturing RIA concepts in a web modeling language.
Exploiting web search engines to search structured databases.
Incorporating Social Context and Domain Knowledge for Entity Recognition.
ViBE: virtual biology experiments.
Efficient search engine measurements.
Querying for meta knowledge.
Model characterization curves for federated search using click-logs: predicting user engagement metrics for the span of feasible operating points.
XML screamer: an integrated approach to high performance XML parsing, validation and deserialization.
A scalable application placement controller for enterprise data centers.
Extracting query modifications from nonlinear SVMs.
Web image retrieval reranking with multi-view clustering.
Efficient multi-keyword search over p2p web.
Bridging the gap between OWL and relational databases.
Algorithm for stochastic multiple-choice knapsack problem and application to keywords bidding.
A kernel based structure matching for web services search.
Visualizing differences in web search algorithms using the expected weighted hoeffding distance.
Improving portlet interoperability through deep annotation.
Automatic search engine performance evaluation with click-through data analysis.
Smart Miner: a new framework for mining large scale web usage data.
User Fatigue in Online News Recommendation.
Object-level ranking: bringing order to Web objects.
Navigating the intranet with high precision.
Position paper: a comparison of two modelling paradigms in the Semantic Web.
Document hierarchies from text and links.
Query segmentation revisited.
Understanding web search via a learning paradigm.
Exploring in the weblog space by detecting informative and affective articles.
Smartback: supporting users in back navigation.
Predictive modeling of first-click behavior in web-search.
Function-based object model towards website adaptation.
Model-directed web transactions under constrained modalities.
Cardinal Contests.
Detecting Evolution of Concepts based on Cause-Effect Relationships in Online Reviews.
An experimental study of large-scale mobile social network.
Web user de-identification in personalization.
Three-level caching for efficient query processing in large Web search engines.
Reasoning about similarity queries in text retrieval tasks.
Analyzing web access control policies.
Active Learning for Multi-relational Data Construction.
Mining for personal name aliases on the web.
SMash: secure component model for cross-domain mashups on unmodified browsers.
Development of a semantic web based mobile local search system.
SGPS: a semantic scheme for web service similarity.
Inverted index compression and query processing with optimized document ordering.
CloudGenius: decision support for web server cloud migration.
Fast algorithms for topk personalized pagerank queries.
Leveraging user comments for aesthetic aware image search reranking.
Improving Post-Click User Engagement on Native Ads via Survival Analysis.
MindFinder: image search by interactive sketching and tagging.
On ranking techniques for desktop search.
Automatic Web Content Extraction by Combination of Learning and Grouping.
KC3 browser: semantic mash-up and link-free browsing.
Investigating the distribution of password choices.
Understanding web images by object relation network.
A unified framework for recommending diverse and relevant queries.
Sic transit gloria telae: towards an understanding of the web's decay.
Visually guided bottom-up table detection and segmentation in web documents.
Selective hypertext induced topic search.
On directly mapping relational databases to RDF and OWL.
Framework and algorithms for network bucket testing.
Mr. LDA: a flexible large scale topic modeling package using variational inference in MapReduce.
Identifying regional sensitive queries in web search.
Analyzing client interactivity in streaming media.
HypTrails: A Bayesian Approach for Comparing Hypotheses About Human Trails on the Web.
We know what @you #tag: does the dual role affect hashtag adoption?
Stochastic models for tabbed browsing.
Rewriting queries on SPARQL views.
Early Detection of Spam Mobile Apps.
Access control enforcement for conversation-based web services.
Groupsourcing: Team Competition Designs for Crowdsourcing.
RDFPeers: a scalable distributed RDF repository based on a structured peer-to-peer network.
Your two weeks of fame and your grandmother's.
Semantic WS-agreement partner selection.
Answering relationship queries on the web.
Using graphics processors for high performance IR query processing.
A combinatorial allocation mechanism with penalties for banner advertising.
WEESA: Web engineering for semantic Web applications.
Deriving music theme annotations from user tags.
On admission control for profit maximization of networked service providers.
Learning to rank with multiple objective functions.
What the web can't do.
Visual diversification of image search results.
Spotting fake reviewer groups in consumer reviews.
Analyzing content-level properties of the web adversphere.
Using subspace analysis for event detection from web click-through data.
Summarizing email conversations with clue words.
Abusive Language Detection in Online User Content.
GRAPE: a system for disambiguating and tagging people names in web search.
Exposing audio data to the web: an API and prototype.
LightLDA: Big Topic Models on Modest Computer Clusters.
Budget-Constrained Item Cold-Start Handling in Collaborative Filtering Recommenders via Optimal Design.
Analysis of communication models in web service compositions.
Extracting spam blogs with co-citation clusters.
Learning consensus opinion: mining data from a labeling game.
Modeling contextual agreement in preferences.
On estimating the average degree.
Deduplicating a places database.
Community-based bayesian aggregation models for crowdsourcing.
What makes an image popular?
How to influence people with partial incentives.
Automatic detection and correction of web application vulnerabilities using data mining to predict false positives.
Personalized collaborative clustering.
Dynamic and historical shortest-path distance queries on large evolving networks by pruned landmark labeling.
User satisfaction in competitive sponsored search.
Modeling and predicting the growth and death of membership-based websites.
XXXtortion?: inferring registration intent in the .XXX TLD.
Who proposed the relationship?: recovering the hidden directions of undirected social networks.
Attributed graph models: modeling network structure with correlated attributes.
Comment-based multi-view clustering of web 2.0 items.
Dynamic and graphical web page breakpoints.
Similarity measure and instance selection for collaborative filtering.
Causal relation of queries from temporal logs.
A dynamic bayesian network click model for web search ranking.
Integrating the document object model with hyperlinks for enhanced topic distillation and information extraction.
The distribution of pageRank follows a power-law only for particular values of the damping factor.
Towards Reconciling SPARQL and Certain Answers.
Why is the web loosely coupled?: a multi-faceted metric for service design.
SAFE extensibility of data-driven web applications.
Did You Say U2 or YouTube?: Inferring Implicit Transcripts from Voice Search Logs.
Exploiting Green Energy to Reduce the Operational Costs of Multi-Center Web Search Engines.
PageSense: style-wise web page advertising.
Mining User Intentions from Medical Queries: A Neural Network Based Heterogeneous Jointly Modeling Approach.
Efficient Web form entry on PDAs.
Web page sectioning using regex-based template.
Sailer: an effective search engine for unified retrieval of heterogeneous xml and web documents.
A declarative framework for semantic link discovery over relational data.
Web-scale k-means clustering.
Conversion rate based bid adjustment for sponsored search.
Choreography conformance via synchronizability.
MobInsight: On Improving The Performance of Mobile Apps in Cellular Networks.
Describing and Understanding Neighborhood Characteristics through Online Social Media.
Events and Controversies: Influences of a Shocking News Event on Information Seeking.
Uncovering the Small Community Structure in Large Networks: A Local Spectral Approach.
Extracting XML schema from multiple implicit xml documents based on inductive reasoning.
XL: an XML programming language for web service specification and composition.
XQuery at your web service.
Analysis of WWW traffic in Cambodia and Ghana.
Acquiring ontological knowledge from query logs.
Can chinese web pages be classified with english data source?
Asymmetrical query recommendation method based on bipartite network resource allocation.
Investigating behavioral variability in web search.
SPARQL basic graph pattern optimization using selectivity estimation.
Xspect: bridging open hypermedia and XLink.
A multilingual usage consultation tool based on internet searching: more than a search engine, less than QA.
Yago: a core of semantic knowledge.
Composite events for xml.
Communication as information-seeking: the case for mobile social software for developing regions.
RDF compression: basic approaches.
Learning to rank relational objects and its application to web search.
Exploiting social context for review quality prediction.
Protocol-aware matching of web service interfaces for adapter development.
Social Status and Badge Design.
Discovering the best web service.
PocketTrend: Timely Identification and Delivery of Trending Search Content to Mobile Users.
Understanding user's query intent with wikipedia.
Towards practical genre classification of web documents.
Hunter gatherer: interaction support for the creation and management of within-web-page collections.
OWL DL vs. OWL flight: conceptual modeling and reasoning for the semantic Web.
Building voiceXML browsers with openVXI.
Object views: fine-grained sharing in browsers.
Efficient URL caching for world wide web crawling.
Rich media and web 2.0.
A hybrid phish detection approach by identity discovery and keywords retrieval.
Temporal rules for mobile web personalization.
ROCKER: A Refinement Operator for Key Discovery.
TWC data-gov corpus: incrementally generating linked government data from data.gov.
Extracting key terms from noisy and multitheme documents.
Bucefalo: a tool for intelligent search and filtering for web-based personal health records.
A novel traffic analysis for identifying search fields in the long tail of web sites.
Gender, Productivity, and Prestige in Computer Science Faculty Hiring Networks.
Emergence of terminological conventions as an author-searcher coordination game.
Incentivizing high-quality user-generated content.
Automating metadata generation: the simple indexing interface.
The design and usage of tentative events for time-based social coordination in the enterprise.
Flexible on-device service object replication with replets.
Template detection via data mining and its applications.
Open Domain Question Answering via Semantic Enrichment.
Community discovery and analysis in blogspace.
Ranking specialization for web search: a divide-and-conquer approach by using topical RankSVM.
Offering open hypermedia services to the WWW: a step-by-step approach for developers.
An intelligent distributed environment for active learning.
A link-based similarity measure for scientific literature.
Representing Documents via Latent Keyphrase Inference.
Off the beaten tracks: exploring three aspects of web navigation.
Understanding Malvertising Through Ad-Injecting Browser Extensions.
Vocabulary development for markup languages: a case study with maritime information.
Dynamic service reconfiguration for wireless web access.
Constructing folksonomies from user-specified relations on flickr.
An experimental evaluation of bidders' behavior in ad auctions.
STFU NOOB!: predicting crowdsourced decisions on toxic behavior in online games.
Finding progression stages in time-evolving event sequences.
Engaging with massive online courses.
WikiWho: precise and efficient attribution of authorship of revisioned content.
SemRank: ranking complex relationship search results on the semantic web.
Selective recrawling for object-level vertical search.
Large scale multi-label classification via metalabeler.
QUBE: a quick algorithm for updating betweenness centrality.
Unified analysis of streaming news.
Counting triangles and the curse of the last reducer.
Verifying genre-based clustering approach to content extraction.
Inferring private information using social network data.
From Social Machines to Social Protocols: Software Engineering Foundations for Sociotechnical Systems.
Improvements in practical aspects of optimally scheduling web advertising.
Fractal summarization for mobile devices to access large documents on the web.
RESTler: crawling RESTful services.
A comparison of case-based reasoning approaches.
Reining in the web with content security policy.
Placing search in context: the concept revisited.
Compressing and searching XML data via two zips.
Essential Web Pages Are Easy to Find.
Personalized interactive faceted search.
The SemSets model for ad-hoc semantic list search.
Protecting web services from remote exploit code: a static analysis approach.
Mining multilingual topics from wikipedia.
A cautious surfer for PageRank.
Detecting soft errors by redirection classification.
ACCAMS: Additive Co-Clustering to Approximate Matrices Succinctly.
Towards a programming language for services computing.
What makes conversations interesting?: themes, participants and consequences of conversations in online social media.
A pruning-based approach for supporting Top-K join queries.
Explorations in the use of semantic web technologies for product information management.
1000 years of the olympic games: treasures of ancient Greece. digital reconstruction at the home of the gods.
Graphical representation of RDF queries.
Adaptive web search based on user profile constructed without any effort from users.
Validating the use and role of visual elements of web pages in navigation with an eye-tracking study.
Interactive image search by 2D semantic map.
First-order focused crawling.
Beyond position bias: examining result attractiveness as a source of presentation bias in clickthrough data.
Learning to recognize reliable users and content in social media with coupled mutual reinforcement.
Incentivizing High Quality Crowdwork.
Fourth international workshop on adversarial information retrieval on the web (AIRWeb 2008).
Randomization tests for distinguishing social influence and homophily effects.
A Robust Framework for Estimating Linguistic Alignment in Twitter Conversations.
IRLbot: scaling to 6 billion pages and beyond.
Topic-oriented query expansion for web search.
Integrating ecoinformatics resources on the semantic web.
Information credibility on twitter.
Efficient and robust streaming provisioning in VPNs.
When do Recommender Systems Work the Best?: The Moderating Effects of Product Attributes and Consumer Reviews on Recommender Performance.
Pushing the Frontier: Exploring the African Web Ecosystem.
Visualizing historical content of web pages.
Is this app safe?: a large scale study on application permissions and risk signals.
Sewnet -: a framework for creating services utilizing telecom functionality.
Towards context-aware search by learning a very large variable length hidden markov model from search logs.
The Lifecycle and Cascade of WeChat Social Messaging Groups.
User-centric content freshness metrics for search engines.
A proposal for an owl rules language.
Layered label propagation: a multiresolution coordinate-free ordering for compressing social networks.
IBM's jazz integration architecture: building a tools integration architecture and community inspired by the web.
Partitioned multi-indexing: bringing order to social search.
WS7 - MobEA VI: personal rich social media.
Mind the data skew: distributed inferencing by speeddating in elastic regions.
Predicting click through rate for job listings.
SPARQ2L: towards support for subgraph extraction queries in rdf databases.
A content-driven reputation system for the wikipedia.
U-REST: an unsupervised record extraction system.
The K-clique Densest Subgraph Problem.
Ontology summarization based on rdf sentence graph.
Efficient query subscription processing for prospective search engines.
Semantic email.
Distributing private data in challenged network environments.
Path Sampling: A Fast and Provable Method for Estimating 4-Vertex Subgraph Counts.
A graph-theoretic approach to webpage segmentation.
Voting with Their Feet: Inferring User Preferences from App Management Activities.
Determining user interests about museum collections.
Social Networks Under Stress.
The webgraph framework I: compression techniques.
Low-load server crawler: design and evaluation.
Building and managing personalized semantic portals.
A flight meta-search engine with metamorph.
Why web 2.0 is good for learning and for research: principles and prototypes.
Mashups for semantic user profiles.
Crawling multiple UDDI business registries.
Liquid query: multi-domain exploratory search on the web.
Quality driven web services composition.
WebViews: accessing personalized web content and services.
Not so creepy crawler: easy crawler generation with standard xml queries.
An efficient random access inverted index for information retrieval.
Template-based question answering over RDF data.
Automatic Extraction of Indicators of Compromise for Web Applications.
Subspace: secure cross-domain communication for web mashups.
Mining photo-sharing websites to study ecological phenomena.
Automated detection of session fixation vulnerabilities.
DSNotify: handling broken links in the web of data.
Extending WebML towards semantic web.
Are web users really Markovian?
Online auctions efficiency: a survey of ebay auctions.
Augmenting semantic web service descriptions with compositional specification.
The E-Commerce Market for "Lemons": Identification and Analysis of Websites Selling Counterfeit Goods.
An Empirical Study of Web Cookies.
Lock-free consistency control for web 2.0 applications.
The paths more taken: matching DOM trees to search logs for accurate webpage clustering.
Query topic detection for reformulation.
A trust management framework for service-oriented environments.
Scaling link-based similarity search.
Building a distributed full-text index for the Web.
Reliability analysis using weighted combinational models for web-based software.
A link-based ranking scheme for focused search.
Search result diversity for informational queries.
Towards the policy-aware web: the real web 3.0?
Why are moved web pages difficult to find?: the WISH approach.
SHOCK: communicating with computational messages and automatic private profiles.
Privacy diffusion on the web: a longitudinal perspective.
The Web as a Jungle: Non-Linear Dynamical Systems for Co-evolving Online Activities.
From Freebase to Wikidata: The Great Migration.
Flash crowds and denial of service attacks: characterization and implications for CDNs and web sites.
Image annotation using search and mining technologies.
Buy-it-now or take-a-chance: a simple sequential screening mechanism.
Executing incoherency bounded continuous queries at web data aggregators.
A generalized framework of exploring category information for question retrieval in community question answer archives.
Toward expressive syndication on the web.
Research trails: getting back where you left off.
Towards DSL-based web engineering.
Evaluation of edge caching/offloading for dynamic content delivery.
A multi-threaded PIPELINED Web server architecture for SMP/SoC machines.
Hierarchical cluster visualization in web mapping systems.
Incremental maintenance for materialized XPath/XSLT views.
Optimal marketing and pricing over social networks.
Semantic similarity based on compact concept ontology.
A geographical analysis of knowledge production in computer science.
Structured audio podcasts via web text-to-speech system.
Using a model of social dynamics to predict popularity of news.
Tag ranking.
Value-driven design for "infosuasive" web applications.
eduKEN: a tool for fine-grained video comment collection and analysis.
Using proportional transportation similarity with learned element semantics for XML document clustering.
Entity Disambiguation with Linkless Knowledge Bases.
Optimizing Display Advertising in Online Social Networks.
LINDEN: linking named entities with knowledge base via semantic knowledge.
A Multi-View Deep Learning Approach for Cross Domain User Modeling in Recommendation Systems.
DOHA: scalable real-time web applications through adaptive concurrent execution.
Evaluating similarity measures for emergent semantics of social tagging.
Probabilistic models for discovering e-communities.
An axiomatic approach for result diversification.
The classroom sentinel: supporting data-driven decision-making in the classroom.
Improving personalized services in mobile commerce by a novel multicriteria rating approach.
Evaluating structural summaries as access methods for XML.
Using d-gap patterns for index compression.
Improving Paid Microtasks through Gamification and Adaptive Furtherance Incentives.
Algorithmic detection of semantic similarity.
Scalable techniques for memory-efficient CDN simulations.
2lip: the step towards the web3d.
The discoverability of the web.
Towards second and third generation web-based multimedia.
Psst: a web-based system for tracking political statements.
Protecting browser state from web privacy attacks.
Towards a scalable search and query engine for the web.
Ranking user-created contents by search user's inclination in online communities.
An expressive mechanism for auctions on the web.
Crowdsourcing with endogenous entry.
Ad-hoc object retrieval in the web of data.
Using web browser interactions to predict task.
Sync kit: a persistent client-side database caching toolkit for data intensive websites.
A distributed framework for reliable and efficient service choreographies.
An adaptive crawler for locating hiddenwebentry points.
On a service-oriented approach for an engineering knowledge desktop.
A comparison of implicit and explicit links for web page classification.
Heterogeneous web data search using relevance-based on the fly data integration.
WWW 2008 workshop: NLPIX2008 summary.
Protecting data in multi-stakeholder web service system.
Fine grained content-based adaptation mechanism for providing high end-user quality of experience with adaptive hypermedia systems.
Understanding user goals in web search.
Deriving wishlists from blogs show us your blog, and we'll tell you what books to buy.
IEPAD: information extraction based on pattern discovery.
pTHINC: a thin-client architecture for mobile wireless web.
The Effect of Recommendations on Network Structure.
Exception handling in workflow-driven Web applications.
Learning to tag.
Monitoring the dynamic web to respond to continuous queries.
Examining the content and privacy of web browsing incidental information.
Rank aggregation methods for the Web.
RankCompete: simultaneous ranking and clustering of web photos.
DOM-based content extraction of HTML documents.
Relational duality: unsupervised extraction of semantic relations between entities on the web.
Query-driven indexing for peer-to-peer text retrieval.
Social and semantics analysis via non-negative matrix factorization.
Sampling high-quality clicks from noisy click data.
Bid optimization for broad match ad auctions.
The Dynamics of Micro-Task Crowdsourcing: The Case of Amazon MTurk.
Mining related queries from search engine query logs.
A habit mining approach for discovering similar mobile users.
Inverted index compression via online document routing.
Rated aspect summarization of short comments.
Bayesian Budget Feasibility with Posted Pricing.
Abstracting application-level web security.
Comparing link marker visualization techniques: changes in reading behavior.
Just the right amount: extracting modules from ontologies.
SNDocRank: document ranking based on social networks.
Prophiler: a fast filter for the large-scale detection of malicious web pages.
How far can client-only solutions go for mobile browser speed?
Characterizing Long-tail SEO Spam on Cloud Web Hosting Services.
Exploring Patterns of Identity Usage in Tweets: A New Problem, Solution and Case Study.
Using Hierarchical Skills for Optimized Task Assignment in Knowledge-Intensive Crowdsourcing.
QUOTUS: The Structure of Political Media Coverage as Revealed by Quoting Patterns.
Session level techniques for improving web browsing performance on wireless links.
An efficient two-phase service discovery mechanism.
A large-scale study of web password habits.
MedSearch: a specialized search engine for medical information.
Mining clickthrough data for collaborative web search.
Selecting skyline services for QoS-based web service composition.
A graphical user interface toolkit approach to thin-client computing.
Accurate, scalable in-network identification of p2p traffic using application signatures.
Online learning from click data for sponsored search.
Trust-based recommendation systems: an axiomatic approach.
Improving pseudo-relevance feedback in web information retrieval using web page segmentation.
Web graph similarity for anomaly detection (poster).
Shared lexicon for distributed annotations on the Web.
Optimizing web search using social annotations.
Exploiting semantic web technologies to model web form interactions.
Exploiting query reformulations for web search result diversification.
Invisible participants: how cultural capital relates to lurking behavior.
To join or not to join: the illusion of privacy in social networks with mixed public and private user profiles.
Providing session management as core business service.
Living the TV revolution: unite MHP to the web or face IDTV irrelevance!
What's up CAPTCHA?: a CAPTCHA based on image orientation.
Predicting clicks: estimating the click-through rate for new ads.
A framework for fast community extraction of large-scale networks.
Spatial variation in search engine queries.
The Death and Life of Great Italian Cities: A Mobile Phone Data Perspective.
A framework for trust establishment and assessment on the web of data.
Which "Apple" are you talking about ?
Utility-driven load shedding for xml stream processing.
Recommendations in Signed Social Networks.
Probabilistic question answering on the web.
Automatically filling form-based web interfaces with free text inputs.
Anycast CDNS revisited.
Generation, documentation and presentation of mathematical equations and symbolic scientific expressions using pure HTML and CSS.
Schemapath, a minimal extension to xml schema for conditional constraints.
A client-server architecture for state-dependent dynamic visualizations on the web.
Location and the web (LocWeb 2008).
Web-assisted annotation, semantic indexing and search of television and radio news.
Donor Retention in Online Crowdfunding Communities: A Case Study of DonorsChoose.org.
Automatic web service composition with abstraction and refinement.
Mark my words!: linguistic style accommodation in social media.
A comparison of visual and textual page previews in judging the helpfulness of web pages.
Like like alike: joint friendship and interest propagation in social networks.
Co-optimization of multiple relevance metrics in web search.
Statistical models of music-listening sessions in social media.
Turkalytics: analytics for human computation.
RESTful web services: principles, patterns, emerging technologies.
An event-condition-action language for XML.
AutoTag: a collaborative approach to automated tag assignment for weblog posts.
A mobile application framework for the geospatial web.
Mean Field Equilibria for Competitive Exploration in Resource Sharing Settings.
Semantic Wikipedia.
An evaluation of binary XML encoding optimizations for fast stream based xml processing.
Automated synthesis of composite services with correctness guarantee.
Growing Wikipedia Across Languages via Recommendation.
Information retrieval and knowledge discovery on the semantic web of traditional chinese medicine.
Non-intrusive monitoring and service adaptation for WS-BPEL.
Parallel crawling for online social networks.
How opinions are received by online communities: a case study on amazon.com helpfulness votes.
Sig.ma: live views on the web of data.
Tracking the random surfer: empirically measured teleportation parameters in PageRank.
Efficient k-nearest neighbor graph construction for generic similarity measures.
Signaling emotion in tagclouds.
Supporting online problem-solving communities with the semantic web.
Profiles for the situated web.
R-U-in?: doing what you like, with people whom you like.
New objective functions for social collaborative filtering.
Towards effective browsing of large scale social annotations.
Investigation of partial query proximity in web search.
Web video topic discovery and tracking via bipartite graph reinforcement model.
On anonymizing query logs via token-based hashing.
Entity relation discovery from web tables and links.
Mining collective intelligence in diverse groups.
Reactive crowdsourcing.
Steering user behavior with badges.
An analysis of socware cascades in online social networks.
On the evolution of the internet economic ecosystem.
Dynamics of bid optimization in online advertisement auctions.
N-gram IDF: A Global Term Weighting Scheme Based on Information Distance.
Semantic web support for the business-to-business e-commerce lifecycle.
Exploring Limits to Prediction in Complex Social Systems.
Video suggestion and discovery for youtube: taking random walks through the view graph.
Extraction and search of chemical formulae in text documents on the web.
Learning ontologies to improve the quality of automatic web service matching.
Beyond XML and RDF: The Versatile Web Query Language Xcerpt.
XML-based multimodal interaction framework for contact center applications.
Equip tourists with knowledge mined from travelogues.
Relationship between web links and trade.
Histrace: building a search engine of historical events.
Ranking refinement and its application to information retrieval.
Dynamics of bidding in a P2P lending service: effects of herding and predicting loan success.
A metro map metaphor for guided tours on the Web: the Webvise guided tour system.
Truthful incentives in crowdsourcing tasks using regret minimization mechanisms.
Uncovering locally characterizing regions within geotagged data.
How google analytics and conventional cookie tracking techniques overestimate unique visitors.
Detecting the origin of text segments efficiently.
Beyond Models: Forecasting Complex Network Processes Directly from Data.
SRing: a structured non dht p2p overlay supporting string range queries.
Replacing the Irreplaceable: Fast Algorithms for Team Member Recommendation.
A Practical Framework for Privacy-Preserving Data Analytics.
As Time Goes By: Comprehensive Tagging of Textual Phrases with Temporal Scopes.
A First Look at Tribal Web Traffic.
Content extraction signatures using XML digital signatures and custom transforms on-demand.
Automatic online news issue construction in web environment.
The role of social networks in information diffusion.
Web accessibility: a broader view.
The HP time vault service: exploiting IBE for timed release of confidential information.
Learning joint query interpretation and response ranking.
Understanding and decreasing the network footprint of catch-up tv.
Sparse online topic models.
Imagen: runtime migration of browser sessions for javascript web applications.
Rethinking the web as a personal archive.
Predicting positive and negative links in signed social networks by transfer learning.
Anatomy of a web-scale resale market: a data mining approach.
Towards realistic team formation in social networks based on densest subgraphs.
Unsupervised sentiment analysis with emotional signals.
Organizational overlap on social networks and its applications.
PrefixSolve: efficiently solving multi-source multi-destination path queries on RDF graphs by sharing suffix computations.
Questions about questions: an empirical analysis of information needs on Twitter.
Predicting purchase behaviors from social media.
Saving, reusing, and remixing web video: using attitudes and practices to reveal social norms.
Perception and understanding of social annotations in web search.
SoCo: a social network aided context-aware recommender system.
Cascading tree sheets and recombinant HTML: better encapsulation and retargeting of web content.
Measurement and modeling of eye-mouse behavior in the presence of nonlinear page layouts.
Iolaus: securing online content rating systems.
Real-time recommendation of diverse related articles.
Your browsing behavior for a big mac: economics of personal information online.
Answering approximate queries over autonomous web databases.
Thumbs-up: a game for playing to rank search results.
System for spatio-temporal analysis of online news and blogs.
Fine-grained, structured configuration management for web projects.
Semantic Annotaion of Mobility Data using Social Media.
Web ontology segmentation: analysis, classification and use.
Deducing trip related information from flickr.
Live URLs: breathing life into URLs.
Influencers and their barriers to technology.
Demographics, weather and online reviews: a study of restaurant recommendations.
What makes a good biography?: multidimensional quality analysis based on wikipedia article feedback data.
High quality, scalable and parallel community detection for large real graphs.
Joint question clustering and relevance prediction for open domain non-factoid question answering.
Stranger danger: exploring the ecosystem of ad-based URL shortening services.
Recommending investors for crowdfunding projects.
Composite retrieval of heterogeneous web search.
Generating hypotheses from the web.
Altering document term vectors for classification: ontologies as expectations of co-occurrence.
Topic segmentation of message hierarchies for indexing and navigation support.
Towards efficient dominant relationship exploration of the product items on the web.
Semantic stability in social tagging streams.
To gather together for a better world: understanding and leveraging communities in micro-lending recommendation.
A Monte Carlo algorithm for cold start recommendation.
A time-based collective factorization for topic discovery and monitoring in news.
Pragmatic evaluation of folksonomies.
Combining global optimization with local selection for efficient QoS-aware service composition.
A comparative analysis of web and peer-to-peer traffic.
Sliding window technique for the web log analysis.
Factorizing YAGO: scalable machine learning for linked data.
Remindin': semantic query routing in peer-to-peer networks based on social metaphors.
Facetedpedia: dynamic generation of query-dependent faceted interfaces for wikipedia.
Review recommendation with graphical model and EM algorithm.
Distributed graph pattern matching.
Towards the self-annotating web.
An effective semantic search technique using ontology.
Optimizing scoring functions and indexes for proximity search in type-annotated corpora.
Atomate it! end-user context-sensitive automation using heterogeneous information sources on the web.
Retaining personal expression for social search.
Behavioral classification on the click graph.
Compoweb: a component-oriented web architecture.
Linking content in unstructured sources.
The social contract core.
SourceRank: relevance and trust assessment for deep web sources based on inter-source agreement.
Stop thinking, start tagging: tag semantics emerge from collaborative verbosity.
Symmetrically exploiting XML.
Scholarly publishing and argument in hyperspace.
Selectivity estimation for SPARQL graph pattern.
Cm-pmi: improved web-based association measure with contextual label matching.
Parsing owl dl: trees or triples?
Information "uptrieval": exploring models for content assimilation and aggregation for developing regions.
A component model for stardardized web-based education.
Generating query substitutions.
Estimating the impressionrank of web pages.
Automated performance assessment for service-oriented middleware: a case study on BPEL engines.
EOS: expertise oriented search using social networks.
Targeting converters for new campaigns through factor models.
Remedying Web Hijacking: Notification Effectiveness and Webmaster Comprehension.
Predicting Pre-click Quality for Native Advertisements.
Efficient Densest Subgraph Computation in Evolving Graphs.
Online curriculum on the semantic Web: the CSD-UoC portal for peer-to-peer e-learning.
An Empirical Analysis of Algorithmic Pricing on Amazon Marketplace.
Do not crawl in the dust: different urls with similar text.
Structure-aware music resizing using lyrics.
A unified ontology-based web page model for improving accessibility.
Threshold selection for web-page classification with highly skewed class distribution.
Application specific data replication for edge services.
Finding visual concepts by web image mining.
A user profile-based approach for personal information access: shaping your information portfolio.
Web content accessibility guidelines: from 1.0 to 2.0.
Surviving a search engine overload.
Do Cascades Recur?
Improving User Topic Interest Profiles by Behavior Factorization.
Web data extraction based on partial tree alignment.
Knowing the user's every move: user activity tracking for website usability evaluation and implicit interaction.
Geographic locations of web servers.
Merging trees: file system and content integration.
Translating XSLT programs to Efficient SQL queries.
Hybrid keyword search auctions.
Hierarchical Neural Language Models for Joint Representation of Streaming Documents and their Content.
Random Walk TripleRush: Asynchronous Graph Querying and Sampling.
Bringing CUPID Indoor Positioning System to Practice.
Personalized recommendation on dynamic content using predictive bilinear models.
Monitoring algorithms for negative feedback systems.
N for the price of 1: bundling web objects for more efficient content delivery.
Finding hierarchy in directed online social networks.
Structural analysis of the emerging event-web.
What you see is what you search: adaptive visual search framework for the web.
Position paper: towards the notion of gloss, and the adoption of linguistic resources in formal ontology engineering.
A P2P based distributed services network for next generation mobile internet communications.
Enabling WebGL.
On incremental maintenance of 2-hop labeling of graphs.
LCA-based selection for XML document collections.
Propagation of trust and distrust.
A constraint extension to scalable vector graphics.
Oyster: sharing and re-using ontologies in a peer-to-peer community.
Musubi: disintermediated interactive social feeds for mobile devices.
MyXDNS: a resquest routing dns server with decoupled server selection.
International workshop on question answering on the web (QAWeb2008).
Information transfer in social media.
A Study of Retrieval Models for Long Documents and Queries in Information Retrieval.
Personalized view-based search and visualization as a means for deep/semantic web data access.
Cascading style sheets: a novel approach towards productive styling with today's standards.
Scalable techniques for document identifier assignment ininverted indexes.
Contextual advertising by combining relevance with click feedback.
PCT: Partial Co-Alignment of Social Networks.
Learning to model relatedness for news recommendation.
OWL FA: a metamodeling extension of OWL D.
Scaling RDF with time.
A Scalable Asynchronous Distributed Algorithm for Topic Modeling.
Link fusion: a unified link analysis framework for multi-type interrelated data objects.
Turning portlets into services: the consumer profile.
Generation of multimedia TV news contents for WWW.
A unified framework for name disambiguation.
A lightweight protocol for the generation and distribution of secure e-coupons.
Dtwiki: a disconnection and intermittency tolerant wiki.
Generalized link suggestions via web site clustering.
Cookies That Give You Away: The Surveillance Implications of Web Tracking.
A case for query by image and text content: searching computer help using screenshots and keywords.
Trust-serv: model-driven lifecycle management of trust negotiation policies for web services.
Finding the bias and prestige of nodes in networks based on trust scores.
Large-scale bot detection for search engines.
Cataclysm: policing extreme overloads in internet applications.
On the Relevance of Irrelevant Alternatives.
Characterizing insecure javascript practices on the web.
Video search: are algorithms all we need?
Exhibit: lightweight structured data publishing.
Keyword search over key-value stores.
What's new on the web?: the evolution of the web from a search engine perspective.
Searching for events in the blogosphere.
Expressive auctions for externalities in online advertising.
SemTag and seeker: bootstrapping the semantic web via automated semantic annotation.
Daily-Aware Personalized Recommendation based on Feature-Level Time Series Analysis.
Modeling online reviews with multi-grain topic models.
Efficient similarity joins for near duplicate detection.
Search engine retrieval of changing information.
Intelligent crawling on the World Wide Web with arbitrary predicates.
Collaborative Ranking with a Push at the Top.
b-Bit minwise hashing.
An enhanced model for searching in semantic portals.
Engineering and hosting adaptive freshness-sensitive web applications on data centers.
Integrating semantic web and language technologies to improve the online public administrations services.
Document recommendation in social tagging services.
Human wayfinding in information networks.
Automatic extraction of clickable structured web contents for name entity queries.
Visibly pushdown automata for streaming XML.
Generating efficient labels to facilitate web accessibility.
Mobile streaming media CDN enabled by dynamic SMIL.
Tweet Properly: Analyzing Deleted Tweets to Understand and Identify Regrettable Ones.
Vertex collocation profiles: subgraph counting for link analysis and prediction.
Dynamic maintenance of web indexes using landmarks.
Anonymizing user profiles for personalized web search.
Study language models with specific user goals.
Estimating the cardinality of RDF graph patterns.
Matrix "Bit" loaded: a scalable lightweight join query processor for RDF data.
Strategic formation of credit networks.
Design for verification for asynchronously communicating Web services.
Online spelling correction for query completion.
Behavior based web page evaluation.
How to make a semantic web browser.
Rare item detection in e-commerce site.
The QWERTY Effect on the Web: How Typing Shapes the Meaning of Words in Online Human-Computer Interaction.
Mining advertiser-specific user behavior using adfactors.
All Who Wander: On the Prevalence and Characteristics of Multi-community Engagement.
On the informativeness of cascade and intent-aware effectiveness measures.
A no-frills architecture for lightweight answer retrieval.
Sampling community structure.
Modeling User Consumption Sequences.
Design, implementation, and evaluation of a client characterization driven web server.
Social group suggestion from user image collections.
Crosslanguage blog mining and trend visualisation.
Learning and inferencing in user ontology for personalized semantic web services.
SPath: a path language for XML schema.
Practical semantic analysis of web sites and documents.
Web object retrieval.
Towards service pool based approach for services discovery and subscription.
Named graphs, provenance and trust.
Weakly Supervised Extraction of Computer Security Events from Twitter.
Dynamic cost-per-action mechanisms and applications to online advertising.
SessionJuggler: secure web login from an untrusted terminal using session hijacking.
Text joins in an RDBMS for web data integration.
A Weighted Correlation Index for Rankings with Ties.
Relaxed: on the way towards true validation of compound documents.
User Session Identification Based on Strong Regularities in Inter-activity Time.
AwareDAV: a generic WebDAV notification framework and implementation.
Detecting Good Abandonment in Mobile Search.
Expressiveness of XSDs: from practice to theory, there and back again.
Adaptive push-pull: disseminating dynamic web data.
Building adaptable and reusable XML applications with model transformations.
Efficient edge-services for colorblind users.
Characterizing search intent diversity into click models.
A contextual-bandit approach to personalized news article recommendation.
Dataplorer: a scalable search engine for the data web.
A clustering method for web data with multi-type interrelated components.
Hierarchical, perceptron-like learning for ontology-based information extraction.
Action science approach to nonprofit housing services using web 2.0 mapping tools.
Liveclassifier: creating hierarchical text classifiers through web corpora.
Towards robust service compositions in the context of functionally diverse services.
A unified approach to learning task-specific bit vector representations for fast nearest neighbor search.
Adaptive record extraction from web pages.
Improving recommendation for long-tail queries via templates.
Behavior-based web page evaluation.
Clustering query refinements by user intent.
Reverse Engineering SPARQL Queries.
Deriving knowledge from figures for digital libraries.
Efficient evaluation of generalized path pattern queries on XML data.
Matchbox: large scale online bayesian recommendations.
Compressed Indexes for String Searching in Labeled Graphs.
Value-based web caching.
A smart hill-climbing algorithm for application server configuration.
Finding the Hierarchy of Dense Subgraphs using Nucleus Decompositions.
Socialized Language Model Smoothing via Bi-directional Influence Propagation on Social Networks.
On the high density of leadership nuclei in endorsement social networks.
Finding core members in virtual communities.
Making BPEL flexible: adapting in the context of coordination constraints using WS-BPEL.
Measuring Urban Social Diversity Using Interconnected Geo-Social Networks.
Practical end-to-end web content integrity.
Multi-factor clustering for a marketplace search interface.
Rethinking email message and people search.
Context-oriented web video tag recommendation.
Do you want to take notes?: identifying research missions in Yahoo! search pad.
Integrating value-based requirement engineering models to webml using vip business modeling framework.
Robust Group Linkage.
Statistical analysis of the social network and discussion threads in slashdot.
Defeating script injection attacks with browser-enforced embedded policies.
Designing the web for an open society.
E-commerce Reputation Manipulation: The Emergence of Reputation-Escalation-as-a-Service.
Supporting end-users in the creation of dependable web clips.
GIO: a semantic web application using the information grid framework.
SourceRank: relevance and trust assessment for deep web sources based on inter-source agreement.
Foundations for service ontologies: aligning OWL-S to dolce.
Context-orientated news riltering for web 2.0 and beyond.
Adaptive web sites: user studies and simulation.
Using web structure for classifying and describing web pages.
Recommendations to boost content spread in social networks.
Automatic detection of fragments in dynamically generated web pages.
Information search and re-access strategies of experienced web users.
Evaluating new search engine configurations with pre-existing judgments and clicks.
Playful tagging: folksonomy generation using online games.
A Novelty-Seeking based Dining Recommender System.
Determining the user intent of web search engine queries.
The SOWES approach to P2P web search using semantic overlays.
Static query result caching revisited.
Requirements for multimedia document enrichment.
LINE: Large-scale Information Network Embedding.
Long distance wireless mesh network planning: problem formulation and solution.
Discovering users' specific geo intention in web search.
The Yin/Yang web: XML syntax and RDF semantics.
The recurrence dynamics of social tagging.
On the bursty evolution of blogspace.
Incorporating site-level knowledge to extract structured data from web forums.
Fast dynamic reranking in large graphs.
The anatomy of a large-scale social search engine.
Energy and Performance of Smartphone Radio Bundling in Outdoor Environments.
Network A/B Testing: From Sampling to Estimation.
Milgram-routing in social networks.
Large-scale text categorization by batch mode active learning.
Risk-aware revenue maximization in display advertising.
Communication design for electronic negotiations on the basis of XML schema.
Web taxonomy integration using support vector machines.
Optimal marketing strategies over social networks.
Detecting nepotistic links by language model disagreement.
Follow me': a web-based, location-sharing architecture for large, indoor environments.
Efficiently querying rdf data in triple stores.
Tagommenders: connecting users to items through tags.
New-web search with microblog annotations.
Connecting the "bottom of the pyramid": an exploratory case study of india's rural communication environment.
Measurement and Analysis of Mobile Web Cache Performance.
A method for transparent admission control and request scheduling in e-commerce web sites.
A word at a time: computing word relatedness using temporal semantic analysis.
On labeling schemes for the semantic web.
Care to comment?: recommendations for commenting on news stories.
Scheduling Human Intelligence Tasks in Multi-Tenant Crowd-Powered Systems.
How NAGA uncoils: searching with entities and relations.
Deriving an Emergent Relational Schema from RDF Data.
Rapid prototyping of semantic mash-ups through semantic web pipes.
ourSpaces: linking provenance and social data in a virtual research environment.
Life is sharable: mechanisms to support and sustain blogging life experience.
Investigating web services on the world wide web.
Evaluating strategies for similarity search on the web.
Web-scale classification with naive bayes.
Query-sets: using implicit feedback and query patterns to organize web documents.
Position paper: ontology construction from online ontologies.
XPath filename expansion in a Unix shell.
Exploiting Dining Preference for Restaurant Recommendation.
Using control theory for stable and efficient recommender systems.
Semantic link based top-K join queries in P2P networks.
FeedEx: collaborative exchange of news feeds.
Geographical topic discovery and comparison.
EPCI: extracting potentially copyright infringement texts from the web.
Targeted disambiguation of ad-hoc, homogeneous sets of named entities.
Using graphics processors for high-performance IR query processing.
Visual structure-based web page clustering and retrieval.
Detecting epidemic tendency by mining search logs.
Sensor-enhanced mobile web clients: an XForms approach.
Query clustering using click-through graph.
Classifying web sites.
Measurement-calibrated graph models for social network experiments.
Exploiting web search to generate synonyms for entities.
Navigationaided retrieval.
It's simply integral to what I do: enquiries into how the web is weaved into everyday life.
Learning-to-Rank for Real-Time High-Precision Hashtag Recommendation for Streaming News.
Diversifying web search results.
Hearsay: enabling audio browsing on hypertext content.
Meteor-s web service annotation framework.
Finding advertising keywords on web pages.
Extensible schema documentation with XSLT 2.0.
Using stranger as sensors: temporal and geo-sensitive question answering via social media.
Efficient community detection in large networks using content and links.
CopyCatch: stopping group attacks by spotting lockstep behavior in social networks.
Estimating clustering coefficients and size of social networks via random walk.
A framework for benchmarking entity-annotation systems.
On participation in group chats on Twitter.
Gender swapping and user behaviors in online social games.
Learning to extract cross-session search tasks.
Skolemising Blank Nodes while Preserving Isomorphism.
Static approximation of dynamically generated Web pages.
TrustGuard: countering vulnerabilities in reputation management for decentralized overlay networks.
Secrets, Lies, and Account Recovery: Lessons from the Use of Personal Knowledge Questions at Google.
Learning multiple graphs for document recommendations.
I know the shortened URLs you clicked on Twitter: inference attack using public click analytics and Twitter metadata.
Understanding latency variations of black box services.
What is the added value of negative links in online social networks?
Secure or insure?: a game-theoretic analysis of information security games.
Exploiting content redundancy for web information extraction.
Extraction and classification of dense communities in the web.
Opinion observer: analyzing and comparing opinions on the Web.
Latent space domain transfer between high dimensional overlapping distributions.
Simulation, verification and automated composition of web services.
Integrating the IAC neural network in ontology mapping.
Keysurf: a character controlled browser for people with physical disabilities.
Latent credibility analysis.
Multi-label learning with millions of labels: recommending advertiser bid phrases for web pages.
Localized matrix factorization for recommendation based on matrix block diagonal forms.
Mining acronym expansions and their meanings using query click log.
Crowdsourced judgement elicitation with endogenous proficiency.
Predicting advertiser bidding behaviors in sponsored search by rationality modeling.
Measuring personalization of web search.
A model for green design of online news media services.
Strategyproof mechanisms for competitive influence in networks.
The anatomy of LDNS clusters: findings and implications for web content delivery.
Whom to mention: expand the diffusion of tweets by @ recommendation on micro-blogging systems.
Know your personalization: learning topic level personalization in online services.
Optimal hashing schemes for entity matching.
Mining structural hole spanners through information diffusion in social networks.
Sorry, i don't speak SPARQL: translating SPARQL queries into natural language.
Space-efficient data structures for Top-
Attributing authorship of revisioned content.
Inferring the demographics of search users: social data meets search queries.
WTF: the who to follow service at Twitter.
Exploiting annotations for the rapid development of collaborative web applications.
Pricing mechanisms for crowdsourcing markets.
From amateurs to connoisseurs: modeling the evolution of user expertise through online reviews.
Layman tuning of websites: facing change resilience.
Mirror site maintenance based on evolution associations of web directories.
Large scale integration of senses for the semantic web.
A framework for XML data streams history checking and monitoring.
Disambiguating Web appearances of people in a social network.
Hearsay: a new generation context-driven multi-modal assistive web browser.
Actions speak as loud as words: predicting relationships from social behavior data.
Automated object persistence for JavaScript.
eBag: a ubiquitous Web infrastructure for nomadic learning.
Choosing reputable servents in a P2P network.
A framework for coordinated multi-modal browsing with multiple clients.
How to influence my customers?: the impact of electronic market design.
A semantic layer for publishing and localizing xml data for a p2p xquery mediator.
Learning domain ontologies for Web service descriptions: an experiment in bioinformatics.
Peer-to-peer architecture for content-based music retrieval on acoustic data.
WebQuilt: a framework for capturing and visualizing the web experience.
Multi-objective ranking of comments on web.
News article extraction with template-independent wrapper.
SGSDesigner: a graphical interface for annotating and designing semantic grid services.
Using static analysis for Ajax intrusion detection.
Effective Web data extraction with standard XML technologies.
Extracting news-related queries from web query log.
Max-cover in map-reduce.
Information integration over time in unreliable and uncertain environments.
Shilling recommender systems for fun and profit.
Identifying and discriminating between web and peer-to-peer traffic in the network core.
Learning deterministic regular expressions for the inference of schemas from XML data.
Towards a global schema for web entities.
Efficient mining of frequent sequence generators.
Pagerank for product image search.
A class-feature-centroid classifier for text categorization.
Quicklink selection for navigational query results.
Semantic similarity between search engine queries using temporal correlation.
Personalized tag suggestion for flickr.
Personalization and accessibility: integration of library and web approaches.
Modeling a Retweet Network via an Adaptive Bayesian Approach.
Semantic search.
Adaptive on-line page importance computation.
Web page scoring systems for horizontal and vertical search.
A probabilistic semantic approach for discovering web services.
Online modeling of proactive moderation system for auction fraud detection.
Tables and trees don't mix (very well).
Mining, indexing, and searching for textual chemical molecule information on the web.
Learning to detect phishing emails.
Incremental web page template detection.
Implementing the media fragments URI specification.
Serf and turf: crowdturfing for fun and profit.
Report on semantic web for health care and life sciences workshop.
Ups and Downs: Modeling the Visual Evolution of Fashion Trends with One-Class Collaborative Filtering.
ZenCrowd: leveraging probabilistic reasoning and crowdsourcing techniques for large-scale entity linking.
Querying Web-Scale Information Networks Through Bounding Matching Scores.
Automatic identification of user interest for personalized search.
Designing efficient sampling techniques to detect webpage updates.
A combined approach to checking web ontologies.
Social search in "Small-World" experiments.
Speeding up adaptation of web service compositions using expiration times.
Searching the workplace web.
The Social World of Content Abusers in Community Question Answering.
Using CEP technology to adapt messages exchanged by web services.
EDUTELLA: a P2P networking infrastructure based on RDF.
EP-SPARQL: a unified language for event processing and stream reasoning.
Here, there, and everywhere: correlated online behaviors can lead to overestimates of the effects of advertising.
Topic modeling with network regularization.
Extracting data records from the web using tag path clustering.
Managing versions of web documents in a transaction-time web server.
A large-scale active learning system for topical categorization on the web.
G-ToPSS: fast filtering of graph-based metadata.
Proposal of integrated search engine of web and TV contents.
Xml data dissemination using automata on top of structured overlay networks.
The XML web: a first study.
The complex dynamics of collaborative tagging.
Towards extracting flickr tag semantics.
Securely implementing open geospatial consortium web service interface standards in oracle spatial.
Interactive wrapper generation with minimal user effort.
Visitor awareness in the web.
Securing web application code by static analysis and runtime protection.
Finding specification pages according to attributes.
Social search and discovery using a unified approach.
Dissemination of heterogeneous xml data.
User oriented link function classification.
Counting beyond a Yottabyte, or how SPARQL 1.1 property paths will prevent adoption of the standard.
On Sampling Nodes in a Network.
Characterization of a large web site population with implications for content delivery.
Unsupervised extraction of template structure in web search queries.
Winner takes all: competing viruses or ideas on fair-play networks.
Rogue access point detection using segmental TCP jitter.
A flexible learning system for wrapping tables and lists in HTML documents.
Unsupervised query categorization using automatically-built concept graphs.
An audio/video analysis mechanism for web indexing.
A comparative web browser (CWB) for browsing and comparing web pages.
Authentication Melee: A Usability Analysis of Seven Web Authentication Systems.
Gamesense.
Expert agreement and content based reranking in a meta search environment using Mearf.
Tag clouds for summarizing web search results.
Archiving web site resources: a records management view.
Mapping-driven XML transformation.
Clustering for opportunistic communication.
Pusic: musicalize microblog messages for summarization and exploration.
Matching independent global constraints for composite web services.
Ajax for mobility: mobileweaver ajax framework.
A management and performance framework for semantic web servers.
A domain-specific language for the model-driven construction of advanced web-based dialogs.
A practical system for harvesting and monitoring hot topics on the web.
Featuring web communities based on word co-occurrence structure of communications: 736.
Adding semantics to rosettaNet specifications.
The two cultures: mashing up web 2.0 and the semantic web.
LiteMinutes: an Internet-based system for multimedia meeting minutes.
Optimizing two stage bigram language models for IR.
Network analysis of collaboration structure in Wikipedia.
Can cascades be predicted?
XVCL: XML-based Variant Configuration Language.
Graph-based analysis and prediction for software evolution.
xMapper: An architecture-implementation mapping tool.

Reuse of Off-the-Shelf Components in C2-Style Architectures.
Refactoring Java programs for flexible locking.
Light-weight context recovery for efficient and accurate program analyses.
Artificial Intelligence and Software Engineering.
Unifying execution of imperative and declarative code.
SCORE 2011: the second student contest on software engineering.
The impact of test suite granularity on the cost-effectiveness of regression testing.
Redesigning the Systems Development Process.
A formal approach for designing CORBA based applications.
The Structure and Characteristics of Distributed Systems.
Modeling Software Tools with Icon.
Continous Execution: The VisiProg Environment.
Lessons of Current Environments.
Software Engineering Data Analysis Techniques (Tutorial).
Component composition (poster).
Essential Elements of Software Engineering Education.
CodeTopics: which topic am I coding now?
Concepts and Implementation of a Rule-Based Process Engine.
Early Experiences with Euclid.
A software process for time-constrained course projects.
Re-estimation of Software Reliability After Maintenance.
1.x-Way architecture-implementation mapping.
The Impact of Mesa on System Design.
Modular checking for buffer overflows in the large.
A culture-centered multilevel software process cycle model (poster).
The hidden experts in software-engineering communication.
Using peer reviews in teaching framework development.
An Early Report on Encompass.
Deploying CogTool: integrating quantitative usability assessment into real-world software development.
Introduction to the Wellmade Design Methodology.
Model projection: simplifying models in response to restricting the environment.
Capturing tacit architectural knowledge using the repertory grid technique.
Perturbation analysis of stochastic systems with empirical distribution parameters.
Software Interconnection Models.
Specification-based Testing of Reactive Software: Tools and Experiments (Experience Report).
Module Structure in an Evolving Family of Real Time Systems.
A Tour Through Cedar.
A Validation of Software Metrics Using Many Metrics and Two Resources.
Generating performance distributions via probabilistic symbolic execution.
Introducing a Software Design Language.
Adams re-trace: traceability link recovery via latent semantic indexing.
ObNet: An Object-Oriented Approach for Supporting Large, Long-Lived, Highly Configurable Systems.
Information systems development at the virtual global university: an experience report.
Software Development Productivity Tools and Metrics.
Optimizing selection of competing services with probabilistic hierarchical refinement.
Software Processes Are Software Too.
How does the degree of variability affect bug finding?
On the difficulty of replicating human subjects studies in software engineering.
A method for selecting SOA pilot projects including a pilot metrics framework.
Finite Semantics for Program Testing.
Visual Aid for FORTRAN Program Debugging.
The making of Orbix and the iPortal suite.
Rigi - A System for Programming-in-the-Large.
How to integrate usability into the software development process.
Structured Programming: From Theory to Practice.
Work Structures and Shifts: An Empirical Analysis of Software Specification Teamwork.
PARIS: A System for Reusing Partially Interpreted Schemas.
Hierarchical Coroutines: A Mechanism for Improved Program Structure.
Information foraging as a foundation for code navigation.
An Interactive Tool for Program Manipulation.
Using return on investment to compare agile and plan-driven practices in undergraduate group projects.
Analyzing Medium-Scale Software Development.
Specification of Time Dependencies and Synthesis of Concurrent Processes.
Development of a hybrid cost estimation model in an iterative manner.
Comparison of Concurrent Software Reliability Models.
Three approximation techniques for ASTRAL symbolic model checking of infinite state real-time systems.
UML-based service robot software development: a case study.
An Introduction to the Construction and Verification of Alphard Programs (Abstract).
Database Theory for Supporting Specification-Based Database Systems Development.
Traffic-aware stress testing of distributed systems based on UML models.
Automatic discovery of API-level exploits.
Formal Specification and Development of an Ada Compiler - A VDM Case Study.
Identifying program, test, and environmental changes that affect behaviour.
Unleashing concurrency for irregular data structures.
Prototyping vs. Specifying: A Multi-Project Experiment.
Software Reuse Economics: Cost-Benefit Analysis on a Large-Scale Ada Project.
A case study: demands on component-based development.
Modeling Software Failures and Reliability Growth During System Testing.
Formalizing Architectural Connection.
Verification of Concurrent Software with FLAVERS.
Emergent process design.
Understanding metamodeling.
Case studies for software engineers.
Computer Aided Design of Software Systems.
MSR 2005 international workshop on mining software repositories.
A Method for Asynchronous Parallelization.
PROUST: Knowledge-Based Program Understanding.
Design Evaluation of the Compiler Generating System MUGI.
Guiding dynamic symbolic execution toward unverified program executions.
Simulation in software engineering training.
ADE - An Architecture Design Environment for Component-Based Software Engineering.
Software Architecture in Industrial Applications.
As strong as possible mobility (poster).
Reducing combinatorics in GUI testing of android applications.
Identifying opaque behavioural changes.
Coalescing executions for fast uncertainty analysis.
Lilith: A Personal Computer for the Software Engineer.
Juzi: a tool for repairing complex data structures.
Automatic Programming for Streams II: Transformational Implementation.
Experimental Software Engineering: A Report on the State of the Art.
JDeodorant: identification and application of extract class refactorings.
Reliability of Run-Time Quality-of-Service evaluation using parametric model checking.
Tracking source locations.
Testing concurrent java components.
Decentralised Process Enactment in a Multi-Perspective Development Environment.
Disseminating architectural knowledge on open-source projects: a case study of the book "architecture of open-source applications".
Galileo: a tool built from mass-market applications.
SEGRAS - A Formal and Semigraphical Language Combining Petri Nets and Abstract Data Types for the Specification of Distributed Systems.
Automatic modularity conformance checking.
Analysis of multi-agent systems based on KAOS modeling.
The Data Transform Programming Metho: An Example for File Processing Problems.
Design rule spaces: a new form of architecture insight.
The quamoco tool chain for quality modeling and assessment.
An Evaluation of Required Element Testing Strategies.
The Detection of Anomalous Interprocedural Data Flow.
Towards a Method of Programming With Assertions.
Fraunhofer: the German model for applied research and technology transfer.
Safety critical systems: challenges and directions.
A Framework for Selective Recompilation in the Presence of Complex Intermodule Dependencies.
Requirements Expression and Verification Aid.
A replicated assessment and comparison of common software cost modeling techniques.
The Analyst - A Workstation for Analysis and Design.
Designing an economic-driven evaluation framework for process-oriented software technologies.
Automating Process Discovery Through Event-Data Analysis.
How to Deal With Deviations During Process Model Enactment.
AutoBlackTest: a tool for automatic black-box testing.
Demand-driven structural testing with dynamic instrumentation.
A history-based test prioritization technique for regression testing in resource constrained environments.
Digitally annexing desk space for software development.
First international workshop on the modeling and analysis of concerns in software (MACS 2005).
Flow Insensitive C++ Pointers and Polymorphism Analysis and its Application to Slicing.
Third international summit on software engineering education (SSEE III): bridging the university/industry gap.
StakeSource2.0: using social networks of stakeholders to identify and prioritise requirements.
Mobile computing middleware for context-aware applications.
Variability management in software product line engineering.
An Environment for Producing Well-Engineered Microcomputer Software.
An Experience in Process Assessment.
A System for Automatic Software Evaluation.
Software evolution: analysis and visualization.
Experiences of applying SPC techniques to software development processes.
LISFS: a logical information system as a file system.
Open source application spaces: the 5th workshop on open source software engineering.
Test Case Generation Using Prolog.
Architectural support for trust models in decentralized applications.
Shadow of a doubt: testing for divergences between software versions.
PPT: a COTS integration case study.
State extensions for java pathfinder.
Modeling aspect mechanisms: a top-down approach.
Automatic Monitoring of Software Requirements.
Improvement of Software Process by Process Description and Benefit Estimation.
EPOS : A Specification and Design Technique for Computer Controlled Real-time Automation Systems.
HighSpec: a tool for building and checking OZTA models.
Using the balanced scorecard process to compute the value of software applications.
Software Engineering in the Year 2001.
Clone detection in automotive model-based development.
Model-based testing.
How do programmers ask and answer questions on the web?.
SEEDS: a software engineer's energy-optimization decision support framework.
Application of Axiomatic Methods to a Specification Analyser.
Efficient path conditions in dependence graphs.
Some Considerations in Database Application Programming.
A Model of Roll-Back Recovery with Multiple Checkpoints.
Conspectus of Software Engineering Environments.
Test factoring: focusing test suites for the task at hand.
Tracking down software bugs using automatic anomaly detection.
An Environment for Specifying and Executing Hierarchical Petri Nets.
Building and using pluggable type-checkers.
Developing cost-effective model-based techniques for GUI testing.
The use of task analysis methods in support of the development of interactive systems (poster).
Mining billions of AST nodes to study actual and potential usage of Java language features.
Specifications: A Key to Effective Software Development.
Software Engineering for Distributed Applications: The Design Project.
Understanding JavaScript event-based interactions.
An analysis of the search spaces for generate and validate patch generation systems.
A Theory of Probabilistic Functional Testing.
Seventh international workshop on software engineering for secure systems: (SESS 2011).
Challenges in automotive software engineering.
SODOS - A Software Documentation Support Environment: Its Use.
Developing and executing java AWT applications on limited devices with TCPTE.
From semantic web to expressive software specifications: a modeling languages spectrum.
A critical review of "automatic patch generation learned from human-written patches": essay on the problem statement and the evaluation of automatic software repair.
Using Event Contexts and Matching Constraints to Monitor Software Processes.
Recognizing and responding to "bad smells" in extreme programming.
Assessing a Class of Software Tools.
Experimental context classification: incentives and experience of subjects.
Formal verification applied to Java concurrent software.
Who should fix this bug?
An exploratory study of the pull-based software development model.
Dragonfly: linking conceptual and implementation architectures of multiuser interactive systems.
How to make best use of cross-company data in software effort estimation?
Towards large-scale information integration.
Further investigations into the development and evaluation of reading techniques for object-oriented code inspection.
StubDroid: automatic inference of precise data-flow summaries for the android framework.
Model-based development of dynamically adaptive software.
Revisit of automatic debugging via human focus-tracking analysis.
Mining fine-grained code changes to detect unknown change patterns.
Experimental Results on the Paging Behavior of Numerical Programs.
Building systems from commercial components.
Human capacities in the software process: empiric validation.
Preventive Program Maintenance in Demeter/Java.
Code anomalies flock together: exploring code anomaly agglomerations for locating design problems.
From word embeddings to document similarities for improved information retrieval in software engineering.
Classpects: unifying aspect- and object-oriented language design.
Recovery Blocks in Action: A System Supporting High Reliability.
Using Attributed Grammars to Test Designs and Implementations.
Tool support for just-in-time architecture reconstruction and evaluation: an experience report.
Operations for Programming in the All.
A Robust B-Tree Implementation.
A formal approach to software synthesis for architectural platforms.
Grounded theory in software engineering research: a critical review and guidelines.
Global software development at siemens: experience from nine projects.
ARTOO: adaptive random testing for object-oriented software.
Software Process Modeling Experience (Panel Session Position Paper).
Cross Software Development for Microprocessors Using a Translator Writing System.
Re-engineering software architecture of home service robots: a case study.
The Computer Assisted Software (Case) System.
A methodology and tool for performance analysis of distributed server systems.
A Model of Software Engineering.
AR-miner: mining informative reviews for developers from mobile app marketplace.
Global Data Flow Analysis by Decomposition into Primes.
A Report on Random Testing.
Using MATCON to generate CASE tools that guide deployment of pre-packaged applications.
A series of development methodologies for a variety of systems in Korea.
The role of abstraction in software engineering.
A Hierarchical Structuring Method for Functional Software Systems.
Hyper/J: multi-dimensional separation of concerns for Java.
Reverse Engineering to the Architectural Level.
Abstract Syntax from Concrete Syntax.
Testing levels for object-oriented software.
Rapid Prototyping of Control Systems Using High Level Petri Nets.
Software engineering for large-scale multi-agent systems - SELMAS'05.
Evolving legacy system features into fine-grained components.
An empirical study on the impact of C++ lambdas and programmer experience.
Brazilian software quality in 2002.
Meeting challenges and surviving success: the 2nd workshop on open source software engineering.
A Formal Adaptation Method for Process Descriptions.
Inferring models of concurrent systems from logs of their behavior with CSight.
The Personal Software Process (PSP): A Full-Day Tutorial.
Testing pervasive software in the presence of context inconsistency resolution services.
Factors leading to integration failures in global feature-oriented development: an empirical analysis.
Development of software engineering: co-operative efforts from academia, government and industry.
Safe query objects: statically typed objects as remotely executable queries.
Portfolio: a search engine for finding functions and their usages.
Synthesizing framework models for symbolic execution.
P2P file sharing analysis for a better performance.
Goal-oriented software assessment.
POWER: A Tool for Quantitative Evaluation of Software Project Effectiveness.
Dimensions of software engineering course design.
Systematically refactoring inheritance to delegation in java.
Reference hijacking: patching, protecting and analyzing on unmodified and non-rooted android devices.
Test blueprint: an effective visual support for test coverage.
Software validation using power profiles.
Package-Oriented Programming of Engineering Tools.
Does Imperfect Debugging Affect Software Reliability Growth?
Control Structure Aptness: A Cast Study Using Top-Down Parsing.
An Empirical Study of a Model for Program Error Prediction.
Object-Oriented Analysis for Evolving Systems.
Software process improvement (tutorial session): best practices and lessons learned.
An empirical study of software developers' management of dependencies and changes.
5th international workshop on modeling in software engineering (MiSE 2013).
Software Engineering and the Internet.
Software Product Lines: Organizational Alternatives.
Feature maintenance with emergent interfaces.
Kongsberg's Road to an Industrial Software Methodology.
SourcererCC: scaling code clone detection to big-code.
Requirements interaction management in an eXtreme programming environment: a case study.
Mining configuration constraints: static analyses and empirical results.
Simplifying the Evolution of Java Programs (Tutorial).
Fifth workshop on software engineering for large-scale multi-agent systems (SELMAS).
A case study of a corporate open source development model.
The Modular Structure of Complex Systems.
International workshop on service oriented software engineering (IW-SOSE'06).
Position Statement: ICSE-12 Workshop on Industrial Experience Using Formal Methods.
The NATO Conferences form the Perspective of an Active Software Engineer.
Finding relevant functions in millions of lines of code.
Requirements engineering for product families.
Bayesian Models of Design Based on Intuition.
Architecture evaluation without an architecture: experience with the smart grid.
PECAN: Program Development Systems That Support Multiple Views.
Role-based exploration of object-oriented programs.
An Object-Oriented Software Application Architecture.
Using application states in software testing (poster).
An empirical study of the effects of test-suite reduction on fault localization.
Process Modelling - Where Next.
Semantic anomaly detection in online data sources.
An Algebra for Data Flow Anomaly Detection.
Reverse engineering feature models.
Computer-Aided Micro-Analysis of Programs.
Dependability assessment of software-based systems: state of the art.
A framework for automatic generation of evolvable e-commerce workplaces using business processes.
Effective Use of COTS (Commercial-off-the-Shelf) Software Components in Long Lived Systems (Tutorial).
Software Quality Assessment Technology.
Procurement of enterprise resource planning systems: experiences with some Hong Kong companies.
Mining metrics to predict component failures.
Critical factors in establishing and maintaining trust in software outsourcing relationships.
A framework for automated testing of javascript web applications.
An empirical investigation into the role of API-level refactorings during software evolution.
A System for Program Refinement.
A Knowledge-Based Environment for the Development of Software Parts Composition Systems.
Mining service abstractions.
Integrating UML diagrams for production control systems.
Expertise browser: a quantitative approach to identifying expertise.
Searching, selecting, and synthesizing source code.
Completeness, Robustness, and Safety in Real-Time Software Requirements Specification.
Capturing More World Knowledge in the Requirements Specification.
A Methodology for Decomposing System Requirements Into Data Processing Requirements.
Requirements tracing: discovering related documents through artificial pheromones and term proximity.
Global consistency checking of distributed models with TReMer+.
Why software quality improvement fails: (and how to succeed nevertheless).
Implementing incremental code migration with XML.
The Software Engineering Laboratory: An Operational Software Experience Factory.
Process Design System: An Integrated Set of Software Development Tools.
Design and Verification of Communication Procedures: A Bottom-Up Approach.
Research Pradigms in Computer Science.
Agent-based tactics for goal-oriented requirements elaboration.
Java Development Environments (Panel).
Component-based software engineering and the issue of trust.
Research abstract for semantic detection in dynamic data feeds with incomplete specifications.
Automatic Input of Flow Chart in Document Image.
Multi-platform user interface construction: a challenge for software engineering-in-the-small.
Deryaft: a tool for generating representation invariants of structurally complex data.
Interpolated n-grams for model based testing.
Software Evolution Management: An Integrated Discipline for Managing Software.
Specification Level Interoperability.
Software Engineering (on) the World Wide Web (Workshop).
Sixth international workshop on automation of software test: (AST 2011).
France on An Approach Towards Reliable Software.
SEURAT: integrated rationale management.
Copyright in Shareware Software Distributed on the Internet - The Trumpet Winsock Case.
Introduction to CORBA (tutorial session).
Communication Metrics for Software Development.
From Specifications to Machine Code: Program Construction through Formal Reasoning.
From MCC and CMM: technology transfers bright and dim.
Empirical results on the study of software vulnerabilities.
Formal Methods for Broadband and Multimedia Systems (Tutorial).
Reviser: efficiently updating IDE-/IFDS-based data-flow analyses in response to incremental program changes.
A Cooperative Approach to Software Development by Application Engineers and Software Engineers.
An Experiment in Technology Transfer: PAISLey Specification of Requirements for an Undersea Lightwave Cable System.
Architecture recovery of web applications.
Mining SQL injection and cross site scripting vulnerabilities using hybrid program analysis.
Performance Evaluation and Prediction for Legacy Information Systems.
Architecting for Large-Scale Systematic Component Reuse.
Mining Security-Sensitive Operations in Legacy Code Using Concept Analysis.
Scaling Step-Wise Refinement.
Automatically detecting developer activities and problems in software development work.
Extending static analysis by mining project-specific rules.
Checking Subsystem Safety Properties in Compositional Reachability Analysis.
A Component Architecture for an Extensible, Highly Integrated Context-Aware Computing Infrastructure.
AsDroid: detecting stealthy behaviors in Android applications by user interface and program behavior contradiction.
Reproducing and debugging field failures in house.
Verifying DAML+OIL and Beyond in Z/EVES.
Assessment of System Evolution Through Characterization.
A Software Process Scheduling Simulator.
TestEvol: a tool for analyzing test-suite evolution.
User Interface Development and Software Environments: The Chiron-1 System.
Toward a Software Testing and Reliability Early Warning Metric Suite.
2nd international workshop on user evaluations for software engineering researchers (USER 2013).
Visualizing Software Systems.
The Use of Description Logics in KBSE Systems: Experience Report.
Using knowledge elicitation to improve Web effort estimation: Lessons from six industrial case studies.
Formal specifications better than function points for code sizing.
A Workbench for Synthesising Behaviour Models from Scenarios.
Process Assessments in NASA.
Reconciling manual and automatic refactoring.
LASE: locating and applying systematic edits by learning from examples.
Software fault localization based on program slicing spectrum.
Integrating systematic exploration, analysis, and maintenance in software development.
7th international workshop on software clones (IWSC 2013).
Automatic query reformulations for text retrieval in software engineering.
A Model of Noisy Software Engineering Data (Status Report).
Facilitating communication between engineers with CARES.
Towards Safe Distributed Application Development.
4th ICSE Workshop on Component-Based Software Engineering: Component Certification and System Prediction.
Building test suites in social coding sites by leveraging drive-by commits.
On how often code is cloned across repositories.
HARPPIE: Hyper algorithmic recipe for productive parallelism intensive endeavors.
Supporting the Investigation and Planning of Pragmatic Reuse Tasks.
Statestep: A Tool for Systematic, Incremental Specification.
Query quality prediction and reformulation for source code search: the refoqus tool.
Conceptual Modeling through Linguistic Analysis Using LIDA.
Societal Computing.
The Software Factory: Combining Undergraduate Computer Science and Software Engineering Education.
How software engineering can benefit from traditional industries - A practical experience report (Invited industrial talk).
Efficient reuse of domain-specific test knowledge: An industrial case in the smart card domain.
An Introduction to Computing System Dependability.
Implementing database access control policy from unconstrained natural language text.
Managing evolution of software product line.
International Workshop on Testing Distributed Component-Based Systems.
A Specification-Based Adaptive Test Case Generation Strategy for Open Operating System Standards.
Using GUI Run-Time State as Feedback to Generate Test Cases.
Writing Good Software Engineering Research Paper.
Evaluating Object-Oriented Designs with Link Analysis.
Computer-Assisted Assume/Guarantee Reasoning with VeriSoft.
Cadena: An Integrated Development, Analysis, and Verification Environment for Component-based Systems.
Understanding Natural Programs Using Proper Decomposition.
Refactoring for Parameterizing Java Classes.
Adding High Availability and Autonomic Behavior to Web Services.
Crosscutting revision control system.
Automatic Verification of Real-Time Designs.
Software Quality Analysis & Measurement Service Activity in the Company.
Model Checking Distributd Objects Design.
Measuring architecture quality by structure plus history analysis.
Partial models: Towards modeling and reasoning with uncertainty.
Novice understanding of program analysis tool notifications.
Dynamic Mutation Testing in Integrated Regression Analysis.
Constructing Test Suites for Interaction Testing.
Safe software updates via multi-version execution.
Object Oriented Reuse: Experience in Developing a Framework for Speech Recognition Applications.
Aluminum: principled scenario exploration through minimality.
Stride: Search-based deterministic replay in polynomial time via bounded linkage.
Experiences of Software Quality Management Using Metrics through the Life-Cycle.
JMOCHA: A Model Checking Tool that Exploits Design Structure.
Understanding integer overflow in C/C++.
3rd International Workshop on Adoption-centric Software Engineering ACSE 2003.
An Analytic Framework for Specifying and Analyzing Imprecise Requirements.
DYNAMITE: Dynamic Task Nets for Software Process Management.
Do Maintainers Utilize Deployed Design Patterns Effectively?.
Specification and Verification of an Object Request Broker.
FEATUREHOUSE: Language-independent, automated software composition.
A Demand-Driven Analyzer for Data Flow Testing at the Integration Level.
Designing Safe Software for Medical Devices.
Predicting build failures using social network analysis on developer communication.
Bridging the Gaps Between Software Engineering and Human-Computer Interaction.
Round-Trip Engineering with Design Patterns, UML, Java and C++.
Comparative causality: explaining the differences between executions.
Matching and Merging of Statecharts Specifications.
Coupled evolution of model-driven spreadsheets.
An approach for restructuring text content.
Model-Based Testing in Practice.
Hybrid Concolic Testing.
Program and Interface Slicing for Reverse Engineering.
Project LEAP: Personal Process Improvement for the Differently Disciplined.
Behaviour Model Synthesis from Properties and Scenarios.
Example-driven modeling: model = abstractions + examples.
A Methodology for Prototyping-in-the-Large.
Coverage Measurement Experience During Function Test.
ICSE 99 Workshop on Software Engineering over the Internet.
JavaMOP: Efficient parametric runtime monitoring framework.
Complete and accurate clone detection in graph-based models.
MagicFuzzer: Scalable deadlock detection for large-scale applications.
An Incremental Flow- and Context-Sensitive Pointer Aliasing Analysis.
Partial evaluation of model transformations.
Beyond Structured Programming.
Post-Process Feedback With and Without Attribute Focusing: A Comparative Evaluation.
The Concept Assignment Problem in Program Understanding.
Embedded Architect: A Tool for Early Performance Evaluation of Embedded Software.
Understanding and simulating software evolution.
A Weakly Constrained Approach to Software Change Coordination.
A Systems Engineering View of Requirements Management for Software-Intensive Systems.
A Worldwide Survey of Base Process Activities Towards Software Engineering Process Excellence.
Mining application repository to recommend XML configuration snippets.
Blaze.
Augmenting test suites effectiveness by increasing output diversity.
Identifying Objects Using Cluster and Concept Analysis.
Fast Formal Analysis of Requirements via "Topoi Diagrams".
Conceptual Simplicity Meets Organizational Complexity: Case Study of a Corporate Metrics Program.
Synthesizing API usage examples.
MoHCA-Java: A Tool for C++ to Java Conversion Support.
Categorizing bugs with social networks: a case study on four open source software communities.
X-PERT: accurate identification of cross-browser issues in web applications.
Scaling agile methods to regulated environments: an industry case study.
Understanding the Effects of Developer Activities on Inspection Interval.
Incorporating Varying Test Costs and Fault Severities into Test Case Prioritization.
Amplifying tests to validate exception handling code.
Object-centric debugging.
An Experimental Evaluation of Selective Mutation.
Automatic detection of performance deviations in the load testing of large scale systems.
Bug prediction based on fine-grained module histories.
An Experimental Study of Individual Subjective Effort Estimations and Combinations of the Estimates.
Improving IDE recommendations by considering global implications of existing recommendations.
A Flexible Approach to Alliances of Complex Applications.
Formalizing Design Patterns.
A Programmer Performance Measure Based on Programmer State Transitions in Testing and Debugging Process.
Studying the effect of co-change dispersion on software quality.
3rd International Workshop on Net-Centric Computing (NCC 2001): Theme: Migrating to the Web.
Static Checking of Interrupt-Driven Software.
1st international workshop on natural language analysis in software engineering (NaturaLiSE 2013).
Java Program Analysis Projects in Osaka University: Aspect-Based Slicing System ADAS and Ranked-Component Search System SPARS-J.
Locating features in dynamically configured avionics software.
Refactoring sequential Java code for concurrency via concurrent libraries.
Not going to take this anymore: multi-objective overtime planning for software engineering projects.
Analyzing multi-agent systems with probabilistic model checking approach.
What good are strong specifications?
Oil and Water? High Performance Garbage Collection in Java with MMTk.
Visual Timed Event Scenarios.
How to Identify Binary Relations for Domain Models.
Using quantitative analysis to implement autonomic IT systems.
OU LearningWorks: A Customized Programming Environment for Smalltalk Modules.
Automating the Detection of Reusable Parts in Existing Software.
Supporting the Construction and Evolution of Component Repositories.
Reasoning about edits to feature models.
The Dublo Architecture Pattern for Smooth Migration of Business Information Systems: An Experience Report.
An Investigation on the Use of Machine Learned Models for Estimating Correction Costs.
Second Workshop on Scenarios and State Machines: Models, Algorithms, and Tools.
An Explorative Journey from Architectural Tests Definition downto Code Tests Execution.
WinWin: A System for Negotiating Requirements.
Counter play-out: executing unrealizable scenario-based specifications.
Software Visualisation for Object-Oriented Program Comprehension.
Authentic assessment in software engineering education based on PBL principles: a case study in the telecom market.
Effort Estimation Using Analogy.
A Technique for Enabling and Supporting Debugging of Field Failures.
A Systematic Approach to Derive the Scope of Software Product Lines.
Documenting and sharing knowledge about code.
5th international workshop on software engineering for computational science and engineering (SE-CSE 2013).
Maturity Status within Front-End Support Organisations.
A Comprehensive Process Model for Studying Software Process Papers.
GoalDebug: A Spreadsheet Debugger for End Users.
Towards Better Software Projects and Contracts: Commitment Specifications in Software Development Projects.
Efficient Forward Computation of Dynamic Slices Using Reduced Ordered Binary Decision Diagrams.
A requirements-based approach for the design of adaptive systems.
An Empirical Study of the Evolution of an Agile-Developed Software System.
Reliability analysis in symbolic pathfinder.
Teaching Contract Programming Concepts to Future Software Engineers.
Informing development decisions: from data to information.
Scene: Using Scenario Diagrams and Active Text for Illustrating Object-Oriented Programs.
Timely and efficient facilitation of coordination of software developers' activities.
A Framework for Evaluating Regression Test Selection Techniques.
Understanding and Predicting Effort in Software Projects.
SYNTHESIS: A Tool for Automatically Assembling Correct and Distributed Component-Based Systems.
A Cooperative Approach to Support Software Deployment Using the Software Dock.
Traceability for System Families.
Non-essential changes in version histories.
Hipikat: Recommending Pertinent Software Development Artifacts.
Studios in software engineering education: towards an evaluable model.
The Use of Goals to Surface Requirements for Evolving Systems.
Finding Failures by Cluster Analysis of Execution Profiles.
Using continuous integration of code and content to teach software engineering with limited resources.
The CommUnity Workbench.
Efficient and change-resilient test automation: an industrial case study.
An ontology toolkit for problem domain concept location in program comprehension.
Architecture-Based Runtime Software Evolution.
Search based design of software product lines architectures.
Path-Sensitive Inference of Function Precedence Protocols.
VIDA: Visual interactive debugging.
4th international workshop on managing technical debt (MTD 2013).
Software Requirements Negotiation: Some Lessons Learned.
Promises: Limited Specifications for Analysis and Manipulation.
The Co-Evolution of a Hype and a Software Architecture: Experience of Component-Producing Large-Scale EJB Early Adopters.
Writing dynamic service orchestrations with DSOL.
Software Engineering Issues for Ibiquitous Computing.
The design of bug fixes.
Modeling and Controlling the Software Test Process.
Slicing Object-Oriented Software.
Temporal analysis of API usage concepts.
Automated Inference of Pointcuts in Aspect-Oriented Refactoring.
Dynamic injection of sketching features into GEF based diagram editors.
Release engineering practices and pitfalls.
Software Cost and Quality Analysis by Statistical Approaches.
Systematic Object-Oriented Inspection - An Emprirical Study.
What Small Business and Small Organizations Say About the CMM: Experience Report.
A Sound Assertion Semantics for the Dependable Systems Evolution Verifying Compiler.
What make long term contributors: Willingness and opportunity in OSS community.
What scope is there for adopting evidence-informed teaching in SE?
Formal correctness, safety, dependability, and performance analysis of a satellite.
The Role of Experience and Ability in Comprehension Tasks Supported by UML Stereotypes.
Improving feature location practice with multi-faceted interactive exploration.
Petri nets state space analysis in the cloud.
Whole Program Path-Based Dynamic Impact Analysis.
A large scale Linux-kernel based benchmark for feature location research.
The Extension of Systems Architecting to the Architecting of Organizations.
Summary: Empirical Studies of Software Development and Evolution.
PorchLight: a tag-based approach to bug triaging.
Theme: An Approach for Aspect-Oriented Analysis and Design.
The Social Dynamics of Pair Programming.
Does bug prediction support human developers? findings from a google case study.
Using Web Service Technologies to Create an Information Broker: An Experience Report.
Detecting similar software applications.
Lessons from Using Basic LOTOS.
A study on improving static analysis tools: Why are we not using them?
Agility and Experimentation: Practical Techniques for Resolving Architectural Tradeoffs.
Unifying FSM-inference algorithms through declarative specification.
The Factory Pattern in API Design: A Usability Evaluation.
Patterns in Property Specifications for Finite-State Verification.
Using Subject-Oriented Programming to Overcome Common Problems in Object-Oriented Software Development/Evolution.
Trustworthy and sustainable operations in marine environments.
Nico Habermann's Research: A Brief Retrospective.
1st FME workshop on formal methods in software engineering (FormaliSE 2013).
Leap: A ``Personal Information Environment'' for Software Engineers.
Are your incoming aliases really necessary? counting the cost of object ownership.
A Model Driven Approach for Software Systems Reliability.
A study of variability spaces in open source software.
ITACA: An integrated toolbox for the automatic composition and adaptation of Web services.
Feature Oriented Model Driven Development: A Case Study for Portlets.
Third International Workshop on Economics-Driven Software Engineering Research.
Engineering adaptive privacy: on the role of privacy awareness requirements.
Randomized Differential Testing as a Prelude to Formal Verification.
Detecting memory leaks through introspective dynamic behavior modelling using machine learning.
Software Architecture Recovery of Embedded Software.
Designing real-time and distributed applications with the UML (tutorial session).
Towards increasing the compatibility of student pair programmers.
Data-Driven Implementation of Data Flow Diagrams.
iDice: problem identification for emerging issues.
On Synchronization and Recovery in Database Systems.
A Retrospective on the Development of Star.
Two-Way Translators Based on Attribute Grammar Inversion.
Spontaneous software: a Web-based, object computing paradigm.
Identifying and quantifying architectural debt.
Aspect-oriented software development beyond programming.
The Translation and Compatibility of SEQUEL and Query by Example.
Improving problem-oriented mailing list archives with MCS.
Towards an effective software engineering course project.
A Meta-Model for Restructuring Stakeholder Requirements.
The impact of fault models on software robustness evaluations.
Executable Requirements for Embedded Systems.
Effective identification of source code authors using byte-level information.
Developing and deploying software engineering courseware in an adaptable curriculum framework.
View infinity: a zoomable interface for feature-oriented software development.
Programming Cost Estimate: Is It Reasonable?
Inference of field initialization.
Broad-spectrum studies of log file analysis.
Mining sandboxes.
GATE: game-based testing environment.
So you want brooks in your classroom?
Tutorial: describing software architecture with UML.
Model-based security analysis for mobile communications.
The role of asynchronous discussions in increasing the effectiveness of remote synchronous requirements negotiations.
Beg, borrow, or steal (workshop session): using multidisciplinary approaches in empirical software engineering research.
The Software Knowledge Base.
Supporting reuse by delivering task-relevant and personalized information.
Empirical interval estimates for the defect content after an inspection.
Automated parameter optimization of classification techniques for defect prediction models.
A Type-Checking Program Linkage System for Pascal.
Hope for the best, prepare for the worst: multi-tier control for adaptive systems.
A Form-Based Approach to Human Engineering Methodologies.
SimRT: an automated framework to support regression testing for data races.
Mixin Up components.
On the Economics of Mass-Marketed Software.
On the "naturalness" of buggy code.
Automated security hardening for evolving UML models.
Extending Concurrent Pascal to Allow Dynamic Resource Management (Abstract).
Workshop on games and software engineering: (GAS 2011).
Tool support for data validation by end-user programmers.
Bandera: a source-level interface for model checking Java programs.
The groupthink specification exercise.
A Review of Automated Debugging Systems: Knowledge, Strategies, and Techniques.
Lessons learnt from the analysis of large-scale corporate databases.
Software-Reliability-Engineered Testing Practice (Tutorial).
Inferring better contracts.
Modeling behavioral design patterns of concurrent objects.
Lessons on Converting Batch Systems to Support Interaction (Experience Report).
Comprehension and Evolution of Legacy Software (Tutorial).
Component design of retargetable program analysis tools that reuse intermediate representations.
The sky is not the limit: multitasking across GitHub projects.
Algorithmic cost estimation for software evolution.
Research challenges of autonomic computing.
SWIM: synthesizing what i mean: code search and idiomatic snippet synthesis.
Interface decomposition for service compositions.
A Software Reliability Assessment Based on a Structural and Behavioral Analysis of Programs.
An Automatic Programming System to Support an Experimental Science.
Function point measurement from Java programs.
Multiple mass-market applications as components.
Version Control in the Inscape Environment.
Clinical requirements engineering.
Mixing Abstract and Concrete Modules: Specification, Development and Prototyping.
Investigating and improving a COTS-based software development.
CARE: cache guided deterministic replay for concurrent Java programs.
Experiences and results from initiating field defect prediction and product test prioritization efforts at ABB Inc.
Global software development for the practitioner.
TODO or to bug: exploring how task annotations play a role in the work practices of software developers.
Introduction to agile processes and extreme programming.
Pragmatic prioritization of software quality assurance efforts.
An infrastructure for the rapid development of XML-based architecture description languages.
Architecting Families of Software-Intensive Products.
An Empirical Study of Communication in Code Inspections.
Refactoring-aware version control.
Component-based software engineering for embedded systems.
Practical approach to development of SPI activities in a large organization: Toshiba's SPI history since 2000.
Better testing through oracle selection.
Deriving Specifications from Requirements: An Example.
A study and toolkit for asynchronous programming in c#.
Software Interoperability: Principles and Practice (Tutorial).
PMDB - A Project Master Database for Software Engineering Environments.
Building an Evolution Transformation Library.
Software Engineering for Business DP: Looking Back and Looking Forward.
Interacting process classes.
Directed test suite augmentation.
Specification of Software Controlling a Discrete-Continuous Environment.
Edmas: A Locally Distributed Mail System.
Power through brokering: open source community participation in software engineering student projects.
A Constructive Approach to Reliable Synchronization Code.
Release planning of mobile apps based on user reviews.
The dimensions of software engineering success.
Early Experiences with a Multi-Display Programming Environment.
An industrial case study on quality impact prediction for evolving service-oriented software.
WS-AMUSE - web service architecture for multimedia services.
DAS: An Automated System to Support Design Analysis.
Completeness Criteria for Testing Elementary Program Functions.
Estimating LOC for information systems from their conceptual data models.
The World and the Machine.
Evaluation of mutation testing for object-oriented programs.
Build system maintenance.
Relational programming with CrocoPat.
On the Time Overhead of Counters and Traversal Markers.
Automated, contract-based user testing of commercial-off-the-shelf components.
Rules of thumb for secure software engineering.
CodeHint: dynamic and interactive synthesis of code snippets.
Software practices in five ASEAN countries: an exploratory study.
Integrated Support for Project Management.
FireDetective: understanding ajax client/server interactions.
Technology Transfer as Collaboration: The Receptor Group.
Understanding asynchronous interactions in full-stack JavaScript.
Building a theory of job rotation in software engineering from an instrumental case study.
Best practices in extreme programming course design.
Open Implementation Design Guidelines.
System development using application services over the Net (tutorial session).
Unit test virtualization with VMVM.
Exception Handling: Formal Specification and Systematic Program Construction.
Property differencing for incremental checking.
Measuring subversions: security and legal risk in reused software artifacts.
A tale of four kernels.
Towards a distributed software architecture evaluation process: a preliminary assessment.
Automated goal operationalisation based on interpolation and SAT solving.
Software Process Management: Lessons Learned from History.
Formal Specification of Ssynchronous Distributed Real-Time Systems by APTL.
Exploring, exposing, and exploiting emails to include human factors in software engineering.
Using a Behavioral Theory of Program Comprehension in Software Engineering.
The Project Library : A Tool for Software Development.
Supporting professional spreadsheet users by generating leveled dataflow diagrams.
Design Decisions for the Incremental Adage Framework.
How do API documentation and static typing affect API usability?
Specification mining in concurrent and distributed systems.
Response to Undesired Events in Software Systems.
Quantifying and mitigating turnover-induced knowledge loss: case studies of chrome and a project at avaya.
The problem of knowledge decoupling in software development projects.
Defining Families: The Commonality Analysis (Tutorial).
Do students recognize ambiguity in software design? a multi-national, multi-institutional report.
Static and dynamic structure in design patterns.
Transition from centralized to decentralized version control systems: a case study on reasons, barriers, and outcomes.
An Analysis of the Resources Used in the SAFEGUARD System Software Development.
Third international workshop on software engineering in healthcare: (SEHC 2011).
Tailoring the Software Process to Project Goals and Environments.
Building modular object-oriented systems with reusable collaborations (tutorial session).
Concurrent Software System Design, Supported by SARA at the Age of One.
Workshop on SHAring and Reusing architectural Knowledge: (SHARK 2011).
Design, specification, and verification of interactive systems (workshop session).
Toward a better understanding of tool usage.
A Program Complexity Metric Based on Data Flow Information in Control Graphs.
Ownership, experience and defects: a fine-grained study of authorship.
Enhancing symbolic execution with veritesting.
On the education of future software engineers.
Supporting requirements engineering for medical products: early consideration of user-perceived quality.
Mulit-level system integration based on AUTOSAR.
Verifying multi-threaded software using smt-based context-bounded model checking.
A comparison of model-based and judgment-based release planning in incremental software projects.
A User's Viewpoint on the Programmer's Workbench.
Program analysis: from qualitative analysis to quantitative analysis.
Technology Transfer Aspects of Environment Construction.
An analysis of the relationship between conditional entropy and failed error propagation in software testing.
An Experiment in Software Engineering: The Architecture Research Facility as a Case Study.
The Design of a Template Structure for a Generalized Data Structure Definition Facility.
Inculcating invariants in introductory courses.
Bringing domain-specific languages to digital forensics.
Version Control in Families of Large Programs.
Stepwise Refinement Process with Modularity: An Algebraic Approach.
Object Management in a CASE Environment.
Scenarios and state machines: models, algorithms, and tools.
Test Plan Generation Using Formal Grammars.
Analysis of Error Remediation Expenditures During Validation.
An adaptive object model with dynamic role binding.
An Inter-Organizational Comparison of Programming Productivity.
The Effect of Department Size on Developer Attitudes to Prototyping.
The Causes and Effects of Infeasible Paths in Computer Programs.
7th international workshop on economics-driven software engineering research.
Detecting cross-browser issues in web applications.
Second international workshop on interdisciplinary software engineering research (WISER).
An Algorithm to Support Code-Skeleton Generation for Concurrent Systems.
A study of student strategies for the corrective maintenance of concurrent software.
Energy profiles of Java collections classes.
Cross-project defect prediction using a connectivity-based unsupervised classifier.
Anomaly Detection in Concurrent Programs.
Design, Implementation, and Evaluation of a Revision Control System.
Data flow testing of service-oriented workflow applications.
Invariant-based specification, synthesis, and verification of synchronization in concurrent programs.
A Knowledge Base for Supporting and Intelligent Program Editor.
Using components for architecture-based management: the self-repair case.
Identifying "good" architectural design alternatives with multi-objective optimization strategies.
The Use of Program Dependence Graphs in Software Engineering.
How do I know what I have to do?: the role of the inquiry culture in requirements communication for distributed software development projects.
Automated cross-browser compatibility testing.
On the Transformational Implementation Approach to Programming.
Lessons learned from teaching reflective software engineering using the Leap toolkit.
A New Program Structure to Improve Accuracy and Readability of Pascal Software.
Reuse Library Interoperability and the World Wide Web.
Dynamic round-trip GUI maintenance.
A comparison of 10 sampling algorithms for configurable systems.
Intergrating Measurement with Improvement: An Action-Oriented Approach (Experience Report).
A Database Model for Effective Configuration Management in the Programming Environment.
SQL DOM: compile time checking of dynamic SQL statements.
Application Downloading.
Modular Specification of Incremental Program Transformation Systems.
Making Requirements Measurable (Tutorial).
A combination approach for enhancing automated traceability.
The Preliminary Design as a Key to Successful Software Development.
A Hierarchical and Functional Software Process Description and Its Enaction.
Calysto: scalable and precise extended static checking.
Software Requirements: Are They Really a Problem?
An architecture-centric approach to the development of a distributed model-checker for timed automata.
Automatic Maintenance of Routine Programming Tasks Based on a Declarative Description (Experience Report).
Modeling deployment and configuration of CORBA systems with UML (poster).
A case study on the automated verification of groupware protocols.
Aspect-oriented programming.
Helping users avoid bugs in GUI applications.
Detecting model inconsistency through operation-based model construction.
Software Re-engineering Position Statement.
Knowledge-based architectural adaptation management for self-adaptive systems.
On What Exactly Is Going On When Software Is Developed Step-by-Step.
Panel on Collaborative Software Engineering.
Iteration in the Software Process: Review of the 3rd International Software Process Workshop.
Alcoa: the alloy constraint analyzer.
APE: an annotation language and middleware for energy-efficient mobile application development.
Supporting diversity with component frameworks as architectural elements.
Lifting model transformations to product lines.
Improving design and source code modularity using AspectJ (tutorial session).
Enabling the runtime assertion checking of concurrent contracts for the Java modeling language.
TradeMaker: automated dynamic analysis of synthesized tradespaces.
Distributed development: an education perspective on the global studio project.
A Modification Request Control System.
Design and Specification of the Minimal Subset of an Operating System Family (Abstract).
Reverse engineering of object oriented code.
Software model checking in practice: an industrial case study.
A case study on refactoring in Haskell programs.
International workshop on realising evidence-based software engineering.
PAC learning-based verification and model synthesis.
Research journey towards industrial application of reuse technique.
CORE : A Method for Controlled Requirement Expression.
Managing space for finite-state verification.
Feature oriented refactoring of legacy applications.
A Closer Look at Iteration: The Self Stabilizing Capability of Loops.
An empirical comparison of compiler testing techniques.
A New Technique for Improving the Quality of Computer Programs.
Achieving accuracy and scalability simultaneously in detecting application clones on Android markets.
The Software Process and Software Environments (Panel).
Deciding what to design: closing a gap in software engineering education.
A demonstration of a distributed software design sketching tool.
Overstructured Management of Software Engineering.
A language for advanced protocol analysis in automotive networks.
New Languages from Old: The Extension of Programming Languages by Embedding, with a Case Study.
Real-time specification patterns.
Data-guided repair of selection statements.
Performance-related completions for software specifications.
User Software Engineering and the Design of Interactive Systems.
Platform-independent and tool-neutral test descriptions for automated software testing.
Discovering "unknown known" security requirements.
Quantifying Software Designs.
Analyzing the Test Process Using Structural Coverage.
Testing Real-Time Constraints in a Process Algebraic Setting.
From research to reward: challenges in technology transfer.
Specification and Implementation of Parallel Activities on Abstract Objects.
Object-oriented inspection in the face of delocalisation.
The Dimensionality of Program Complexity.
Understanding broadcast based peer review on open source software projects.
Explicit assumptions enrich architectural models.
Refactoring to role objects.
Multifaceted Distributed Systems Specification Using Processes and Event Synchronization.
Improving Software Quality: The Use of Formal Inspections at the JPL (Experience Report).
Implementing Cleanroom Software Engineering into a Mature CMM-Based Software Organization.
The IDeA Design Environment.
Web services engineering: promises and challenges.
BIGMAC II: A FORTRAN Language Augmentation Tool.
Experience with a Modular Typed Language: PROTEL.
Developing Graphical (Software Engineering) Tools with PROGRES.
Characterizing process variation.
Experience from applying RIM to educational ERP development.
Data structure repair using goal-directed reasoning.
Timing Analysis of Cyclic Concurrent Programs.
Requirement Specification Description System in Japanese Language - JISDOS.
Static extraction of program configuration options.
CEFRIEL: an Innovative Approach to University-Industry Cooperation in Information Technologies.
Easy language extension with meta-aspectJ.
Experiences with place lab: an open source toolkit for location-aware computing.
Software component quality assessment in practice: successes and practical impediments.
A Bayesian approach to diagram matching with application to architectural models.
Component technologies: Java beans, COM, CORBA, RMI, EJB and the CORBA component model.
Models for model's sake: why explicit system models are also an end to themselves.
The concern manipulation environment.
3D visualization for concept location in source code.
Mental models and parallel program maintenance.
Mining framework usage changes from instantiation code.
SACEM Software Validation (Experience Report).
Synthesis of live behaviour models for fallible domains.
Breaking the barriers to successful refactoring: observations and tools for extract method.
On Executable Models for Rule-Based Prototyping.
An empirical study of regression test application frequency.
A compliance notation for verifying concurrent systems.
Exploring language support for immutability.
Using Object-Oriented Development for Support Prototyping (Experience Report).
Chianti: a change impact analysis tool for java programs.
An experimental comparison of four test suite reduction techniques.
GridUnit: software testing on the grid.
Interval quality: relating customer-perceived quality to process quality.
Cowboys, ankle sprains, and keepers of quality: how is video game development different from software development?
Twenty dirty tricks to train software engineers.
An Introduction to the Programmer's Workbench.
The software engineer and the development, management and use of intellectual property.
Prompter - a project planning assistant.
Resource Controller Tasks in Ada: Their Structure and Semantics.
Observations and lessons learned from automated testing.
When the project absolutely must get done: marrying the organization chart with the precedence diagram.
Completely Monotone Regression Estimates of Software Failure Rates.
Inference Rules for Program Annotation.
BigDebug: debugging primitives for interactive big data processing in spark.
The Two-Step Commitment Protocol: Modeling, Specification and Proof Methodology.
Modeling of Data-Processing Software for Generating and Reusing Their Programs.
Holmes: a system to support software product lines.
Detecting architecturally-relevant code smells in evolving software systems.
Exploring variability-aware execution for testing plugin-based web applications.
A Model for Estimating Program Size and Its Evaluation.
Estimating Software Fault Content Cefore Coding.
Verifying component and connector models against crosscutting structural views.
Tutorial: introduction to the rational unified process.
Validation methods for calibrating software effort models.
Experience with a Module Package in Developing Production Quality PASCAL Programs.
Automatic Revision of Formal Test Procedures.
COTS Workshop: continuing collaborations for successful COTS development.
Dealing with noise in defect prediction.
Little-JIL/Juliette: a process definition language and interpreter.
An Editor for Documentation in pi-System to Support Software Development and Maintenance.
Genie: supporting the model driven development of reflective, component-based adaptive systems.
Existential live sequence charts revisited.
Story driven modeling: a practical guide to model driven software development.
Applying Design of Experiments to Software Testing (Experience Report).
Enterprise application integration by means of a generic CORBA LDAP gateway.
Managing Software Reuse - An Experience Report.
Understanding and fixing multiple language interoperability issues: the C/Fortran case.
Engineering safety-related requirements for software-intensive systems.
Tutorial: mastering design patterns.
Workshop description of 5th intl. workshop on scenarios and state machines: models-algorithms-and tools (SCESM).
Bottom-up model-driven development.
Evaluating the Reverse Engineering Capabilities of Web Tools for Understanding Site Content and Structure: A Case Study.
JITTAC: a just-in-time tool for architectural consistency.
Domain Modeling for Software Engineering.
DECKARD: Scalable and Accurate Tree-Based Detection of Code Clones.
Getting Results from Search-Based Approaches to Software Engineering.
An Approach to Large-Scale Collection of Application Usage Data Over the Internet.
Reverb: recommending code-related web pages.
Empowering Software Engineers in Human-Centered Design.
5th international workshop on principles of engineering service-oriented systems (PESOS 2013).
The 3rd Workshop on Open Source Software Engineering.
Validating the Unit Correctness of Spreadsheet Programs.
Exception-Chain Analysis: Revealing Exception Handling Architecture in Java Server Applications.
An Empirical Study of an Informal Knowledge Repository in a Medium-Sized Software Consulting Company.
When Role Models Have Flaws: Static Validation of Enterprise Security Policies.
Safe-commit analysis to facilitate team software development.
Using Compressed Bytecode Traces for Slicing Java Programs.
A Template for Real World Team Projects for Highly Populated Software Engineering Classes.
Risk Management in Software Development: A Technology Overview and the Riskit Method.
In-field healing of integration problems with COTS components.
Software Process Description Using LOTOS and Its Enaction.
The Right Algorithm at the Right Time: Comparing Data Flow Analysis Algorithms for Finite State Verification.
Exploiting the Map Metaphor in a Tool for Software Evolution.
Symbiotic general-purpose and domain-specific languages.
JUnitMX - A change-aware unit testing tool.
Architectural Level Risk Assessment Tool Based on UML Specifications.
Prototyping Real-Time Vision Systems: An Experiment in DSL Design.
Data clone detection and visualization in spreadsheets.
SNIAFL: Towards a Static Non-Interactive Approach to Feature Location.
TraceLab: An experimental workbench for equipping researchers to innovate, synthesize, and comparatively evaluate traceability solutions.
Specification engineering and modular verification using a web-integrated verifying compiler.
Software analytics: achievements and challenges.
Impact of Commercial Off-the-Shelf (COTS) Software on the Interface Between Systems and Software Engineering.
Modeling Product Line Architectures through Change Sets and Relationships.
Software Reuse Myths Revisited.
Process Improvement Towards ISO 9001 Certification in a Small Software Organization.
Cost Estimation for Web Applications.
Coupling software architecture and human architecture for collaboration-aware system adaptation.
Software Process Maturity: Is Level five Enough?
Log-based testing.
Explicating symbolic execution (xSymExe): an evidence-based verification framework.
Requirements for a Layered Software Architecture Supporting Cooperative Multi-User Interaction.
On Accurate Automatic Verification of Publish-Subscribe Architectures.
vol: A tool for defining and planning architecture evolution.
Automatic patch generation learned from human-written patches.
Build your own model checker in one month.
make test-zesti: A symbolic execution solution for improving regression testing.
Uncovering performance problems in Java applications with reference propagation profiling.
Using invariant relations in the termination analysis of while loops.
Formal Methods: An International Perspective.
On Formal Requirements Modeling Languages: RML Revisited.
Sound empirical evidence in software testing.
A proposal for the improvement of project's cost predictability using EVM and historical data of cost.
Efficient Filtering in Publish-Subscribe Systems Using Binary Decision.
Introducing Software Engineering by means of Extreme Programming.
Extending the Potts and Bruns Model for Recording Design Rationale.
Toward an Understanding of the Motivation of Open Source Software Developers.
Overcoming the NAH Syndrome for Inspection Deployment.
Examples of Applying Software Estimate Tool.
The SMART Approach for Software Process Engineering.
Validation of contracts using enabledness preserving finite state abstractions.
Assume-Guarantee Verification of Source Code with Design-Level Assumptions.
Slicing MATLAB Simulink models.
Requirements Engineering Tools Go Mobile.
The Second International Workshop on Automated Program Analysis, Testing and Verification.
Engineering Distributed Objects (EDO 99) Workshop Summary.
Developing verified programs with dafny.
Designing an Application Development Model for a Large Banking Organization.
An Initial Assessment of Aspect-Oriented Programming.
A Hybrid Architectural Style for Distributed Parallel Processing of Generic Data Streams.
Towards recognizing and rewarding efficient developer work patterns.
Using Simulation to Empirically Investigate Test Coverage Criteria Based on Statechart.
Experience with the Development of Hard Real-Time Embedded Ada Software.
Continuous social screencasting to facilitate software tool discovery.
On the Uniformity of Software Evolution Patterns.
Improving API documentation usability with knowledge pushing.
A Flexible Approach to Decentralized Software Evolution.
Use, disuse, and misuse of automated refactorings.
Agility at scale: economic governance, measured improvement, and disciplined delivery.
Supporting Generic Sketching-Based Input of Diagrams in a Domain-Specific Visual Language Meta-Tool.
Research Summary for Dynamic Detection of Program Invariants.
End-User Software Engineering with Assertions in the Spreadsheet Paradigm.
Reasoning with qualitative preferences to develop optimal component-based systems.
Exploring the impact of inter-smell relations on software maintainability: an empirical study.
Tutorial: An Overview of UML 2.0.
An empirical study on the developers' perception of software coupling.
1st international workshop on combining modelling and search-based software engineering (CMSBSE 2013).
Testing and debugging UML models based on fUML.
An Incremental Project Plan: Introducing Cleanroom Method and Object-Oriented Development Method.
Automated software architecture security risk analysis using formalized signatures.
Lutess: A Specification-Driven Testing Environment for Synchronous Software.
Inferring developer expertise through defect analysis.
GRIDS - GRaph-based, Integrated Development of Software: Integrating Different Perspectives of Software Engineering.
Effective specification of decision rights and accountabilities for better performing software engineering projects.
Language modularity with the MPS language workbench.
Using Server Pages to Unify Clones in Web Applications: A Trade-Off Analysis.
Generating range fixes for software configuration.
Improving PSP education by pairing: An empirical study.
A Comparison of U.S. and Japanese Software Process Maturity.
FOCUS: An adaptation of a SWEBOK-based curriculum for industry requirements.
Positive Experiences with an Open Project Assignment in an Introductory Programming Course.
5th international workshop on software engineering in health care (SEHC 2013).
Supporting maintenance tasks on transformational code generation environments.
The Graft-Host Method for Design Change.
Applying WinWin to Quality Requirements: A Case Study.
8th international workshop on automation of software test (AST 2013).
Automatic recovery from runtime failures.
Augmenting test suites automatically.
Compatibility and Regression Testing of COTS-Component-Based Software.
Personal Software Engineering Project Management Process.
Software Engineering and Artificial Intelligence.
Evaluating usefulness of software metrics: an industrial experience report.
A Paradigm for Decentralized Process Modeling and Its Realization in the Oz Environment.
An Analysis of SEI Software Process Assessment Results: 1987-1991.
Coca: An automated Debugger for C.
Using Soloman-Felder Learning Style Index to Evaluate Pedagogical Resources for Introductory Programming Classes.
Decision theoretic requirements prioritization: a two-step approach for sliding towards value realization.
Ldiff: An enhanced line differencing tool.
LIME: Linda Meets Mobility.
JDBC Checker: A Static Analysis Tool for SQL/JDBC Applications.
MIDAS: a design quality assessment method for industrial software.
SCM-10: Tenth International Workshop on Software Configuration Management. New Practices, New Challenges, and New Boundaries.
1st international workshop on live programming (LIVE 2013).
The impacts of software process improvement on developers: A systematic review.
Discovering and representing systematic code changes.
BRACE: An assertion framework for debugging cyber-physical systems.
Toward Precise Measurements Using Software Normalization.
Controlling the Complexity of Software Design.
On the proactive and interactive visualization for feature evolution comprehension: An industrial investigation.
Data Flow Analysis for Checking Properties of Concurrent Java Programs.
Extending the Representational State Transfer (REST) Architectural Style for Decentralized Systems.
Gammatella: Visualization of Program-Execution Data for Deployed Software.
Three Dimensional Software Modeling.
DRC: a detection tool for dangling references in PHP-based web applications.
Design and Evaluation of the Mobile Agent Architecture for Distributed Consistency Management.
Automatically finding performance problems with feedback-directed learning software testing.
A study of enabling factors for rapid fielding: combined practices to balance speed and stability.
Invariant-based automatic testing of AJAX user interfaces.
Supporting Reflective Practitioners.
Fixing Inconsistencies in UML Design Models.
The impact of process choice in high maturity environments: An empirical analysis.
Executable Object Modeling with Statecharts.
Defect Type and Its Impact on the Growth Curve.
Interactive refinement of combinatorial test plans.
Managing Commitments and Risks: Challenges in Distributed Agile Development.
Teaching and learning programming and software engineering via interactive gaming.
Build code analysis with symbolic evaluation.
TIGRA - An Architectural Style for Enterprise Application Integration.
Memoise: a tool for memoized symbolic execution.
Eliminative induction: a basis for arguing system confidence.
Green streams for data-intensive software.
Toward a software product line for affective-driven self-adaptive systems.
Architectural Framework Modeling in Telecommunication Domain.
Quantifying the Value of Architecture Design Decisions: Lessons from the Field.
Inferring likely mappings between APIs.
WorkItemExplorer: Visualizing software development tasks using an interactive exploration environment.
About the Development of a Point of Sale System: an Experience Report.
Supporting Heterogeneous Architecture Descriptions in an Extensible Toolset.
Software Reuse in an Industrial Setting: A Case Study.
A Practical Method for Verifying Event-Driven Software.
Identifying Linux bug fixing patches.
Defect Content Estimations from Review Data.
Cybersecurity.
Detecting metadata bugs on the fly.
Analyzing the change-proneness of service-oriented systems from an industrial perspective.
Automated reliability estimation over partial systematic explorations.
Predicting performance via automated feature-interaction detection.
An Experimental, Pluggable Infrastructure for Modular Configuration Management Policy Composition.
Constructing parser for industrial software specifications containing formal and natural language description.
Recovering Documentation-to-Source-Code Traceability Links using Latent Semantic Indexing.
Empirically researching development of international software.
Residual Test Coverage Monitoring.
Balancing Agility and Discipline: Evaluating and Integrating Agile and Plan-Driven Methods.
Towards automated testing and fixing of re-engineered feature models.
Establishing Experience Factories at Daimler-Benz An Experience Report.
On identifying user complaints of iOS apps.
Generative Techniques for Product Lines.
Supporting the Deployment of Object-Oriented Frameworks.
Improving Validation Activities in a Global Software Development.
Listening to programmers - Taxonomies and characteristics of comments in operating system code.
Is time-zone proximity an advantage for software development? the case of the brazilian IT industry.
2nd SEMAT workshop on a general theory of software engineering (GTSE 2013).
MCT: a tool for commenting programs by multimedia comments.
Semantics-based code search.
Investigating Quality Factors in Object-Oriented Designs: An Industrial Case Study.
Reifying Configuration Management for Object-Oriented Software.
Influencing the adoption of software engineering methods using social software.
Alitheia Core: An extensible software quality monitoring platform.
Technical debt: past, present, and future (panel).
Analyzing critical process models through behavior model synthesis.
An Empirical Study of Global Software Development: Distance and Speed.
Summary of the ICSE 2012 tutorials and technical briefings.
Applying Algorithm Animation Techniques for Program Tracing, Debugging, and Understanding.
Distributed Objects.
Computational Reflection in Software Process Modeling: The SLANG Approach.
Korat: A Tool for Generating Structurally Complex Test Inputs.
MDSheet: A framework for model-driven spreadsheet engineering.
Comprehension Processes During Large Scale Maintenance.
Blending Object-Z and Timed CSP: An Introduction to TCOZ.
Efficient quality assurance of variability-intensive systems.
Tesseract: Interactive visual exploration of socio-technical relationships in software development.
A New Approach to Consistency Control in Software Engineering.
Synthesis of timed behavior from scenarios in the Fujaba Real-Time Tool Suite.
How Does 3D Visualization Work in Software Engineering? : Empirical Study of a 3D Version/Module Visualization System.
Hyper/J
Breaking the Ice for Agile Development of Embedded Software: An Industry Experience Report.
Ten tips to succeed in Global Software Engineering education.
Tool Support for Developing Advanced Mechatronic Systems: Integrating the Fujaba Real-Time Tool Suite with CAMeL-View.
Dynamic Configuration of Resource-Aware Services.
Palantr: Raising Awareness among Configuration Management Workspaces .
Modeling Cloud performance with Kriging.
Effective Experience Repositories for Software Engineering.
Bi-Criteria Models for All-Uses Test Suite Reduction.
Estimating software-intensive projects in the absence of historical data.
Measuring Cognitive Activities in Software Engineering.
A Web-Oriented Architectural Aspect for the Emerging Computational Tapestry.
Debugger Canvas: Industrial experience with the code bubbles paradigm.
Software Engineering Challenges: A CIO's Perspective.
Expectations, outcomes, and challenges of modern code review.
Reuse Facts and Myths.
Active refinement of clone anomaly reports.
Software Components in a Data Structure Precompiler.
Using Software Component Generators to Contstruct a Meta-Weaver Framework.
Automatically capturing source code context of NL-queries for software maintenance and reuse.
2nd international workshop on the twin peaks of requirements and architecture (TwinPeaks 2013).
Skoll: Distributed Continuous Quality Assurance.
A Reliability Model Combining Representative and Directed Testing.
Cognitive tools for locating and comprehending software objects for reuse.
Towards business processes orchestrating the physical enterprise with wireless sensor networks.
A Primer on Empirical Studies (Tutorial).
Tool Integration in the Pact Environment.
Developing use cases and scenarios in the requirements process.
Fourth International Workshop on Software Engineering Education (IWSEE 4).
Recommending adaptive changes for framework evolution.
Reverse Engineering of Legacy Systems: A Path Toward Success.
Software engineering education in the era of outsourcing, distributed development, and open source software: challenges and opportunities.
IntEQ: recognizing benign integer overflows via equivalence checking across multiple precisions.
Use of State Diagrams to Engineer Communications Software.
Applying regression test selection for COTS-based applications.
How do professionals perceive legacy systems and software modernization?
The Portable Communication Protocol Program COMPAS for Data Terminal Systems.
A Management Approach to the Development of Computer-Based Systems.
Towards and Engineering Approach to Software Design.
Extending the discipline: how software can help or hinder human decision making (and vice-versa).
HDD: hierarchical Delta Debugging.
Software Research in the Department of Defense.
Binary refactoring: improving code behind the scenes.
Estimating footprints of model operations.
Efficiency analysis of model-based review in actual software design.
Accelerating software development through collaboration.
MSR 2006: the 3rd international workshop on mining software repositories.
Semi Formal Process Model for Technology Transfer.
Fifteen Years of Psychology in Software Engineering: Individual Differences and Cognitive Science.
Detecting low usability web pages using quantitative data of users' behavior.
Three Paradigms for Developing Information Systems.
Formal Specification and Automatic Programming.
An object-oriented bridge among architectural styles, aspects and frameworks.
Inferring templates from spreadsheets.
Configuration Management in BiiN SMS.
Using structural context to recommend source code examples.
Towards the principled design of software engineering diagrams.
Static and Dynamic Data Modeling for Information System Design.
Characteristic Program Complexity Measures.
Automated support for process-aware definition and execution of measurement plans.
Discrete Event Simulation as a Means of Validating JSD Design Specifications.
The Property Vector Specification of a Multiset Iterator.
Toward an Effective Software Reliability Evaluation.
Will earlier projects plus a disciplined process enforce SE principles throughout the CS curriculum?
A Critical Overview of Computer Performance Evaluation.
Using Formal Methods to Reason about Architectural Standards.
Effort estimation from change records of evolving software (poster).
On Microprocessors: A Platform for True Program Portability with Examples from Microcobal.
The Relationship between Slices and Module Cohesion.
Code review quality: how developers see it.
Checking app behavior against app descriptions.
PRADA: prioritizing android devices for apps by mining large-scale usage data.
A Knowledge Structure for Reusing Abstract Data Types.
Tutorial: towards dynamic web services.
A framework for modelling and analysis of software systems scalability.
High-Pressure Steam Engines and Computer Software.
The emerging role of data scientists on software development teams.
Two's company, three's a crowd: a case study of crowdsourcing software development.
Impact of process simulation on software practice: an initial report.
Incremental Analysis of Side Effects for C Software System.
Requirements engineering in the year 00: a research perspective.
Applying and adjusting a software process improvement model in practice: the use of the IDEAL model in a small software enterprise.
From Design to Redesign.
A Comparison of Lifecycle Models.
Analyzing medical processes.
An approach to detecting duplicate bug reports using natural language and execution information.
A Comparison of Data Flow Path Selection Criteria.
The code orb: supporting contextualized coding via at-a-glance views.
European experiences with software process improvement.
Transformations of software models into performance models.
A dynamic pair-program sending architecture for industrial remote operations.
PROMPTER: A Knowledge Based Support Tool for Code Understanding.
Choosing a Testing Method to Deliver Reliability.
Recent Advances in Software Estimation Techniques.
Maintaining mental models: a study of developer work habits.
No 1A ESS Laboratory Support System - Erasable Flag Facility.
An Innovative Approach to System Requirements Analysis by Using Structural Modeling Method.
Holistic framework for establishing interoperability of heterogeneous software development tools and models.
Object naming analysis for reverse-engineered sequence diagrams.
Extending the Implementation Scheme of Functional Programming System FP for Supporting the Formal Software Development Methodology.
The Design of a Reliable Applications System.
A Perspective on Software Development.
Design and Verification of Real-Time Systems.
Vejovis: suggesting fixes for JavaScript faults.
Software process improvement by object technology (ESSI PIE 27785 -- SPOT).
Permission-based programming languages.
Mining behavior models from user-intensive web applications.
CASE & Reengineering: From Archeology to Software Perestroika.
An Organizational Learning Approach to Domain Analysis.
ReAssert: a tool for repairing broken unit tests.
Use of Cluster Analysis to Evaluate Software Engineering Methodologies.
Workshop on architecting dependable systems (WADS 2005).
Programming as an Evolutionary Process.
Workshop on global software development.
It's engineering Jim ... but not as we know it: software engineering - solution to the software crisis, or part of the problem?
Software Development Based on Module Interconnection.
Automatic generation of software behavioral models.
Hyper/J: multi-dimensional separation of concerns for Java.
Automatic Program Analysis and Evaluation.
Efficient exploration of service-oriented architectures using aspects.
Software Engineering: As it is.
SpyWare: a change-aware development toolset.
A Flexible Environment for Program Development Based on a Symbolic Interpreter.
Investigating the readability of state-based formal requirements specification languages.
Extension and Software Development.
Predictable dynamic deployment of components in embedded systems.
Non-functional requirements: from elicitation to modelling languages.
An empirical study of fault localization for end-user programmers.
Patching vulnerabilities with sanitization synthesis.
TRW's Ada Process Model for Incremental Development of Large Software Systems.
An evaluation of the paired comparisons method for software sizing.
Towards architectural information in implementation.
Workshop on advances in model-based software testing.
Agile software reuse recommender.
Measuring Reliability of Computer Center Software.
Using Testability Measures for Dependability Assessment.
Defining and continuous checking of structural program dependencies.
Fuzzy logic based interactive recovery of software design.
Prediction and Management of Program Quality.
On the techniques we create, the tools we build, and their misalignments: a study of KLEE.
3-step knowledge transition: a case study on architecture evaluation.
On the Use of Formal Methods in Software Development.
Multibook's test environment.
Interactive System for Structured Program Production.
Improving automated source code summarization via an eye-tracking study of programmers.
Aspects of a Trigger Subsystem in an Integrated Data Base System.
Patch verification via multiversion interprocedural control flow graphs.
The 8th international workshop on economics-driven software engineering research.
Modeling of component based systems.
Functional Programming and Logical Programming for the Telegram Analysis Problem.
\chiChek: A Model Checker for Multi-Valued Reasoning.
Graph-based pattern-oriented, context-sensitive source code completion.
Partition-based regression verification.
Improving Test Suites via Operational Abstraction.
Using Benchmarking to Advance Research: A Challenge to Software Engineering.
Seahawk: stack overflow in the IDE.
A Process for Hitting Paydirt.
Transfer defect learning.
None
A Fast Assembly Level Reverse Execution Method via Dynamic Slicing.
The Role of Experimentation in Software Engineering: Past, Current, and Future.
Overcoming the challenges in cost estimation for distributed software projects.
Bridging the gap between the total and additional test-case prioritization strategies.
Exploiting an Event-Based Infrastructure to Develop Complex Distributed Systems.
ContextServ: A platform for rapid and flexible development of context-aware Web services.
Model Based Process Assessments.
Automated oracle creation support, or: How I learned to stop worrying about fault propagation and love mutation testing.
A history-based matching approach to identification of framework evolution.
Timely detection of Coordination Requirements to support collaboration among software developers.
Supporting sustainability with software - An industrial perspective (Keynote).
System Dynamics Modeling of an Inspection-Based Process.
New Software Engineering Faculty Symposium.
Distributed Software Engineering.
Traits: Tools and Methodology.
COBRA: A Hybrid Method for Software Cost Estimation, Benchmarking, and Risk Assessment.
An Integrated Method for Effective Behaviour Analysis of Distributed Systems.
6th international workshop on cooperative and human aspects of software engineering (CHASE 2013).
Mining Java class identifier naming conventions.
Design Components: Towards Software Composition at the Design Level.
Facts and Myths Affecting Software Reuse.
Understanding IV & V in a Safety Critical and Complex Evolutionary Environment: The NASA Space Shuttle Program.
Changeset based developer communication to detect software failures.
Assessing Test-Driven Development at IBM.
How to effectively use topic models for software engineering tasks? an approach based on genetic algorithms.
Using Experiments in Software Engineering as an Auxiliary Tool for Teaching-A Qualitative Evaluation from the Perspective of Students' Learning Process.
Pluggable Reflection: Decoupling Meta-Interface and Implementation.
Where does this code come from and where does it go? - Integrated code history tracker for open source systems.
A Formal Approach to Determining Parallel Resource Bindings: Experience Report.
An approach to documenting and evolving architectural design decisions.
Software Modeling Techniques and the Semantic Web.
Encoding Program Executions.
1st international workshop on assurance cases for software-intensive systems (ASSURE 2013).
Experimental Evaluation of a Fuzzy-Set Based Measure of Software Correctness Using Program Mutation.
Augmented intelligence - The new AI - Unleashing human capabilities in knowledge work.
Inter-item Correlations among Function Points.
Information Hiding and Visibility in Interface Specifications.
Enabling a classroom design studio with a collaborative sketch design tool.
A roadmap for software maintainability measurement.
Calibrating the COCOMO II Post-Architecture Model.
Disengagement in pair programming: Does it matter?
Evidence-Based Software Engineering.
ConfDiagnoser: an automated configuration error diagnosis tool for Java software.
Parameter Value Computation by Least Square Method and Evaluation of Software Availability and Reliability at Service-Operation by the Hyper-Geometric Distribution Software Reliability Growth Model (HGDM).
Detecting deadlock in programs with data-centric synchronization.
Temporal code completion and navigation.
Call-Mark Slicing: An Efficient and Economical Way of Reducing Slice.
Software Architecture Classification for Estimating the Cost of COTS Integration.
ICSE 2003 Workshop on Software Architectures for Dependable Systems.
From Software Requirements to Architectures.
Workshop on the Intersection Between Databases and Software Engineering.
Automated repair of HTML generation errors in PHP applications using string constraint solving.
Search-based genetic optimization for deployment and reconfiguration of software in the cloud.
Analyzing Effects of Cost Estimation Accuracy on Quality and Productivity.
Modular string-sensitive permission analysis with demand-driven precision.
OPIUM: Optimal Package Install/Uninstall Manager.
The Effect of Modularization and Comments on Program Comprehension.
Diagnostic System for Distributed Software: A Relational Database Approach.
Verification support for workflow design with UML activity graphs.
Revisiting code ownership and its relationship with software quality in the scope of modern code review.
Predictors of customer perceived software quality.
Work practices and challenges in pull-based development: the contributor's perspective.
Ahaa --agile, hybrid assessment method for automotive, safety critical smes.
Time will tell: fault localization using time spectra.
How do centralized and distributed version control systems impact software changes?
Model-based performance testing.
Effects of defects in UML models: an experimental investigation.
A cross-program investigation of students' perceptions of agile methods.
Software Engineering for User Interfaces.
Quantitative Evaluation of Software Quality.
Spotting working code examples.
Reasoning about the correctness of software development process.
Design and implementation of a data analytics infrastructure in support of crisis informatics research.
Manual refactoring changes with automated refactoring validation.
Angelix: scalable multiline program patch synthesis via symbolic analysis.
Process Programming by Hindsight.
Challenges in the age of ubiquitous computing: a case study of T-Engine, an open development platform for embedded systems.
Improving the handsets network test process via DMAIC concepts.
Inconsistency management framework for model-based development.
Central Flow Control Software Development: A Case Study of the Effectiveness of Software Engineering Techniques.
Reverse Engineering Strategies for Software Migration (Tutorial).
A Model for Program Complexity Analysis.
BSR: a statistic-based approach for establishing and refining software process performance baseline.
Financially informed requirements prioritization.
Towards a taxonomy of software connectors.
Active Data Structures.
Collaborative teaching of globally distributed software development: community building workshop (CTGDSD 2011).
A Generalized Assertion Language.
A Component- and Message-Based Architectural Style for GUI Software.
Static detection of cross-site scripting vulnerabilities.
Towards overcoming human analyst fallibility in the requirements tracing process.
Using psycho-physiological measures to assess task difficulty in software development.
Debugging by asking questions about program output.
Publishing and composition of atomicity-equivalent services for B2B collaboration.
A Spiral Approach to Software Engineering Project Management Education.
The Experience Factory: How to Build and Run One (Tutorial).
The fourth international workshop on economics-driven software engineering research (EDSER-4).
A comparison of communication technologies to support novice team programming.
Second international workshop on software engineering for high performance computing system applications.
Ensemble of missing data techniques to improve software prediction accuracy.
A teamwork-based approach to programming fundamentals with scheme, smalltalk & java.
Cost-effective engineering of web applications pragmatic reuse: building web application product lines.
Experiments Determining Best Paths for Testing Computer Program Predicates.
Argo: A Design Environment for Evolving Software Architectures.
Workshop on multi-dimensional separation of concerns in software engineering.
User Perceived Quality of Interactive Systems.
Third ICSE workshop on software product lines: economics, architectures, and implications.
Feature-model interfaces: the highway to compositional analyses of highly-configurable systems.
Monitoring and control in scenario-based requirements analysis.
Efficient and precise dynamic impact analysis using execute-after sequences.
Specification of Abstract Data Types with Partially Defined Operations.
The effect of the number of inspectors on the defect estimates produced by capture-recapture models.
Tuple density: a new metric for combinatorial test suites.
Coverage-driven test code generation for concurrent classes.
Using the inverted classroom to teach software engineering.
Sufficient Tset Sets for Path Analysis Testing Strategies.
Verifying safety policies with size properties and alias controls.
Programmers' build errors: a case study (at google).
Workshop on flexible modeling tools: (FlexiTools 2011).
Why use the model driven architecture to design and build distributed applications?
Towards reusable components with aspects: an empirical study on modularity and obliviousness.
Automated design of self-adaptive software with control-theoretical formal guarantees.
Implications of Hardware Advances for Software Development.
Supporting Evolution and Maintenance by Using a Flexible Automatic Code Generator.
The FUJABA environment.
Goal-centric traceability for managing non-functional requirements.
A lightweight code analysis and its role in evaluation of a dependability case.
Some Results from an Empirical Study of Computer Software.
DeBOT - an approach for constructing high performance, scalable distributed object systems (poster).
An Architecture for Intelligent Assistance in Software Development.
Experience Report on Software Reuse Project: Its Structure, Activities, and Statistical Results.
A General Economics Model of Software Reuse.
Abstract Models of Dialogue Concepts.
A Model for Description of Communication Protocol.
Evaluating Software Technology (Tutorial).
Managing software artifacts on the Web with Labyrinth.
Analyze this! 145 questions for data scientists in software engineering.
Augmenting API documentation with insights from stack overflow.
Improvement of a configuration management system.
Methods for Improving Controlled Experimentation in Software Engineering.
Leveraging a Large Banking Organization to Object Technology.
Ensuring Integrity by Adding Obligations to Privileges.
Learning to adapt requirements specifications of evolving systems.
The SCR Method for Formally Specifying, Verifying, and Validating Requirements: Tool Support.
The making of a software engineer challenges for the educator.
Detecting performance anti-patterns for applications developed using object-relational mapping.
A declarative approach to enable flexible and dynamic service compositions.
Behavior Sampling: A Technique for Automated Retrieval of Reusable Components.
Aspects of Design, Test and Validation of the Software for a Computerized Reactor Protection System.
Behavior Modelling During Software Design.
The first international workshop on automation of software test.
Graphical animation of behavior models.
Feature cohesion in software product lines: an exploratory study.
Experimental program analysis: a new paradigm for program analysis.
A Data Structure and Drive Mechanism for a Table-Driven Simulation System Employing Multilevel Structural Representations of Digital Systems.
Testing-based interactive fault localization.
Feedback-directed instrumentation for deployed JavaScript applications.
Verification of Fairness in an Implementation of Monitors.
Characterizing the differences between pre- and post- release versions of software.
The influence of organizational structure on software quality: an empirical case study.
A Procedure for Designing Abstract Interfaces for Device Interface Modules.
Specifying and measuring quality in use (tutorial session).
Workshop on methods and techniques for softwaer architecture review and assessment (SARA).
Mining library specifications using inductive logic programming.
An intensional approach to the specification of test cases for database applications.
Taming reflection: Aiding static analysis in the presence of reflection and custom class loaders.
Type-aware concolic testing of JavaScript programs.
Understanding software application interfaces via string analysis.
A case study in root cause defect analysis.
Incremental Testing of Object-Oriented Class Structures.
Software Deviation Analysis.
Static analysis tools as early indicators of pre-release defect density.
Integrating adaptive user interface capabilities in enterprise applications.
Visualization of test information to assist fault localization.
Reverse Engineering of Legacy Code Exposed.
Is software education narrow-minded? A position paper.
Prioritizing Software Requirements in an Industrial Setting.
Language Features for Description of Cooperating Processes.
Signaling in Monitors.
Detecting differences across multiple instances of code clones.
Refactoring.
Scalable automatic linearizability checking.
Experience in teaching a software reengineering course.
Executable misuse cases for modeling security concerns.
Evaluation Criteria for Functional Specifications.
Learning API usages from bytecode: a statistical approach.
Palus: a hybrid automated test generation tool for java.
Some Classes of Naturally Provable Programs.
Managing the Development of Large Software Systems: Concepts and Techniques.
Specifying multithreaded Java semantics for program verification.
Controlled modeling environment using flexibly-formatted spreadsheets.
Miler: a toolset for exploring email data.
On Reliable Topologies for Computer Networks.
Tools for model-based security engineering.
The Multics System Programming Process.
The cyclefree methodology: a simple approach to building reliable, robust, real-time systems.
Software engineering for adaptive and self-managing systems.
Integrating static analysis and general-purpose theorem proving for termination analysis.
Perspectives of delegation in team-based distributed software development over the GENI infrastructure.
Validating Real-Time Systems by History-Checking TRIO Specifications.
Workshop description of 4th workshop on software quality (WOSQ).
On the limits of mutation reduction strategies.
Software Engineering in the Development of the TRIDENT Fire Control System.
Towards a Formal Semantics of Parnas Tables.
Software engineering 2004: ACM/IEEE-CS guidelines for undergraduate programs in software engineering.
Continuous testing in eclipse.
Estimation of project success using Bayesian classifier.
Programmer Performance and the Effects of the Workplace.
The Design of Whole-Program Analysis Tools.
Fault Localization Using Visualization of Test Information.
1st international workshop on conducting empirical studies in industry (CESI 2013).
Teaching developer skills in the first software engineering course.
A Component-Based Approach to Building Formal Analysis Tools.
Dual ecological measures of focus in software development.
Green mining: Investigating power consumption across versions.
Code Bubbles: A practical working-set programming environment.
Specification, Analysis, and Prototyping of Mobile Systems.
Application of Self-Adaptive techniques to federated authorization models.
Dynamic synthesis of local time requirement for service composition.
The Design of an Integrated, Interactive and Incremental Programming Environment.
A hands-on Java PathFinder tutorial.
EVOSS: A tool for managing the evolution of free and open source software systems.
Identifying failure inducing developer pairs within developer networks.
The First International Symposium on Constructing Software Engineering Tools (CoSET'99).
Detection of Duplicate Defect Reports Using Natural Language Processing.
POPT: a problem-oriented programming and testing approach for novice students.
Towards a federated cloud ecosystem (Invited industrial talk).
Precise Modeling of Design Patterns in UML.
Bug Hunt: Making Early Software Testing Lessons Engaging and Affordable.
Toward Computational Support for Software Process Improvement Activities.
Bringing the Systems Analysis and Design Course into 21^st Century: A Case Study in Implementing Modern Software Engineering Principles.
Toward new Techniques to Assess the Software Implementation Process.
Engineering and verifying requirements for programmable self-assembling nanomachines.
Precise Dynamic Slicing Algorithms.
Making sense of healthcare benefits.
Measuring the forensic-ability of audit logs for nonrepudiation.
SEMINAL: Software Engineering Using Metaheuristic INnovative Algorithms.
SemFix: program repair via semantic analysis.
Detecting spurious counterexamples efficiently in abstract model checking.
An Analysis of the Fault Correction Process in a Large-Scale SDL Production Model.
Assertional Reasoning about Pairwise Transient Interactions in Mobile Computing.
JIVE: Visualizing Java in Action Demonstration Description.
Workshop on Advanced Separation of Concerns in Software Engineering.
An Operating System Development: Windows 3 (Abstract).
Learning operational requirements from goal models.
A framework to evaluate software engineering student contests: evaluation and integration with academic programs.
ECSE Workshop on Software Visualization.
Discovering essential code elements in informal documentation.
ICSE Workshop on Software Variability Management.
Selecting checkpoints along the time line: a novel temporal checkpoint selection strategy for monitoring a batch of parallel business processes.
ConcernReCS: Finding code smells in software aspectization.
Design of Large-Scale Polylingual Systems.
Efficient construction of approximate call graphs for JavaScript IDE services.
MAS - An Interactive Synthesizer to Support Behavioral Modeling in UML.
Situational awareness: personalizing issue tracking systems.
Effective static deadlock detection.
Understanding regression failures through test-passing and test-failing code changes.
1st international workshop on the engineering of mobile-enabled systems (MOBS 2013).
Revisiting Statechart Synthesis with an Algebraic Approach.
Maintenance Support Tools for JAVA Programs: CCFinder and JAAT.
Evaluating Individual Contribution Toward Group Software Engineering Projects.
How we refactor, and how we know it.
Simulation-based abstractions for software product-line model checking.
OPSIS: A View Mechanism for Software Processes Which Supports Their Evolution and Reuse.
Hunting for smells in natural language tests.
An Effective Layout Adaptation Technique for a Graphical Modeling Tool.
Software Development Environments for Scientific and Engineering Software: A Series of Case Studies.
Identifying Feature Interactions in Multi-Language Aspect-Oriented Frameworks.
Improving Web Application Testing with User Session Data.
Industry involvement in ICT curriculum: a comparative survey.
An Architecture for Heterogeneous Groupware Applications.
A Language and Environment for Architecture-Based Software Development and Evolution.
Can Requirements Be Creative? Experiences with an Enhanced Air Space Management System.
Deciphering the story of software development through frequent pattern mining.
Agent System Development Method Based on Agent Patterns.
Information Needs in Collocated Software Development Teams.
Academic Software Engineering: What Is and What Could Be? Results of the First Annual Survey for International SE Programs.
A systematic study of automated program repair: Fixing 55 out of 105 bugs for $8 each.
Behavioral Analysis of Software Architectures Using LTSA.
Prototypes as Assets, not Toys: Why and How to Extract Knowledge from Prototypes.
Software Engineering for Large-Scale Multi-agent Systems - SELMAS'04.
Multi-label software behavior learning.
Software Evolution and ``light'' Semantics (Extended Abstract).
ReBucket: A method for clustering duplicate crash reports based on call stack similarity.
On The Supervision and Assessment Of Part-Time Postgraduate Software Engineering Projects.
Exploiting Smalltalk Modules in a Customizable Programming Environment.
Baseball Seasons and Dog Years.
Software Engineering Management.
Good Practices for Educational Software Engineering Projects.
Why did this code change?
An Exact Array Reference Analysis for Data Flow Testing.
Understanding and Predicting the Process of Software Maintenance Release.
ConcernLines: A timeline view of co-occurring concerns.
Survivability Analysis of Network Systems.
David L. Parnas Symposium.
Where do you go when you're through the turnstile?
Successfully Deliver Internet Applications Using Rapid Software Techniques.
Case Study: Extreme Programming in a University Environment.
Requirements modelling by synthesis of deontic input-output automata.
Towards the verification of multi-diagram UML models.
Supporting application development with structured queries in the cloud.
Architectural Modeling in Industry - An Experience Report.
An empirical study about the effectiveness of debugging when random test cases are used.
Succession: Measuring transfer of code and developer productivity.
MASH: A tool for end-user plug-in composition.
Increasing anomaly handling efficiency in large organizations using applied machine learning.
Engineering Mobile-Agent Applications via Context-Dependent Coordination.
Software Technology in an Automotive Company - Major Challenges.
Using mutation analysis for a model-clone detector comparison framework.
A Framework for Data Base Semantic Integrity.
An architectural style for high-performance asymmetrical parallel computations.
Third Time Charm: Stronger Replication of the Ability of Software Complexity Metrics to Predict Programmer Performance.
Software product lines: economics, architectures, and applications (workshop).
An Overview of the State of the Art in Software Architecture.
Software visualization.
The value of a usability-supporting architectural pattern in software architecture design: a controlled experiment.
DynAlloy: upgrading alloy with actions.
Specification patterns for probabilistic quality properties.
Software Engineering: Management, Personnel and Methodology.
An Interactive Debugger for a Concurrent Language.
Rubacon: automated support for model-based compliance engineering.
Distilling privacy requirements for mobile applications.
Daily build and feature development in large distributed projects.
Self-adaptation through incremental generative model transformations at runtime.
An Investigation into Coupling Measures for C++.
Theory-W Software Project Management: A Case Study.
Human and social factors of software engineering.
Second international workshop on web 2.0 for software engineering: (Web2SE 2011).
A Predictive Metric Based on Discriminant Statistical Analysis.
Functional Specification of Synchronized Processes Based on Modal Logic.
Pilot: A Software Engineering Case Study.
Improving software security with a C pointer analysis.
TINA ACE: An Environment for Specifying, Developing and Generating TINA Services.
Producing more reliable software: mature software engineering process vs. state-of-the-art technology?
Software Development with Executable Functional Specifications.
A Software Engineering Experience in the Management, Design and Implementation of A Data Secure System.
Distributed component technologies and their software engineering implications.
Towards Systems Engineering: A Personal View of Progress.
Fourth international workshop on software engineering for computational science and engineering: (SE-CSE2011).
Demeter: A Case Study of Software Growth through Parameterized Classes.
Software engineering at the speed of light: how developers stay current using twitter.
Estimating software component reliability by leveraging architectural models.
Automatic model generation from documentation for Java API functions.
A study of equivalent and stubborn mutation operators using human analysis of equivalence.
Quality experience: a grounded theory of successful agile projects without dedicated testers.
Call Path Profiling.
Experience applying the SPIN model checker to an industrial telecommunications system.
Automatically learning semantic features for defect prediction.
A Large System Evaluation of SREM.
Mining parametric specifications.
Symbolic execution for software testing in practice: preliminary assessment.
PROPEL: an approach supporting property elucidation.
System Support for Modular Order-Sorted Horn Clause Specifications.
Addressing crosscutting deployment and configuration concerns of distributed real-time and embedded systems via aspect-oriented & model-driven software development.
The role of a project-based capstone course.
Designing Distributed Applications with Mobile Code Paradigms.
Empirical validation of pair programming.
Validating the TAME Resource Data Model.
Third international workshop on principles of engineering service-oriented systems: (PESOS 2011).
Structural Models for Software Reliability Prediction.
Building it together: synchronous development in OSS.
The Design, Analysis, and Verification of the SIFT Fault-Tolerant System.
A practical guide for using statistical tests to assess randomized algorithms in software engineering.
Efficient large-scale trace checking using mapreduce.
Introduction to the experience reports track.
PDAS: An Assistant for Detailed Design and Implementation of Programs.
An Experimental Evaluation of Simple Methods for Seeding Program Errors.
A case study of open source software development: the Apache server.
Automatic Checking of Instruction Specifications.
Detecting software modularity violations.
Angelic debugging.
Termination-checking for LLVM peephole optimizations.
Locating faults through automated predicate switching.
Fluent-based web animation: exploring goals for requirements validation.
The first workshop on end-user software engineering.
A software architecture-based framework for highly distributed and data intensive scientific applications.
Rational quality requirements for medical software.
Measuring Memory Protection.
Aspect-oriented programming and modular reasoning.
Another View of Software (Panel).
Living assistance systems: an ambient intelligence approach.
Engineering safety-related requirements for software-intensive systems.
Integrating Forward and Reverse Object-Oriented Software Engineering.
Automated partitioning of android applications for trusted execution environments.
Progressive open source.
Interface Control and Incremental Development in the PIC Environment.
From models to code and back: correct-by-construction code from UML and ALF.
Automatic Method Refactoring Using Weighted Dependence Graphs.
Integrating Architecture Description Languages with a Standard Design Method.
Parallel Changes in Large Scale Software Development: An Observational Case Study.
ConTexter feedback system.
Guided test generation for web applications.
Industrial application of concolic testing approach: A case study on libexif by using CREST-BV and KLEE.
Calculating Architectural Reliability via Modeling and Analysis.
An Empirical Comparison of Dynamic Impact Analysis Algorithms.
Documenting Software Architectures: Views and Beyond.
Comparison of Software Product Line Architecture Design Methods: COPA, FAST, FORM, KobrA and QADA.
Leightweight Analysis of Operational Specifications Using Inference Graphs.
Quantifying the Costs and Benefits of Architectural Decisions.
Controller synthesis: from modelling to enactment.
Reuse Technologies and Their Niches.
Developing an architecture of a knowledge-based electronic patient record.
Normalizing source code vocabulary to support program comprehension and software quality.
GROPG: a graphical on-phone debugger.
Modeling and Analyzing software Architectures.
Using Process Technology to Control and Coordinate Software Adaptation.
Test confessions: A study of testing practices for plug-in systems.
On the Syllogistic Structure of Object-Oriented Programming.
Model-Based Security Engineering of Distributed Information Systems Using UMLsec.
An Empirical Study of Static Call Graph Extractors.
Online sharing and integration of results from mining software repositories.
Aspect: An Economical Bug-Detector.
On the naturalness of software.
SDiC: Context-based retrieval in Eclipse.
A Bi-Level Language for Software Process Modeling.
Validation of the Coupling Dependency Metric as a Predictor of Run-Time Failures and Maintenance Measures.
Dynamic and Selective Combination of Extensions in Component-Based Applications.
Automatically finding patches using genetic programming.
Software Process Improvement Experience in the DP/MIS Function: Experience Report.
Taming Dynamically Adaptive Systems using models and aspects.
Observable modified Condition/Decision coverage.
Using OCL-Queries for Debugging C++.
Locating need-to-translate constant strings for software internationalization.
iTree: Efficiently discovering high-coverage configurations using interaction trees.
An Assessment and Comparison of Common Software Cost Estimation Modeling Techniques.
Decoupling Synchronization from Local Control for Efficient Symbolic Model Checking of Statecharts.
A large scale exploratory analysis of software vulnerability life cycles.
ICSE Workshop on Remote Analysis and Measurement of Software Systems (RAMSS).
Role Migration and Advancement Processes in OSSD Projects: A Comparative Case Study.
Using Off-the-Shelf Middleware to Implement Connectors in Distributed Software Architectures.
Failure and Success Factors in Reuse Programs: A Synthesis of Industrial Experiences.
RADAR: a tool for debugging regression problems in C/C++ software.
WISE: Automated test generation for worst-case complexity.
Software Size Measurement and Productivity Rating in a Large-Scale Software Development Department.
Software Process Support over the Internet.
Reuse That Pays.
Using dynamic analysis to discover polynomial and array invariants.
Security testing of web applications: A research plan.
Ballerina: Automatic generation and clustering of efficient random unit tests for multithreaded code.
The LEAP Load and Test Driver.
Architectures and Technologies for Enterprise Application Integration.
What You See Is What You Test: A Methodology for Testing Form-Based Visual Programs.
Dynamically Discovering Likely Program Invariants to Support Program Evolution.
A Conceptual Programming Environment.
TestTube: A System for Selective Regression Testing.
Mining input sanitization patterns for predicting SQL injection and cross site scripting vulnerabilities.
Applying Template Meta-Programming Techniques for a Domain-Specific Visual Language-An Industrial Experience Report.
Lessons learned from 25 years of process improvement: the rise and fall of the NASA software engineering laboratory.
A Flexible Software Process Model.
The Prism Model of Changes.
The road not taken: Estimating path execution frequency statically.
Five days of empirical software engineering: The PASED experience.
Liberating pair programming research from the oppressive Driver/Observer regime.
COCOMO Evaluation and Tailoring.
Inferring class level specifications for distributed systems.
Modular Verification of Software Components in C.
2nd international workshop on green and sustainable software (GREENS 2013).
Broken sets in software repository evolution.
Reducing human effort and improving quality in peer code reviews using automatic static analysis and reviewer recommendation.
Good' Organisational Reasons for 'Bad' Software Testing: An Ethnographic Study of Testing in a Small Software Company.
Feature-Based Decomposition of Inductive Proofs Applied to Real-Time Avionics Software: An Experience Report.
Principled design of the modern Web architecture.
3rd international workshop on software engineering for automotive systems - SEAS 2006.
DEAS 2005: workshop on the design and evolution of autonomic application software.
Managing exceptions in the medical workflow systems.
Easing software component repository evolution.
Verification and change-impact analysis of access-control policies.
On the Role of an Environment.
Evaluation of a Software Requirements Document by Analysis of Change Data.
Stages in teaching software testing.
Product-Line Architectures in Industry: A Case Study.
Reuse vs. maintainability: revealing the impact of composition code properties.
HOLMES: Effective statistical debugging via efficient path profiling.
Team-Based Fault Content Estimation in the Software Inspection Process.
The Role of Testing Methodologies in Open Systems Standards: A POSIX Experience Report.
1st international workshop on data analysis patterns in software engineering (DAPSE 2013).
Integrating Obstacles in Goal-Driven Requirements Engineering.
CLIME: An Environment for Constrained Evolution Demonstration Description.
A Process for Consolidating and Reusing Design Knowledge.
Why Can't They Create Architecture Models Like "Developer X"? An Experience Report.
Using Event-Based Translation to Support Dynamic Protocol Evolution.
CHIME: Customizable Hyperlink Insertion and Maintenance Engine for Software Engineering Environments.
Compositional Verification of Middleware-Based Software Architecture Descriptions.
Trends in object-oriented software evolution: Investigating network properties.
New Directions on Agile Methods: A Comparative Analysis.
Supporting extract class refactoring in Eclipse: The ARIES project.
CASE at the Start of the 1990's.
Configuration Management with Logical Structures.
How do professional developers comprehend software?
Reusing Single System Requirements from Application Family Requirements.
Bridging the divide between software developers and operators using logs.
Techniques for Trusted Software Engineering.
A framework for managing cloned product variants.
Holmes: An Intelligent System to Support Software Product Line Development.
Very-Large Scale Code Clone Analysis and Visualization of Open Source Programs Using Distributed CCFinder: D-CCFinder.
Model translations among big-step modeling languages.
Designing Components Versus Objects: A Transformational Approach.
Sequential Circuits for Relational Analysis.
Supporting swift reaction: automatically uncovering performance problems by systematic experiments.
An integrated bug processing framework.
Techies as Non-Technological Factors in Software Engineering?
NavClus: a graphical recommender for assisting code exploration.
Simplifying Data Integration: The Design of the Desert Software Development Environment.
Automated Generation of Context-Aware Tests.
Architecting in the Face of Uncertainty: An Experience Report.
The Evaluation of Large, Complex UML Analysis and Design Model.
Fostering software quality assessment.
Departures from optimality: understanding human analyst's information foraging in assisted requirements tracing.
Distributed development considered harmful?
Managing by the Numbers: A Tutorial on Quantitative Measurement and Control of software Projects.
Monitoring Compliance of a Software System with Its High-Level Design Models.
Enabling dynamic metamodels through constraint-driven modeling.
On extracting unit tests from interactive live programming sessions.
CodeWeb: Data Mining Library Reuse Patterns.
Design and Evaluation of a Diagrammatic Notation to Aid in the Understanding of Concurrency Concepts.
Active code completion.
The role of domain knowledge and cross-functional communication in socio-technical coordination.
A generic methodology to derive domain-specific performance feedback for developers.
Panel: Issues in Software Engineering for Survivable Systems.
Software Engineering Challenges in Bioinformatics.
BabelRef: Detection and renaming tool for cross-language program entities in dynamic web applications.
Integrating tools and frameworks in undergraduate software engineering curriculum.
XML Technologies and Software Engineering.
A framework for self-healing software systems.
SAAM: A Method for Analyzing the Properties of Software Architectures.
The Ramp-Up Problem in Software Projects: A Case Study of How Software Immigrants Naturalize.
Axis: Automatically fixing atomicity violations through solving control constraints.
Usability Implications of Requiring Parameters in Objects' Constructors.
Segmented symbolic analysis.
Statistical Techniques for Software Engineering Practice.
Position Statement.
Functional Paleontology: System Evolution as the User Sees It.
Service networks for development communities.
Moving mobile applications between mobile devices seamlessly.
Beyond boolean product-line model checking: dealing with feature attributes and multi-features.
From Scenarios to Code: An Air Traffic Control Case Study.
A Conceptual Model of Software Maintenance.
Designing Software for Use by Humans, not Machines.
4th international workshop on emerging trends in software metrics (WETSoM 2013).
Robust reconfigurations of component assemblies.
A learning-based method for combining testing techniques.
A case-study on using an Automated In-process Software Engineering Measurement and Analysis system in an industrial environment.
An Object-Oriented Implementation of B-ISDN Signalling - Part 2: Extendability Stands the Test.
Assessing Software Libraries by Browsing Similar Classes, Functions and Relationships.
Energy aware self-adaptation in mobile systems.
Ethical Considerations in Software Engineering.
Avoiding Packaging Mismatch with Flexible Packaging.
A Systematic Approach to Domain-Oriented Software Development.
Creating a shared understanding of testing culture on a social coding site.
Human performance regression testing.
Behavioral validation of JFSL specifications through model synthesis.
CBCD: Cloned buggy code detector.
Using the ASTRAL Model Checker to Analyze Mobile IP.
Ownership and Immutability Inference for UML-Based Object Access Control.
Applying ISO 9001: 2000, MPS.BR and CMMI to Achieve Software Process Maturity: BL Informatica's Pathway.
6th ICSE Workshop on Component-Based Software Engineering: Automated Reasoning and Prediction.
Forcing Behavioral Subtyping through Specification Inheritance.
International Workshop on Software Transformation Systems (STS'99).
Supporting incremental programming with ghosts.
2nd International Workshop on Living with Inconsistency.
Designing Data Entry Programs Using State Diagram as a Common Model.
Automating test automation.
Mitigating the obsolescence of specification models of service-based systems.
Systematically selecting a software module during opportunistic reuse.
Synthesis of event-based controllers: A software engineering challenge.
Semantic smells and errors in access control models: a case study in PHP.
TranStrL: An automatic need-to-translate string locator for software internationalization.
Consistency Management for Complex Applications.
Automated analysis of CSS rules to support style maintenance.
Extracting Concepts from File Names: A New File Clustering Criterion.
Understanding the impact of Pair Programming on developers attention: A case study on a large industrial experimentation.
How, and why, process metrics are better.
Statically checking API protocol conformance with mined multi-object specifications.
Documentation for Safety Critical Software.
Evaluating the specificity of text retrieval queries to support software engineering tasks.
Toddler: detecting performance problems via similar memory-access patterns.
Experiences with an Environment Generation System.
2nd international workshop on realizing artificial intelligence synergies in software engineering (RAISE 2013).
On the Impact of a Collaborative Pedagogy on African American Millennial Students in Software Engineering.
3rd international workshop on developing tools as plug-ins (TOPI 2013).
Spotlight: A Prototype Tool for Software Plans.
Separating Features in Source Code: An Exploratory Study.
Evolving Legacy Systems Using Feature Engineering and CBSE.
Beyond the Personal Software Process: Metrics collection and analysis for the differently disciplined.
SoQueT: Query-Based Documentation of Crosscutting Concerns.
Pricing crowdsourcing-based software development tasks.
Fault comprehension for concurrent programs.
Practical Software Measurement.
Conceptual Module Querying for Software Reengineering.
Tool-Supported Program Abstraction for Finite-State Verification.
...And Nothing Else Changes: The Frame Problem in Procedure Specifications.
Feedback-driven requirements engineering: The Heuristic Requirements Assistant.
Development of Object Oriented Frameworks for Spatio-Temporal Information systems.
Software systems as cities: a controlled experiment.
Everything you Need To Know About Collaboration and Collaboration Software.
Calculation and Use of an Environment's Characteristic Software Metric Set.
Tracing architecturally significant requirements: a decision-centric approach.
Too long; didn't watch!: extracting relevant fragments from software development video tutorials.
Design Using Software Engineering Principles: Overview of an Educational Program.
Tailoring OMT for an Industry Software Project.
Assessing undergraduate experience of continuous integration and test-driven development.
Preventing SQL injection attacks using AMNESIA.
Five years of product line engineering in a small company.
Dependability of embedded systems.
Workshop on software engineering for cloud computing: (SECLOUD 2011).
DoubleTake: fast and precise error detection via evidence-based dynamic analysis.
Computational alignment of goals and scenarios for complex systems.
An Analytical Comparison of the Fault-Detecting Ability of Data Flow Testing Techniques.
Verification and Validation of Requirements for Mission Critical Systems.
Using Simulation to Build Inspection Efficiency Benchmarks for Development Projects.
FlexSync: An aspect-oriented approach to Java synchronization.
Generalizing Perspective-Based Inspection to Handle Object-Oriented Development Artifacts.
Static Checking of Dynamically Generated Queries in Database Applications.
Characterizing logging practices in open-source software.
A Framework for Multi-Valued Reasoning over Inconsistent Viewpoints.
Investigating the Cost-Effectiveness of Reinspections in Software Development.
A Constructivist Approach to Teaching Software Processes.
Hiding Distribution in Distributed Systems.
When open source turns cold on innovation - The challenges of navigating licensing complexities in new research domains.
Specification and Modeling: An Industrial Perspective.
Methodology for migration of long running process instances in a global large scale BPM environment in Credit Suisse's SOA landscape.
Software Reuse - Facts and Myths.
Workshop on Software Engineering and computer-Human Interaction: Joint Research Issues.
Automatic dimension inference and checking for object-oriented programs.
Composition Patterns: An Approach to Designing Reusable Aspects.
Non-Intrusive Object Introspection in C++: Architecture and Application.
Managing Impacts of Security Protocol Changes in Service-Oriented Applications.
Exploring the internal state of user interfaces by combining computer vision techniques with grammatical inference.
How much does unused code matter for maintenance?
RECAST: Reverse Engineering from COBOL to SSADM Specification.
Software Reuse: is it delivering?
Programming Heterogeneous Transactions for Software Development Environments.
It's not a bug, it's a feature: how misclassification impacts bug prediction.
Towards flexible evolution of Dynamically Adaptive Systems.
Design Pattern Rationale Graphs: Linking Design to Source.
Exploring Dataflow Testing of Arrays.
System Acquisition Based on Software Product Assessment.
Software Improvements in an International Company.
System-Dependence-Graph-Based Slicing of Programs with Arbitrary Interprocedural Control Flow.
CloneDetective - A workbench for clone detection research.
Educating Software Engineering Students to Manage Risk.
Privacy and utility for defect prediction: Experiments with MORPH.
Architecture, Design, Implementation.
3rd international workshop on collaborative teaching of globally distributed software development (CTGDSD 2013).
Linux as a Case Study: Its Extracted Software Architecture.
An Instrumented Approach to Improving Software Quality Through Formal Technical Review.
Augmenting SADT to Develop Computer Support for Cooperative Work.
ViewPoints: meaningful relationships are difficult!
CEL: modeling everywhere.
Use of an Environment Classification Model.
Non-Technological Issues in Software Engineering.
2nd international workshop on software engineering challenges for the smart grid (SE4SG 2013).
Practical Software Measurement.
Tracking Code Clones in Evolving Software.
1st Workshop on Open Source Software Engineering.
A Leveled Examination of Test-Driven Development Acceptance.
Teaching software process modeling.
m-EVES: A Tool for Verifying Software.
Directions in Software Engineering Education.
The International Symposium on Software Engineering for Parallel and Distributed Systems PDSE'99.
A Systematic Survey of CMM Experience and Results.
Using KIDS as a Tool Support for VDM.
Reuse-Driven Interprocedural Slicing.
Commitment Development in Software Process Improvement: Critical Misconceptions.
Predicate-Based Test Generation for Computer Programs.
Company-Wide Implementation of Metrics for Early Software Fault Detection.
Tolerating Inconsistency.
WitchDoctor: IDE support for real-time auto-completion of refactorings.
On-demand test suite reduction.
An Intelligent Tool for Re-Engineering Software Modularity.
An automated approach to generating efficient constraint solvers.
UML in practice.
Requirements Discovery during the Testing of Safety-Critical Software.
Efficient Authoring of Software Documentation Using RaPiD7.
4th international workshop on product LinE approaches in software engineering (PLEASE 2013).
GraPacc: A graph-based pattern-oriented, context-sensitive code completion tool.
Combining functional and imperative programming for multicore software: An empirical study evaluating Scala and Java.
On the relationships between domain-based coupling and code clones: an exploratory study.
A case for human-driven software development.
Prototyping in Industrial Software Projects - Bridging the Gap Between Theory and Practice.
Predicting faults using the complexity of code changes.
Approach and Case Study of Requirement Analysis Where End Users Take an Active Role.
Software Process Maturity: Measuring Its Impact on Productivity and Quality.
Predicting bug-fixing time: an empirical study of commercial software projects.
FeatureIDE: A tool framework for feature-oriented software development.
Case Studies for Software Engineers.
4th international workshop on software engineering for sensor network applications (SESENA 2013).
Cleanroom Software Engineering for Zero-Defect Software.
Haemo Dialysis Software Architecture Design Experiences.
Process engineering with Spearmint
GuideArch: guiding the exploration of architectural solution space under uncertainty.
An evaluation of interactive test-driven labs with WebIDE in CS0.
Journey of enlightenment: the evolution of development at Microsoft.
Responsibilities and Rewards: Specifying Design Patterns.
A Case Study of the Evolution of Jun: An Object-Oriented Open-Source 3D Multimedia Library.
ICSE 2003 Workshop on Software Engineering for High Assurance Systems: Synergies between Process, Product, and Profiling (SEHAS 2003).
Certification-based development of critical systems.
Comparing multi-point stride coverage and dataflow coverage.
Declarative Visualization in the Shared Dataspace Paradigm.
Scientific Rigour, an Answer to a Pragmatic Question: A Linguistic Framework for Software Engineering.
Parallel Randomized State-Space Search.
Information needs for software development analytics.
Data Flow Testing as Model Checking.
Sketching software in the wild.
An Empirical Study of Regression Test Selection Techniques.
Mining exception-handling rules as sequence association rules.
Engineering an "Open" Client/Server-Platform for a Distributed Austrian Alpine Road-Pricing System in 240 Days: Case Study and Experience Report.
Agile Process Tailoring and probLem analYsis (APTLY).
Metadata invariants: Checking and inferring metadata coding conventions.
Modeling Software for Accurate Data Flow Representation.
Experience with Performing Architecture Tradeoff Analysis.
Stack layout transformation: Towards diversity for securing binary programs.
Automated testing of GUI applications: models, tools, and controlling flakiness.
Egidio: A non-invasive approach for synthesizing organizational models.
Feedback-Directed Random Test Generation.
Report on the ICSE 2003 Doctoral Symposium.
The RMT (Recursive Multi-Threaded) Tool: A Computer Aided Software Engineering Tool for Monitoring and Predicting Software Development Progress.
Supporting Program Comprehension Using Semantic and Structural Information.
Must There Be So Few? Including Women in CS.
Building high assurance secure applications using security patterns for capability-based platforms.
Using the GPGPU for scaling up Mining Software Repositories.
Process Design Engineering: A Methodology for Real-Time Software Development.
Tools for Real-Time System Design.
Asking and answering questions about unfamiliar APIs: An exploratory study.
ICSE Workshop on Dynamic Analysis (WODA 2003).
A Standard Software Application Development: SAP R/3 (Abstract).
On the analysis of evolution of software artefacts and programs.
The co-evolution of socio-technical structures in sustainable software development: Lessons from the open source software communities.
Supporting Industrial Hyperwebs: Lessons in Scalability.
Top SE: Educating Superarchitects Who Can Apply Software Engineering Tools to Practical Development in Japan.
Model Processing Tools in UML.
Software Variability Management.
An Experiment to Assess Different Defect Detection Methods for Software Requirements Inspections.
Verifying client-side input validation functions using string analysis.
Source Viewer 3D (sv3D) - A Framework for Software Visualization.
Performance regression testing target prioritization via performance risk analysis.
Introducng a software modeling concept in a medium-sized company.
Sufficient mutation operators for measuring test effectiveness.
Diagnosing new faults using mutants and prior faults.
SDA: A Novel Approach to Software Environment Design and Construction.
The implication of different learning styles on the modeling of object-oriented systems (poster).
FormulaBuilder: a tool for graph-based modelling and generation of formulae.
Automated Software Engineering Through Structured Data Management (Abstract).
DySy: dynamic symbolic execution for invariant inference.
An Approach to Error-Resistant Software Design.
Engineering the software requirements of nonprofits: a service-learning approach.
Problem identification for structural test generation: first step towards cooperative developer testing.
Cross-checking oracles from intrinsic software redundancy.
Case studies and tools for contract specifications.
Experience Using the Graphite Meta-Tool (Experience Report).
Design Considerations in Language Processing Tools for Ada.
A Survey of Object Oriented Analysis and Design Methods (Tutorial).
Design and Principles of a Fault Tolerant System.
Object model resurrection - an object oriented maintenance activity.
Dynamic Software Engineering: An Evolutionary Approach to Automated Software Development and Management.
A research agenda for distributed software development.
Influence of social and technical factors for evaluating contribution in GitHub.
Prism = Methodology + Process-oriented Environment.
DUAL: An Interactive Tool for Developing Documented Programs by Step-Wise Refinements.
Inference of message sequence charts.
The Design of Data Type Specifications.
The American law institute's principles on software contracts and their ramifications for software engineering research.
Fixing deadlocks via lock pre-acquisitions.
An Algebraic Data Type Specification Language and Its Rapid Prototyping Environment.
Software needs engineering: a position paper.
Software Evolution through Iterative Prototyping.
Hybrid domain representation archive (HyDRA) for requirements model synthesis across viewpoints (poster).
Software Development Process from Natural Language Specification.
Error Recovery in Systems of Communicating Processes.
Building domain specific software architectures from software architectural design patterns.
Analyzing Partially-Implemented Real-Time Systems.
Evaluating Software Development Environments.
The echo approach to formal verification.
Tutorial: an overview of UML 2.
Predicting defects using network analysis on dependency graphs.
Beyond computer science.
Check 'n' crash: combining static checking and testing.
A Principle for Resilient Sharing of Distributed Resources.
The State of Software Engineering Practice: A Preliminary Report.
E-Slate: a software architectural style for end-user programming.
Configuring Designs for Reuse.
Reporting about industrial strength software engineering courses for undergraduates.
Finding and analyzing compiler warning defects.
The Second ISEW Cleanroom Workshop.
FAST: A Second Generation Program Analysis System.
Dat Flow, Abstraction Levels and Specifications for Communications Switching Systems.
Specification mining in concurrent and distributed systems.
Code coverage for suite evaluation by developers.
An Object-Oriented Modeling Method for Algebraic Specifications in CafeOBJ.
Prospects for Future Environments: Introduction to Panel Session.
A case study evaluation of maintainability and performance of persistency techniques.
Understanding understanding source code with functional magnetic resonance imaging.
Beyond ALBE/P: Language Neutral Form.
VDTest: an automated framework to support testing for virtual devices.
JunGL: a scripting language for refactoring.
ICSE 2011 technical briefings.
Flexible generators for software reuse and evolution.
Application of Clustering to Estimate Missing Data and Improve Data Integrity.
On the Modelling, Analysis and Design of Protocols - A Special Class of Software Structures.
Us and them: a study of privacy requirements across north america, asia, and europe.
Software Development and Proofs of Multi-Level Security.
Alternate refactoring paths reveal usability problems.
Applying model-based testing to healthcare products: preliminary experiences.
Workshop on cooperative and human aspects of software engineering: (CHASE 2011).
Information systems architecture.
Advanced control flows for flexible graphical user interfaces: or, growing GUIs on trees or, bookmarking GUIs.
An Improved Process for the Development of PLC Software (Experience Report).
Language and Visualization Support for Large-Scale Concurrency.
Automated refactoring to introduce design patterns.
GRAIL/KAOS: An Environment for Goal-Driven Requirements Engineering.
Ten Years Experiences of a Software/Hardware Producing Environment.
The TRW Software Productivity System.
Reuse-oriented reverse engineering of functional components from x86 binaries.
Missing data imputation based on low-rank recovery and semi-supervised regression for software effort estimation.
Visualizing Interactions in Program Executions.
ICSE 2002 workshop on architecting dependable systems.
Development of Computer Programs by Problem Analysis Diagram (PAD).
Decoupling level: a new metric for architectural maintenance complexity.
MT-Scribe: an end-user approach to automate software model evolution.
A System for Classifying Program Verification Methods: Assigning Meanings to Program Verification Methods.
Thoughts on Software Engineering.
Improving the customer configuration update process by explicitly managing software knowledge.
Crowdsourcing program preconditions via a classification game.
Quickly detecting relevant program invariants.
Network abstractions for context-aware mobile computing.
Automated test suite generation for time-continuous simulink models.
Remembrances of a Graduate Student.
Brownout: building more robust cloud applications.
Configuration Control for Evolutional Software Products.
Impact of software resource estimation research on practice: a preliminary report on achievements, synergies, and challenges.
A Model for the Reuse of Software Design Information.
Code coverage analysis in practice for large systems.
Assessing COTS integration risk using cost estimation inputs.
Software Engineering in Avionics Applications.
Workshop on software quality.
ISPW5: Experience with Software Process Models (Workshop Report).
Uncertainty, risk, and information value in software requirements and architecture.
Live API documentation.
Decision Table Programming and Reliability.
Software engineering for secure systems.
A System to Improve incorrect Programs.
Testing for Linear Errors in Nonlinear Computer Programs.
Recording the Reasons for Design Decisions.
A User Interface for Online Assistance.
Mining software repositories using topic models.
Modeling Mutation on a Vector Processor.
Is 'Sometime' Sometimes Better Than 'Always'? Intermittent Assertions in Proving Program Correctness.
Four enhancements to automateddistributed system experimentation methods.
Reengineering legacy software products into software product line based on automatic variability analysis.
A Comparison of Four Design Methods for Real-Time Systems.
Rigi: A Visualization Environment for Reverse Engineering.
SORASCS: a case study in soa-based platform design for socio-cultural analysis.
An Error Complexity Model for Software Reliability Measurement.
Identifying method friendships to remove the feature envy bad smell.
BOOTSTRAP: Four Years of Assessment Experience.
Characterization of risky projects based on project managers' evaluation.
Addressing software dependability with statistical and machine learning techniques.
Dictionary learning based software defect prediction.
Tracking data structures for postmortem analysis.
A Requirements and Design Aid for Relational Data Bases.
Enriching software engineering courses with service-learning projects and the open-source approach.
Productivity Analysis of Software Development with an Integrated CASE Tool.
Dynamic detection of atomic-set-serializability violations.
Third workshop on software quality.
Specifying Software/Hardware Interactions in Distributed Systems.
A tool for analyzing and detecting malicious mobile code.
Leveraging software architectures to guide and verify the development of sense/compute/control applications.
Information Systems: Modelling, Sequencing and Transformations.
Toolpack - An Experimental Software Development Environment Research Project.
Human-Computer Communication Meets Software Engineering.
The Evolution of Technology Transfer at MCC's Software Technology Program: From Didactic to Dialectic.
Software architectures for dependable systems: a software engineering perspective.
Answering conceptual queries with Ferret.
Incremental consistency checking for pervasive context.
Covana: precise identification of problems in pex.
Active Design Reviews: Principles and Practices.
Position Paper on Technology Transfer.
Osprey: a practical type system for validating dimensional unit correctness of C programs.
Using software evolution history to facilitate development and maintenance.
AntMiner: mining more bugs by reducing noise interference.
Web service orchestration with BPEL.
Trusted Computing Systems: The ProCoS Experience.
An empirical evaluation of fault-proneness models.
A Comparison of the Use of Links and Secondary Indices in a Relational Data Base System.
An empirical evaluation of test case filtering techniques based on exercising complex information flows.
Workshop Summary: Process Modelling and Empirical Studies of Software Evolution.
Rethinking the Taxonomy of Fault Detection Techniques.
Distributed Software Architectures (Tutorial).
SEREBRO: facilitating student project team collaboration.
Instructional design and assessment strategies for teaching global software development: a framework.
An Engineering Methodology for Presenting Software Functional Architecture.
Overcoming open source project entry barriers with a portal for newcomers.
Change management: from knowledge about innovative SE to capabilities for industrial SE projects.
Software and Business Process Technology (Tutorial).
The challenges of staying together while moving fast: an exploratory study.
Productivity Factors and Programming Environments.
Improving test suites for efficient fault localization.
Fourth international workshop on dynamic analysis (WODA 2006).
Research Towards a technology to Support the Specification of Data Processing System Performance Requirements.
GENOA: A Customizable Language- and Front-End Independent Code Analyzer.
The Role of Software in Successful Computer Applications.
Multi-objective software effort estimation.
Early Specification of User-Interfaces: Toward a Formal Approach.
Some Experience in Building Portable Software.
SRE: A Knowledge-Based Environment for Large-Scale Software Re-Engineering Activities.
Software component models.
Automatic Tuning of Multi-Task Programs for Real-Time Embedded Systems.
Data analytics for game development.
Resource = Abstract Data Type + Synchronization - A Methodology for Message Oriented Programming.
Generating statechart designs from scenarios.
Systems engineering: an essential engineering discipline for the 21st century.
Precise identification of problems for structural test generation.
Towards efficient optimization in package management systems.
Experiences with Mirth: an open source health care integration engine.
CREWW: collaborative requirements engineering with wii-remotes.
On the Assessment of Safety-Critical Software Systems.
Path Expressions in Pascal.
Sketching tools for ideation.
On the Influence of Scale in a Distributed System.
Bandera: extracting finite-state models from Java source code.
Behavioral log analysis with statistical guarantees.
Concern graphs: finding and describing concerns using structural program dependencies.
Endeavors: A Process System Infrastructure.
Towards quantitative software reliability assessment in incremental development processes.
Multi-Level Specification and Verification of Real-Time Software.
Using impact analysis in industry.
Recent Advances in Software Measurement (Abstract for Talk).
Verification System for Formal Requirements Description.
Beyond templates: a study of clones in the STL and some general implications.
An infrastructure for development of object-oriented, multi-level configuration management services.
The strength of random search on automated program repair.
Interform: A CAD System for Program Development.
Designing and analyzing software architectures using ABASs (tutorial session).
Application of Software Reliability Modeling to Product Quality and Test Process.
Communication System Design Using Ada.
Fourth workshop on refactoring tools: (WRT 2011).
Conducting empirical software engineering research in Nigeria: the posing problems.
The Evolution of Programs: Program Abstraction and Instantiation.
Architecture-centric software engineering.
Teaching framework for software development methods.
Software engineering for large-scale multi-agent systems: SELMAS'2002.
Algebraic Specification of Macintosh's Quickdraw Using OBJ2.
An Extensible File System for Hydra.
A Discriminant Metric for Module Cohersion.
Empirical assessment of MDE in industry.
Automated memory leak detection for production use.
A software behaviour analysis framework based on the human perception systems.
Automatic generation and maintenance of correct spreadsheets.
Assurance patterns for distributed real-time embedded systems.
Micro execution.
Evolve: tool support for architecture evolution.
Structuring Criteria for Real Time System Design.
FM 89: Assessment of Formal Methods for Trustworthy Computer Systems (Workshop Report).
Multivariate visualization in observation-based testing.
Visualizing software release histories with 3DSoftVis.
Assessing Software Review Meetings: A Controlled Experimental Study Using CSRS.
An integrated cost model for software reuse.
LtRules: an automated software library usage rule extraction tool.
Incremental state-space exploration for programs with dynamically allocated data.
Coordination contracts for Java applications.
Steps to an Advanced Ada Programming Environment.
Experiences in assessing product family software architecture for evolution.
Manipulating Recovered Software Architecture Views.
An empirical study on decision making in off-the-shelf component-based development.
Specification and Verification of Distributed Systems Using PROLOG Interpreded Petri Nets.
A Measure for Composite Module Cohesion.
LIME: a framework for debugging load imbalance in multi-threaded execution.
Criteria for Software Modularization.
TASK Forces: Distributed Software for Solving Problems of Substantial Size.
The Inscape Environment.
Formalizing and Integrating the Dynamic Model within OMT.
Featured model-based mutation analysis.
Assessing Modular Structure of Legacy Code Based on Mathematical Concept Analysis.
Predicting accurate and actionable static analysis warnings: an experimental approach.
The First International Workshop on Automated Program Analysis, Testing and Verification.
Consistency Checking within Embedded Design Languages.
The Persistent Store as an Enabling Technology for Integrated Project Support.
Software Technology Maturation.
A Study on the Failure Intensity of Different Software Faults.
Value-based program characterization and its application to software plagiarism detection.
An Examination of Evolution Dynamics.
Reengineering standalone C++ legacy systems into the J2EE partition distributed environment.
Nitpick: A Tool for Interactive Design Analysis.
Integrated Program Measurement and Documentation Tools.
Third international workshop on search-driven development: users, infrastructure, tools, and evaluation (SUITE 2011).
Toward a framework for detecting privacy policy violations in android application code.
The Dimensions of Healthy Maintenance.
An Interactive FORTRAN Structuring Aid.
XS-1: An Integrated Interactive System and Its Kernel.
Is mutation an appropriate tool for testing experiments?
Use of Software Engineering Tools in Japan.
Software engineering economics: background, current practices, and future directions.
Specifying and Proving Properties of Sentinel Processes.
An interactive multimedia software house simulation for postgraduate software engineers.
Nomen est omen: exploring and exploiting similarities between argument and parameter names.
Constructing Multi-Formalism State-Space Analysis Tools: Using Rules to Specify Dynamic Semantics of Models.
Third international workshop on dynamic analysis(WODA 2005).
Sixth international workshop on traceability in emerging forms of software engineering: (TEFSE 2011).
On A Systematic Approach to the Development and Validation of Critical Software for Nuclear Power Plants.
Analyzing model evolution.
Experience with Application of Modern Software Management Controls.
Documentation Tools and Techniques.
Safety Verification in Murphy Using Fault Tree Analysis.
Matching logic: a new program verification approach.
Spiral development of software-intensive systems of systems.
SPADES - A Specification and Design System and Its Graphical Interface.
The Effects of Symbology and Spatial Arrangement on the Comprehension of Software Specifications.
Practical change impact analysis based on static program slicing for industrial software systems.
A Realistic, Commercially Robust Process for the Development of Object-Oriented Software Systems (Tutorial).
HFP: A Hierarchical and Functional Programming Based on Attribute Grammar.
Program Slicing.
Invariants for Specifications.
A Method of Large-Scale Software Development.
First workshop on developing tools as plug-ins: (TOPI 2011).
Automating bug report assignment.
On-demand feature recommendations derived from mining public product descriptions.
Trading robustness for maintainability: an empirical study of evolving c# programs.
Research Directions in Software Technology.
Software engineering for undergraduates.
Exploiting hardware advances for software testing and debugging.
Topes: reusable abstractions for validating data.
3rd workshop on software engineering over the Internet.
The software engineering of agent-based intelligent adaptive systems.
Software Engineering: As it was in 1968.
Inconsistent path detection for XML IDEs.
Frequency and risks of changes to clones.
Pragmatic reuse in web application development.
High-Level Specification of Concurrency Control in Distributed Database Systems.
Sound methods and effective tools for model-based security engineering with UML.
Theoretical and Empirical Studies of Program Testing.
Visualizing and Querying Software Structures.
Automatic extraction of abstract-object-state machines from unit-test executions.
Using (bio)metrics to predict code quality online.
An end-user demonstration approach to support aspect-oriented modeling.
Fuzzy set-based automatic bug triaging.
A study of ripple effects in software ecosystems.
Program Refinement by Transsformation.
The challenges of software engineering education.
Design and implementation of the software architecture for a 3-D reconstruction system in medical imaging.
Introducing the puLSE approach to an embedded system population at testo AG.
The Synthesis of Structure Changing Programs.
MAP: A Tool for Understanding Software.
Agile methods: moving towards the mainstream of the software industry.
Model-driven engineering practices in industry.
Metrics for model driven requirements development.
Search-enhanced testing.
Symbolic model checking of software product lines.
Teaching human aspects of software engineering.
Evolution in the Design of Abstract Machines for Software Portability.
Action Language: a specification language for model checking reactive systems.
Negotiation Behavior During Requirements Specification.
Introducing Formal Specification Methods in Industrial Practice.
None
A Meta-Model for Software Development Resource Expenditures.
Using Raddle To Design Distributed Systems.
Camouflage: automated anonymization of field data.
An Object-Oriented Testing and Maintenance Environment.
Software Templates.
The community workblench.
Effect of Test Set Minimization on Fault Detection Effectiveness.
Is spreadsheet ambiguity harmful? detecting and repairing spreadsheet smells due to ambiguous computation.
Towards aspect weaving applications.
The Use of a Module Interconnection Specification Capability in the SARA System Design Methodology.
Software test program: a software residency experience.
Parameterized Programming in OBJ2.
Semantics-based reverse engineering of object-oriented data models.
Characterizing and Assessing a Large-Scale Software Maintenance Organization.
aComment: mining annotations from comments and code to detect interrupt related concurrency bugs.
The Design of the PSI Program Synthesis System.
How to Measure Software Reliability, and How Not To.
Improving open source software patch contribution process: methods and tools.
Dealing with Non-Functional Requirements: Three Experimental Studies of a Process-Oriented Approach.
A New Software Project Simulator Based on Generalized Stochastic Petri-net.
A Decision-Based Configuration Process Model.
The lazy initialization multilayered modeling framework.
A Laboratory for the Development and Evaluation of BMD Software Quality Enhancement Techniques.
On Building Software Process Models Under the Lamppost.
Blending freeform and managed information in tables.
Characterizing and Modeling the Cost of Rework in a Library of Reusable Software Components.
Programming at the Processor-Memory-Switch Level.
Validating System Requirements by Functional Decomposition and Dynamic Analysis.
Software Process Modeling: A Behavioral Approach.
STATEMATE; A Working Environment for the Development of Complex Reactive Systems.
A study on exception detecton and handling using aspect-oriented programming.
Observations on the Interaction Between Coding and Efficiency Knowledge in the PSI Program Synthesis System.
Automatic generation of rule-based software configuration management systems.
Symbolic model checking of declarative relational models.
Eliciting design requirements for maintenance-oriented IDEs: a detailed study of corrective and perfective maintenance tasks.
Formal verification of an automotive scenario in service-oriented computing.
Using dynamic analysis to generate disjunctive invariants.
A Generic Model for Representing Design Methods.
Software Quality = Test Accuracy * Test Coverage.
Understanding and improving software build teams.
Java: A Language for Software Engineering (Tutorial).
Tool Integration: Experiences and Directions.
Belief & evidence in empirical software engineering.
On Software Engineering-An Economic Perspective.
MintHint: automated synthesis of repair hints.
Second international workshop on managing technical debt: (MTD 2011).
A Synthetic English Query Language for a Relational Accociative Processor.
A Programming Environment Supporting Reuse of Object-Oriented Software.
Performance issues and optimizations in JavaScript: an empirical study.
Supporting dynamic distributed work processes with a component and event based approach.
Automated energy optimization of HTTP requests for mobile applications.
DyTa: dynamic symbolic execution guided with static verification results.
Resolving component deployment & configuration challenges for enterprise DRE systems via frameworks & generative techniques.
An Architecture for WWW-based Hypercode Environments.
Principles of software evolution: 5
Debugging for reactive programming.
Using JULE to generate a compliance test suite for the UML standard.
Deriving executable process descriptions from UML.
Dynamic shape analysis of program heap using graph spectra.
Workshop on Software Engineering for Parallel and Distributed Systems.
The Stream Machine: A Data Flow Architecture for Real-Time Applications.
Perracotta: mining temporal API rules from imperfect traces.
A B.S. degree in informatics: contextualizing software engineering education.
The 2nd International Workshop on Economics-Driven Software Engineering Research.
Tool support for the navigation in graphical models.
Dynamic Restructuring in an Experimental Operating System.
Always-available static and dynamic feedback.
Software engineering themes for the future.
A domain specific requirements model for scientific computing.
Design Principles behind Chiron: A UIMS for Software Environments.
Representation of Factual Information by Equations and Their Evaluation.
Third ICSE workshop on web engineering.
Program Evolution and Its Impact on Software Engineering.
Automated Analysis of Requirement Specifications.
Interpretation in a Tool-Fragment Environment.
Object-Oriented Specification of Reactive Systems.
Time pressure: a controlled experiment of test case development and requirements review.
Rigorous Requirements for Real-Time Systems: Evolution and Application of the SCR Method (Tutorial).
Positive effects of utilizing relationships between inconsistencies for more effective inconsistency resolution.
Early aspects at ICSE: workshop in aspect-oriented requirements engineering and architecture design.
An architects guide to enterprise application integration with J2EE and .NET.
Refactoring pipe-like mashups for end-user programmers.
Experiments with Prolog Design Descriptions and Tools in CAEDE: An Iconic Design Environment for Multitasking, Embdedded Systems.
ATLAS - An Automated Software Testing System.
Connecting Software Components with Declarative Glue.
Interactive Software Development Tool: ISDT.
Use of relative code churn measures to predict system defect density.
Software Metrics Using Deviation Value.
Analysis of the interaction between practices for introducing XP effectively.
Fourth international workshop on multicore software engineering: (IWMSE 2011).
4th international workshop on scenarios and state machines: models, algorithms and tools (SCESM'05).
Testing database transactions with AGENDA.
How does regression test prioritization perform in real-world software evolution?
Grow fast, grow global: how the Irish software industry evolved to this business model.
A new approach for software testability analysis.
Aspectual mixin layers: aspects and features in concert.
A Process-Oriented Approach to Configuration Management.
Finding security bugs in web applications using a catalog of access control patterns.
Dynamically discovering likely interface invariants.
Legacy systems migration in CelLEST.
Socio-technical developer networks: should we trust our measurements?
Improving the quality of UML models in practice.
Coverage is not strongly correlated with test suite effectiveness.
PRISM - Productivity Improvement for Software Engineers and Managers.
Product-line architectures, aspects, and reuse (tutorial session).
Discovering faults in idiom-based exception handling.
Introduction to education and training track.
Estimating software fault-proneness for tuning testing activities.
Precise Service Level Agreements.
Three Problems Overcome with Behavioral Models of the Software Development Process.
Deriving Specifications from Requirements.
A Graph Theoretic Approach to the Verification of Program Structures.
Experiments with Computer Software Complexity and Reliability.
Asam odx: syntax as semantics.
A business process explorer: recovering and visualizing e-commerce business processes.
The evolution of C programming practices: a study of the Unix operating system 1973-2015.
Smartweaver: an agent-based approach for aspect-oriented development.
On CADES-Software Engineering in Practice.
Workshop on emerging trends in software metrics: (WETSoM 2011).
A decision support system for the classification of software coding faults: a research abstract.
An Automated Program Testing Methodology and Its Implementation.
Applying the Value/Petri process to ERP software development in China.
Mining message sequence graphs.
ICSE 97 Doctoral Consortium (Workshop Summary).
Software Development: State of the Art vs. State of the Practice.
Pragmatic Software Metrics for Iterative Development (Presentation).
Software development engineer in Microsoft: a subjective view of soft skills required.
LaSSIE: a Knowledge-based Software Information System.
Software Process Improvement: Methods and Lessons Learned (Tutorial).
Probing for requirements knowledge to stimulate architectural thinking.
Comparing white-box and black-box test prioritization.
How to teach software modeling.
One evaluation of model-based testing and its automation.
Seeking Concurrency in Rule-Based Programming.
A Case Study of Distributed, Asynchronous Software Inspection.
Effects of using examples on structural model comprehension: a controlled experiment.
Jumping through hoops: why do Java developers struggle with cryptography APIs?
Assessing Failure Probabilities in Safety-Critical Systems Containing Software.
Evolving software product lines with aspects: an empirical study on design stability.
Open source software peer review practices: a case study of the apache server.
A Software Process Improvement Approach Tailored for Small Organizations and Small Projects (Tutorial).
LTSA-WS: a tool for model-based verification of web service compositions and choreography.
Temporal dependency based checkpoint selection for dynamic verification of fixed-time constraints in grid workflow systems.
Assuring and evolving concurrent programs: annotations and policy.
Production of Large Computer Programs.
Test Adequacy and Program Mutation.
A System for Parallel Programming.
A Defense View of Software Engineering.
Second international workshop on software engineering for sensor network applications: (SESENA 2011).
Pitfalls and Safeguards in Real-Time Digital Systems with Emphasis on Programming.
Run-time efficient probabilistic model checking.
Some myths of software engineering education.
Topic-based defect prediction.
2nd international workshop on advances and applications of problem frames.
From programming to modeling: our experience with a distributed software engineering course.
Software Requirements Negotiation and Renegotiation Aids: A Theory-W Based Spiral Approach.
Performing systematic literature reviews in software engineering.
A Software Methodology for Buidling Interactive Tools.
Requirements fixation.
Introduction to Research Papers.
Demonstration of JIVE and JOVE: Java as it happens.
Time-bounded adaptation for automotive system software.
Fifth international workshop on software clones: (IWSC 2011).
Optimization of software development.
TABLE: Object Oriented Editing of Complex Structures.
Effort estimation of use cases for incremental large-scale software development.
Design patterns: between programming and software design.
Measuring Requirements Testing.
Specification-Based Test Oracles for Reactive Systems.
RACEZ: a lightweight and non-invasive race detection tool for production applications.
An Incremental Programming Environment.
An Analysis of Software Project Failure.
Verification of a Monitor Specification.
Workshop on technology transfer in software engineering.
Automated usability evaluation of parallel programming constructs.
Precise memory leak detection for java software using container profiling.
Program synthesis using natural language.
Exploring O-O framework usage (poster).
Achieving industrial relevance with academic excellence: lessons from the Oregon Master of Software engineering.
Software Process  la Algebra: OBJ for OBJ.
Design mentoring based on design evolution analysis.
System challenges for ubiquitous & pervasive computing.
Second international workshop on product line approaches in software engineering: (PLEASE 2011).
Getting Started on Metrics - JPL Productivity and Quality (Experience Report).
Portfolio: finding relevant functions and their usage.
Program abstractions for behaviour validation.
A framework of greedy methods for constructing interaction test suites.
Empirically driven SE research: state of the art and required maturity.
Software inspections, reviews & walkthroughs.
Data Flow Analysis Techniques for Test Data Selection.
On the success of empirical studies in the international conference on software engineering.
An Environmental Simulator for the FDNY Computer Aided Dispatch System.
Requirements, domain and specifications: a viewpoint-based approach to requirements engineering.
Architectural Mismatch or Why It's Hard to Build Systems Out Of Existing Parts.
An Architecture for Integrating Concurrency Control into Environment Frameworks.
MeCC: memory comparison-based clone detector.
Browsing and searching source code of applications written using a GUIframework.
An Experiment in Program Restructuring for Performance Enhancement.
An Introduction to OMG/CORBA (Tutorial).
Early prediction of software component reliability.
Characterizing implicit information during peer review meetings.
Overseas development for a major U.S. eCommerce website.
A quality-driven systematic approach for architecting distributed software applications.
WYSIWYT testing in the spreadsheet paradigm: an empirical evaluation.
Debugging reinvented: asking and answering why and why not questions about program behavior.
A case study of measuring process risk for early insights into software safety.
Shortages of qualified software engineering faculty and practitioners (panel session): challenges in breaking the cycle.
MuJava: a mutation system for java.
Anywhere, Anytime Code Inspections: Using the Web to Remove Inspection Bottlenecks in Large-Scale Software Development.
Does the initial environment impact the future of developers.
Clonetracker: tool support for code clone management.
Formal methods in industry: achievements, problems, future.
Impact analysis of database schema changes.
Symbolic assume-guarantee reasoning through BDD learning.
A multiple case study on the impact of pair programming on product quality.
Not Waving but Drowning: Representation Schemes for Modelling Software Development.
The Inspection Metho Applied to Small Projects.
Building Awareness of System Testing Issues.
Which configuration option should I change?
Models and processes for the evaluation of off-the-shelf components - MPEC'05.
Extending requirement specifications using analogy.
The fujaba real-time tool suite: model-driven development of safety-critical, real-time systems.
Symbolic invariant verification for systems with dynamic structural adaptation.
XML conceptual modeling with XUML.
Perturbation Testing for Computation Errors.
An empirical study of build maintenance effort.
Improved Updating in relational Dat Base Systems by Deuter-Shere Algorithms.
Integrating hundred's of product through one architecture: the industrial IT architecture.
Performance Engineering as a Part of the Development Life Cycle for Large-Scale Software Systems.
Automated test case generation for spreadsheets.
2nd international workshop on software engineering for automotive systems.
5
First international workshop on global integrated model management.
A view of 20th and 21st century software engineering.
Developing a security protocol for a distributed decision support system in a healthcare environment.
ArchJava: connecting software architecture to implementation.
A verification system for timed interval calculus.
Use of Video for Program Documentation (Experience Report).
MGEN - A Generator for Menu Driven Programs.
Tracing architectural concerns in high assurance systems.
A comprehensive product line scoping approach and its validation.
Structure Charts and Program Correctness Proofs.
A Framework for Evaluating Specification Methods for Reactive Systems: Experience Report.
Toward sustainable software engineering.
Knowledge-Based Communication Processes in Software Engineering.
Enhancing Program Readability and Comprehensibility with Tools for Program Visualization.
Supporting dynamic composition of components.
Coverage guided systematic concurrency testing.
Model-Checking of Real-Time Systems: A Telecommunications Application (Experience Report).
JavAdaptor: unrestricted dynamic software updates for Java.
Are "non-functional" requirements really non-functional?: an investigation of non-functional requirements in practice.
Completeness and Consistency Analysis of State-Based Requirements.
Improving requirements quality using essential use case interaction patterns.
What you always wanted to know about agile methods but did not dare to ask.
Software Architecture Based on Communicating Residential Environments.
The Dimensions of Maintenance.
Logical Animation.
Analyzing software architectures with Argus-I.
A Toolbox for the Verification of LOTOS Programs.
Verification of time partitioning in the DEOS scheduler kernel.
Using an information retrieval system to retrieve source code samples.
Instant consistency checking for the UML.
Induction as the Basis for Program Verification (Abstract).
Use of software inspection inputs in practice.
The Interaction Between the Preliminary Designs and the Technical Requirements for the DoD Common High Order Language.
Building enterprise portals: principles to practice.
CodeCrawler: an information visualization tool for program comprehension.
Risk-driven revision of requirements models.
MobiPlay: a remote execution based record-and-replay tool for mobile applications.
Second ICSE Workshop on Web Engineering.
Towards pattern-based design recovery.
Knowledge-Based Software Design Using Design Schemas.
A software engineering approach and tool set for developing Internet applications.
Technology transfer macro-process: a practical guide for the effective introduction of technology.
Are fit tables really talking?: a series of experiments to understand whether fit tables are useful during evolution tasks.
Planning realistic schedules using software architecture (tutorial session).
Data mining library reuse patterns using generalized association rules.
Mining interprocedural, data-oriented usage patterns in JavaScript web applications.
Tools to Support Formal Methods.
CatchUp!: capturing and replaying refactorings to support API evolution.
An Integrated System for Program Testing Using Weak Mutation and Data Flow Analysis.
Transformation for class immutability.
Workshop on standard exchange format (WoSEF).
Software Development Process Audits - A General Procedure.
Visual languages for event integration specification.
Making web applications more energy efficient for OLED smartphones.
Redesigning legacy applications for the web with UWAT+: a case study.
Detection of conflicting functional requirements in a use case-driven approach: a static analysis technique based on graph transformation.
Design Patterns for Object-Oriented Software Development (Tutorial).
Effects of software industry structure on a research framework for empirical software engineering.
Marama: an eclipse meta-toolset for generating multi-view environments.
Program Analysis - A Method for the Verification of Software for the Control of a Nuclear Reactor.
Silver bullet or fool's gold: supporting usability in open source software development.
Understanding requirements for computer-aided healthcare workflows: experiences and challenges.
Locking discipline inference and checking.
The Finalization Operation for Abstract Types.
Main effects screening: a distributed continuous quality assurance process for monitoring performance degradation in evolving software systems.
Advanced visual modelling: beyond UML.
On the Effectiveness of Set Associative Page Mapping and Its Application to Main Memory Management.
Requirements Analysis for Real-Time Automation Projects.
Scalable detection of semantic clones.
Experiments on quality evaluation of embedded software in Japan robot software design contest.
Granularity in software product lines.
Assessing the Quality of Abstract Data Types Written in Ada.
The "Catch 22" of Re-engineering.
Predictor models in software engineering (PROMISE).
Integrating Support for Temporal Media into an Architecture for Graphical User Interfaces.
Using a Command Language as a High-Level Programming Language.
Impact of the research community for the field of software configuration management.
Modeling and implementing software architecture with acme and archJava.
SYNCRO: A Dataflow Command Shell for the Lilith/Modula Computer.
What We Really Need Are Process Model Generators.
Portfolio management of software development projects using COCOMO II.
Symbolic mining of temporal specifications.
Metamodel-based tool integration with moflon.
Task Interaction Graphs for Concurrency Analysis.
Static detection of leaks in polymorphic containers.
Assessing programming language impact on development and maintenance: a study on c and c++.
Code Reviews Enhance Software Quality.
Program Complexity Measure for Software Development Management.
Software Processes Are Software Too, Revisited: An Invited Talk on the Most Influential Paper of ICSE 9.
A comparative analysis of the efficiency of change metrics and static code attributes for defect prediction.
BQL: capturing and reusing debugging knowledge.
Software Development in the Year 2000.
An Index Organization for Applications with Highly Skewed Access Patterns.
Completely Validated Software.
Programs, tests, and oracles: the foundations of testing revisited.
Hooking into Object-Oriented Application Frameworks.
An inheritance-based technique for building simulation proofs incrementally.
Tracking, predicting and assessing software reuse costs: an automated tool.
Process issues in course projects.
Total Software Process Model Evolution in EPOS (Experience Report).
A New Design Language for Communication Protocols and a Systematic Design Method of Communication Systems.
Taking lessons from history.
Evaluating pattern catalogs: the computer games experience.
The impact of test case summaries on bug fixing performance: an empirical investigation.
RETracer: triaging crashes by reverse execution from partial memory dumps.
European and American Software Process Maturity Models and Assessments (Tutorial).
Technology Dependence in Function Point Analysis: A Case Study and Critical Review.
Practical Applications of a Syntax Directed Program Manipulation Environment.
Program Visualization: The Art of Mapping Programs to Pictures.
Interactive transformation of java programs in eclipse.
Scalable thread sharing analysis.
Software engineering for secure systems.
A Collection of Software Tools for Analyzing Design of Concurrent Software Systems.
Software Process Modeling: Principles of Entity Process Models.
A framework for the integration of user centered design and agile software development processes.
Pre-workshop summary: workshop on iterative, adaptive, and agile processes.
A logical framework for design composition.
Experiences with text mining large collections of unstructured systems development artifacts at jpl.
Models of Software Development Environments.
M. H. Halstead's Software Science - A Critical Examination.
Automatically detecting and describing high level actions within methods.
Iterative context-aware feature location.
Aspect recommendation for evolving software.
Mind the gap: assessing the conformance of software traceability to relevant guidelines.
Prospects for Program Verification (Tutorial).
Sacificing the Calf of Flexibility on the Altar of Reliability.
Creative requirements: invention and its role in requirements engineering.
A Recovery Mechanism for Modular Software.
Floating-point precision tuning using blame analysis.
ASADAL: a tool system for co-development of software and test environment based on product line engineering.
Science of design.
A risk-driven method for eXtreme programming release planning.
Security attribute evaluation method: a cost-benefit approach.
Multifractal aspects of software development.
Designing concurrent, distributed, and real-time applications with UML.
Building product populations with sofware components.
A Logarithmic Poisson Execution Time Model for Software Reliability Measurement.
PARTS: A Temporal Logic-Based Real-Time Software Specification and Verification Method.
NLH/E: A Natural Language Help System.
How to Design a System in Which Modules Can Be Changed on the Fly.
Designing Software for Ease of Extension and Contraction.
A Partition Analysis Method to Increase Program Reliability.
Symbolic Interpretation and Tracing of PASCAL-Programs.
An Experiment in Formal Software Development: Using the B Theorem Prover on a VDM Case Study.
Systematizing security test case planning using functional requirements phrases.
A representation for describing and analyzing concerns in source code.
Scalability issues in CORBA-based systems (tutorial session).
Adaptive Testing.
Improving software inspections by using reading techniques (tutorial session).
SNIPR: complementing code search with code retargeting capabilities.
Fault-tolerance in a Distributed Management System: a Case Study.
User Interface Prototyping - Concepts, Tools, and Experience.
Backwards-compatible array bounds checking for C with very low overhead.
Evaluating the Accuracy of Defect Estimation Models Based on Inspection Data from Two Inspection Cycles.
An Examination of the Current State of IPSE Technology.
Synthesizing intensional behavior models by graph transformation.
Finding Latent Code Errors via Machine Learning over Program Executions.
Describing Software Architecture with UML.
Analytical and Empirical Evaluation of Software Reuse Metrics.
Analysis and Testing of Web Applications.
Overview and Evaluation of Constraint Validation Approaches in Java.
Ambient awareness of build status in collocated software teams.
Goldfish bowl panel: Software development analytics.
Expositor: scriptable time-travel debugging with first-class traces.
YODA: young and newcomer developer assistant.
Chronicler: lightweight recording to reproduce field failures.
The Program Understanding Problem: Analysis and a Heuristic Approach.
Enhancing architecture-implementation conformance with change management and support for behavioral mapping.
User involvement in software evolution practice: a case study.
Automated Construction of Testing and Analysis Tools.
Modeling and Analysis of a Virtual Reality System with Time Petri Nets.
Architectural task allocation in distributed environment: A traceability perspective.
Improving failure-inducing changes identification using coverage analysis.
Theory of Software Reliability Based on Components.
Introducing Accessibility Requirements through External Stakeholder Utilization in an Undergraduate Requirements Engineering Course.
Specification patterns from research to industry: A case study in service-based applications.
Using machine learning to enhance automated requirements model transformation.
Second ICSE Workshop on Software Product Lines: Economics, Architectures, and Applications.
Collaboration patterns in distributed software development projects.
A Formal Approach to Component-Based Software Engineering: Education and Evaluation.
Software Architecture: Practice, Potential, and Pitfalls.
Recommending source code for use in rapid software prototypes.
Cassandra: proactive conflict minimization through optimized task scheduling.
Reducing and Estimating the Cost of Test Coverage Criteria.
Using a Goal-Driven Approach to Generate Test Cases for GUIs.
Highly Reliable Upgrading of Components.
Developing Initial OOA Models.
Quantitative program slicing: separating statements by relevance.
A General Framework for Formalizing UML with Formal Languages.
A Tutorial on Feature Oriented Programming and Product-Lines.
Independent On-Line Monitoring of Evolving Systems.
Do code clones matter?
Software process improvement through the identification and removal of project-level knowledge flow obstacles.
Model evolution by run-time parameter adaptation.
Reliable Software and Communication: Software Quality, Reliability, and Safety.
Helping the Automated Validation Process of User Interfaces Systems.
PRESTIGE: A CASE Workbench for the JSD Implementor.
Designing and Implementing
Analysis of user comments: an approach for software requirements evolution.
The Impact of Pair Programming on Student Performance, Perception and Persistence.
Lightweight Extraction of Object Models from Bytecode.
A toolset for automated failure analysis.
CodeTimeline: Storytelling with versioning data.
Automated Support for Classifying Software Failure Reports.
RERAN: timing- and touch-sensitive record and replay for Android.
Taming coincidental correctness: Coverage refinement with context patterns to improve fault localization.
Corrective Maintenance Maturity Model (CM
AcmeStudio: Supporting Style-Centered Architecture Development.
Creating a Computer Security Curriculum in a Software Engineering Program.
Predicting Faults from Cached History.
Boa: a language and infrastructure for analyzing ultra-large-scale software repositories.
UML/Analyzer: A Tool for the Instant Consistency Checking of UML Models.
Adaptive Feedback Scheduling of Incremental and Design-to-Time Tasks.
Analysis of a Scheduler for a CAD Framework.
Maintaining invariant traceability through bidirectional transformations.
BugRedux: Reproducing field failures for in-house debugging.
Pragmatic Techniques for Program Analysis and Verification.
WhoseFault: Automatic developer-to-fault assignment through fault localization.
Comparing Frameworks and Layered Refinement.
Storing and Retrieving Software Components: A Refinement Based System.
A Generic, Peer-to-Peer Repository for Distributed Configuration Management.
Polymorphism Measures for Early Risk Prediction.
Reengineering Analysis of Object-Oriented Systems via Duplication.
A bidirectional model-driven spreadsheet environment.
Billions and billions of constraints: whitebox fuzz testing in production.
XAS: A System for Accessing Componentized, Virtual XML Documents.
Development of auxiliary functions: Should you be agile? An empirical assessment of pair programming and test-first programming.
LASE: an example-based program transformation tool for locating and applying systematic edits.
Rule-Based Approach to Computing Module Cohesion.
DMS: Program Transformations for Practical Scalable Software Evolution.
Assisting end-user development in browser-based mashup tools.
Recovering traceability links between an API and its learning resources.
FastFix: Monitoring control for remote software maintenance.
An observable and controllable testing framework for modern systems.
Fifth International Workshop on Economics-driven Software Engineering Research (EDSER-5) "The Search for Value in Engineering Decisions".
Restructuring unit tests with TestSurgeon.
Software Process Modeling and Enactment: An Experience Report Related to Problem Tracking in an Industrial Project.
MINTS: A general framework and tool for supporting test-suite minimization.
Maintaining and evolving GUI-directed test scripts.
A self-healing technique for Java applications.
First Workshop on Economics-Driven Software Engineering Research.
Regression Test Selection for AspectJ Software.
Software Architecture Recovery of a Program Family.
DiscoTect: A System for Discovering Architectures from Running Systems.
A characteristic study on failures of production distributed data-parallel programs.
Reconceptualizing a Family of Heterogeneous Embedded Systems via Explicit Architectural Support.
Testing Object Oriented Software.
GlueQoS: Middleware to Sweeten Quality-of-Service Policy Interactions.
Obtaining ground-truth software architectures.
FM91: Formal Methods Workshop.
Automatic input rectification.
Software metrics: pitfalls and best practices.
Characterizing and predicting which bugs get reopened.
Accurate Interprocedural Null-Dereference Analysis for Java.
Industrial Experience with Design Patterns.
EXSYST: Search-based GUI testing.
Information Survivability Control Systems.
A Formal Framework for Automated Round-Trip Software Engineering in Static Aspect Weaving and Transformations.
How to avoid drastic software process change (using stochastic stability).
Workshop to Consider Global Aspects of Software Engineering Professionalism.
Inferring method specifications from natural language API descriptions.
Formal Specification Techniques (Extended Abstract).
Automatic synthesis of modular connectors via composition of protocol mediation patterns.
SmartTutor: Creating IDE-based interactive tutorials via editable replay.
Where should the bugs be fixed? More accurate information retrieval-based bug localization based on bug reports.
An evaluation of the internal quality of business applications: does size matter?
Feedback-directed unit test generation for C/C++ using concolic execution.
Why don't software developers use static analysis tools to find bugs?
Adaptive Online Program Analysis.
Algorithm Development in the Mobile Environment.
Observations on Industrial Practice Using Formal Methods.
Prototyping a Process Monitoring Experiment.
Integrated impact analysis for managing software changes.
Mining Version Histories to Guide Software Changes.
Experience Assessing an Architectural Approach to Large-Scale Systematic Reuse.
An Evaluation of Software Test Environment Architectures.
Simulating the Behaviour of Software Modules by Trace Rewriting.
Imposing a Memory Management Discipline on Software Deployment.
Improving early detection of software merge conflicts.
Reuse of Verificatino Efforts and Incomplete Specifications in a Formalized, Iterative and Incremental Software Process.
ICSE'99 Workshop on Web Engineering.
Dynamic Layout of Distributed Applications in FarGo.
Characterizing and detecting performance bugs for smartphone applications.
Unanticipated reuse of large-scale software features.
ConLock: a constraint-based approach to dynamic checking on deadlocks in multithreaded programs.
A programming model and system for disconnected-aware applications on resource-constrained devices.
Polyphony in Architecture.
Assisting developers of big data analytics applications when deploying on hadoop clouds.
V: ISSUE: LIZER: exploring requirements clarification in online communication over time.
Automated Generation of Test Programs from Closed Specifications of Classes and Test Cases.
A Scalable, Automated Process for Year 2000 System Correction.
A Failure of Management Nerve and Vision.
Automatic creation of SQL Injection and cross-site scripting attacks.
SoftGUESS: Visualization and Exploration of Code Clones in Context.
Tricks and Traps of Initiating a Product Line Concept in Existing Product.
Insight: Reverse Engineer Case Tool.
Modeling and Managing Risk Early in Software Development.
Generating Tests from Counterexamples.
Software Engineering for Large-Scale Multi-Agent Systems - SELMAS'2003.
Towards Systematic Recycling of Systems Requirements.
A Case Study in Applying a Systematic Method for COTS Selection.
Generalized Behavior-Based Retrieval.
1st international workshop on release engineering (RELENG 2013).
Drag-and-drop refactoring: intuitive and efficient program transformation.
3rd international workshop on games and software engineering: engineering computer games to enable positive, progressive change (GAS 2013).
Software requirement patterns.
Domain Modeling - Overview & Ongoing Research at EDS.
Generating Wrappers for Command Line Programs: The Cal-Aggie Wrap-O-Matic Project.
Understanding "Why" in Software Process Modelling, Analysis, and Design.
Refactoring-Aware Configuration Management for Object-Oriented Programs.
Parametric Analysis of Real-Time Embedded Systems with Abstract Approximation Interpretation.
Web Engineering Device Independent Web Services.
Winbook: A social networking based framework for collaborative requirements elicitation and WinWin negotiations.
Path sensitive static analysis of web applications for remote code execution vulnerability detection.
A tactic-centric approach for automating traceability of quality concerns.
Design and Test of Distributed Applications.
Estimating mobile application energy consumption using program analysis.
Data science for software engineering.
Sound Methods and Effective Tools for Engineering Modeling and Analysis.
Workflow Management Based on Process Model Repositories.
Feature-Oriented Programming and the AHEAD Tool Suite.
Panel: Intellectual Property Issues in Software.
Cost Estimation of Software Intensive Projects: A Survey of Current Practices.
Large-scale formal verification in practice: A process perspective.
Going global with agile service networks.
A Scalable Formal Method for Design and Automatic Checking of User Interfaces.
Linguistic Support for the Evolutionary Design of Software Architectures.
Teaching collaborative software development: A case study.
Using structural and semantic information to support software refactoring.
SemDiff: Analysis and recommendation support for API evolution.
Empirical Studies on Requirement Management Measures.
Exploiting ADLs to Specify Architectural Styles Induced by Middleware Infrastructures.
Automated diagnosis of software configuration errors.
Semi-automatically extracting FAQs to improve accessibility of software development knowledge.
Strategies for product-line verification: case studies and experiments.
Splitting the Organization and Integrating the Code: Conway's Law Revisited.
A Learning Curve Based Simulation Model for Software Development.
Software Architecture Reconstruction.
The Quamoco product quality modelling and assessment approach.
Does distributed development affect software quality? An empirical case study of Windows Vista.
Assertion-Oriented Automated Test Data Generation.
Enhancing Software Testing by Judicious Use of Code Coverage Information.
Configurable Software Architecture in Support of Configuration Management and Software Deployment.
Suade: Topology-Based Searches for Software Investigation.
Automatic Inference of Structural Changes for Matching across Program Versions.
Integrating Prior Knowledge with a Software Reliability Growth Model.
The Vienna Component Framework Enabling Composition Across Component Models.
Experiments of the Effectiveness of Dataflow- and Controlflow-Based Test Adequacy Criteria.
Refounding software engineering: The Semat initiative (Invited presentation).
Does organizing security patterns focus architectural choices?
Hardware/Software Codesign: A Perspective.
Progress Toward Automated Software Testing.
The Specification and Testing of Quantified Progress Properties in Distributed Systems.
An Architectural Style for Multiple Real-Time Data Feeds.
Automatic testing of sequential and concurrent substitutability.
Vulnerability of the day: concrete demonstrations for software engineering undergraduates.
Performance debugging in the large via mining millions of stack traces.
Managing non-functional uncertainty via model-driven adaptivity.
One More Step in the Direction of Modularized Integration Concerns.
Fragment Class Analysis for Testing of Polymorphism in Java Software.
Test Templates: A Specification-Based Testing Framework.
JST: an automatic test generation tool for industrial Java applications with strings.
Automated detection of client-state manipulation vulnerabilities.
Babel: Representing Business Rules in XML for Application Integration.
An Empirical Study of Software Reuse vs. Defect-Density and Stability.
Save-IDE - A tool for design, analysis and implementation of component-based embedded systems.
Lightweight vs. heavyweight processes: is this even the right question?
Automatic parameter recommendation for practical API usage.
LAMBDAFICATOR: from imperative to functional programming through automated refactoring.
A Specification Matching Based Approach to Reverse Engineering.
Pattern-Based Reverse-Engineering of Design Components.
On the Inference of Configuration Structures from Source Code.
Explaining the Cost of European Space and Military Projects.
Software Aging.
Program transformations to fix C integers.
Generating obstacle conditions for requirements completeness.
Static detection of resource contention problems in server-side scripts.
Repository for Model Driven Development (ReMoDD).
Process Assurance Audits: Lessons Learned.
Taint-based directed whitebox fuzzing.
A Tool for Writing and Debugging Algebraic Specifications.
Using Version Control Data to Evaluate the Impact of Software Tools.
Automated Support for Development, Maintenance, and Testing in the Presence of Implicit Control Flow.
CocoViz with ambient audio software exploration.
Expressing the Relationships Between Multiple Views in Requirements Specification.
UDesignIt: Towards social media for community-driven design.
License integration patterns: Addressing license mismatches in component-based development.
Exploring techniques for rationale extraction from existing documents.
Software regression as change of input partitioning.
Finding suitable programs: Semantic search with incomplete and lightweight specifications.
Learning revised models for planning in adaptive systems.
An approach to variability management in service-oriented product lines.
Object-Oriented Reengineering Patterns.
Agile Software Process and Its Experience.
Interaction-based test-suite minimization.
Detecting inconsistencies in wrappers: a case study.
The secret life of bugs: Going past the errors and omissions in software repositories.
The Role of Software Development Methodologies: Past, Present, and Future.
Software analytics in practice: Mini tutorial.
A High Level Language for Specifying Graph Based Languages and Their Programming Environments.
Adding more ``DL'' to IDL: Towards More Knowledgeable Component Inter-Operability.
Detecting and visualizing inter-worksheet smells in spreadsheets.
jPredictor: a predictive runtime analysis tool for java.
BHUNT: Automatic Discovery of Fuzzy Algebraic Constraints in Relational Data.
A Database Striptease or How to Manage Your Personal Databases.
Decision Tables: Scalable Classification Exploring RDBMS Capabilities.
High-Performance Extensible Indexing.
Optimizing Multi-Feature Queries for Image Databases.
User-Adaptive Exploration of Multidimensional Data.
Integrity Auditing of Outsourced Data.
XISS/R: XML Indexing and Storage System using RDBMS.
CachePortal II: Acceleration of Very Large Scale Data Center-Hosted Database-driven Web Applications.
Primitives for Workload Summarization and Implications for SQL.
Deadline and QoS Aware Data Warehouse.
Aggregation Algorithms for Very Large Compressed Data Warehouses.
Randomized Algorithms for Data Reconciliation in Wide Area Aggregate Query Processing.
Distributed Search over the Hidden Web: Hierarchical Database Sampling and Selection.
Seeking Stable Clusters in the Blogosphere.
Temporal Queries in OLAP.
Bank of America Case Study: The Information Currency Advantage.
What Do Those Weird XML Types Want, Anyway?
Efficiently Answering Top-k Typicality Queries on Large Databases.
Navigating large-scale semi-structured data in business portals.
Content-Based Routing: Different Plans for Different Data.
Staircase Join: Teach a Relational DBMS to Watch its (Axis) Steps.
Inferring Function Semantics to Optimize Queries.
Buffering and Read-Ahead Strategies for External Mergesort.
A Simple and Efficient Estimation Method for Stream Expression Cardinalities.
STAR: Self-Tuning Aggregation for Scalable Monitoring.
Measuring the Structural Similarity of Semistructured Documents Using Entropy.
Panel: Is Generic Metadata Management Feasible?
Automatic Data Fusion with HumMer.
Shooting Stars in the Sky: An Online Algorithm for Skyline Queries.
Request Window: an Approach to Improve Throughput of RDBMS-based Data Integration System by Utilizing Data Sharing Across Concurrent Distributed Queries.
Provisions and Obligations in Policy Management and Security Applications.
Regulatory-Compliant Data Management.
Explaining Differences in Multidimensional Aggregates.
Oracle8i Index-Organized Table and Its Application to New Domains.
A Bandwidth Model for Internet Search.
Building Light-Weight Wrappers for Legacy Web Data-Sources Using W4F.
Model Management and Schema Mappings: Theory and Practice.
Covering Indexes for XML Queries: Bisimulation - Simulation = Negation.
Querying Business Processes with BP-QL.
Evaluating Functional Joins Along Nested Reference Sets in Object-Relational and Object-Oriented Databases.
Sideway Value Algebra for Object-Relational Databases.
COMBI-Operator: Database Support for Data Mining Applications.
KLEE: A Framework for Distributed Top-k Query Algorithms.
A Database System for Real-Time Event Aggregation in Telecommunication.
One-Pass Wavelet Synopses for Maximum-Error Metrics.
Controlling Access to Published Data Using Cryptography.
Lightweight Flexible Isolation for Language-based Extensible Systems.
Active Views for Electronic Commerce.
Push Technology Personalization through Event Correlation.
SMOOTH - A Distributed Multimedia Database System.
Schema Mapping as Query Discovery.
Computer Science 2.0: A New World of Data Management.
BibFinder/StatMiner: Effectively Mining and Using Coverage and Overlap Statistics in Data Integration.
The Drill Down Benchmark.
Algorithms for Querying by Spatial Structure.
FAS - A Freshness-Sensitive Coordination Middleware for a Cluster of OLAP Components.
Indexing Multi-Dimensional Uncertain Data with Arbitrary Probability Density Functions.
Toward Learning Based Web Query Processing.
Wireless Graffiti - Data, Data Everywhere Matters.
Secure Buffering in Firm Real-Time Database Systems.
Comparing Hierarchical Data in External Memory.
Query Processing for High-Volume XML Message Brokering.
What Is the Nearest Neighbor in High Dimensional Spaces?
Efficient Keyword Search over Virtual XML Views.
Combining Histograms and Parametric Curve Fitting for Feedback-Driven Query Result-size Estimation.
A General Framework for Modeling and Processing Optimization Queries.
Fast and Accurate Text Classification via Multiple Linear Discriminant Projections.
Statistical Learning Techniques for Costing XML Queries.
The Rubicon of Smart Data.
Views in a Large Scale XML Repository.
Flexible Database Generators.
Minimality Attack in Privacy Preserving Data Publishing.
Functional Properties of Information Filtering.
An Efficient SQL-based RDF Querying Scheme.
FluxCapacitor: Efficient Time-Travel Text Search.
Data Morphing: An Adaptive, Cache-Conscious Storage Technique.
A Database Platform for Bioinformatics.
Eliminating Impedance Mismatch in C++.
Example-driven design of efficient record matching queries.
AQuery: Query Language for Ordered Data, Optimization Techniques, and Experiments.
Massive Stochastic Testing of SQL.
Performance Evaluation and Experimental Assessment - Conscience or Curse of Database Research?
Semantic Query Optimization for XQuery over XML Streams.
The Semantic Web: Semantics for Data on the Web.
Scalable Semantic Web Data Management Using Vertical Partitioning.
ALIAS: An Active Learning led Interactive Deduplication System.
Similarity Search in High Dimensions via Hashing.
Computing Iceberg Queries Efficiently.
Integrating Heterogenous Overlapping Databases through Object-Oriented Transformations.
Locating Data Sources in Large Distributed Systems.
IndeGS: Index Supported Graphics Data Server for CFD Data Postprocessing.
Maximizing the Output Rate of Multi-Way Join Queries over Streaming Information Sources.
Data Compression in Oracle.
I/O-Conscious Data Preparation for Large-Scale Web Search Engines.
An Efficient and Scalable Approach to CNN Queries in a Road Network.
Star-Cubing: Computing Iceberg Cubes by Top-Down and Bottom-Up Integration.
Loadstar: Load Shedding in Data Stream Mining.
Effective Phrase Prediction.
Inverse Functions in the AquaLogic Data Services Platform.
Optimizing Nested Queries with Parameter Sort Orders.
GeRoMeSuite: A System for Holistic Generic Model Management.
Automating the Detection of Snapshot Isolation Anomalies.
XSeek: A Semantic XML Search Engine Using Keywords.
The BT-tree: A Branched and Temporal Access Method.
Comparing Data Streams Using Hamming Norms (How to Zero In).
Operating System Extensions for the Teradata Parallel VLDB.
Checkpointing in Oracle.
Design and Development of a Stream Service in a Heterogenous Client Environment.
On Dominating Your Neighborhood Profitably.
ServiceGlobe: Distributing E-Services Across the Internet.
REFEREE: An Open Framework for Practical Testing of Recommender Systems using ResearchIndex.
Parameter Free Bursty Events Detection in Text Streams.
Semantic Access: Semantic Interface for Querying Databases.
On the Discovery of Interesting Patterns in Association Rules.
MindReader: Querying Databases Through Multiple Examples.
Unifying Data and Domain Knowledge Using Virtual Views.
On k-Anonymity and the Curse of Dimensionality.
Commercial Use of Database Technology.
Parametric Query Optimization for Linear and Piecewise Linear Cost Functions.
Stack-based Algorithms for Pattern Matching on DAGs.
Approximate Matching of Hierarchical Data Using pq-Grams.
Progressive Merge Join: A Generic and Non-blocking Sort-based Join Algorithm.
Query Caching and View Selection for XML Databases.
Cooperative Scans: Dynamic Bandwidth Sharing in a DBMS.
Robust Real-time Query Processing with QStream.
Efficient Implementation of Large-Scale Multi-Structural Databases.
Storage and Retrieval of XML Data Using Relational Databases.
An Extendible Hash for Multi-Precision Similarity Querying of Image Databases.
LEO - DB2's LEarning Optimizer.
In Cyber Space No One can Hear You Scream.
Using a Fuzzy Classification Query Language for Customer Relationship Management.
Data Management for Pervasive Computing.
Dynamic Load Balancing for Parallel Association Rule Mining on Heterogenous PC Cluster Systems.
Generalised Hash Teams for Join and Group-by.
DataBlitz: A High Performance Main-Memory Storage Manager.
ProTDB: Probabilistic Data in XML.
Panel: Future Directions of Database Research - The VLDB Broadening Strategy, Part 2.
Efficient Query Processing for Multi-Dimensionally Clustered Tables in DB2.
A New Passenger Support System for Public Transport using Mobile Database Access.
Who needs XML Databases?
A Fast Index for Semistructured Data.
Automated design of multidimensional clustering tables for relational databases.
2Q: A Low Overhead High Performance Buffer Management Replacement Algorithm.
The C-based Database Programming Language Jasmine/C.
System D: A Distributed System for Availability.
The Use of Information Capacity in Schema Integration and Translation.
Resilient Logical Structures for Efficient Management of Replicated Data.
An Incremental Join Attachment for Starburst.
Extended User-Defined Indexing with Application to Textual Databases.
Basic Timestamp, Multiple Version Timestamp, and Two-Phase Locking.
Query Processing on Personal Computers: A Pragmatic Approach (Extended Abstract).
To Weave the Web.
Distributed Transaction Management in Jasmin.
From Nested-Loop to Join Queries in OODB.
CAPE: Continuous Query Engine with Heterogeneous-Grained Adaptivity.
Using Versions in Update Transactions: Application to Integrity Checking.
An Efficient Algorithm for Mining Association Rules in Large Databases.
Transaction Support in Read Optimizied and Write Optimized File Systems.
A Uniform Approach to Processing Temporal Queries.
Entity Modeling in the MLS Relational Model.
On Semantic Reefs and Efficient Processing of Correlation Queries with Aggregates.
Enforcing Inclusion Dependencies and Referencial Integrity.
Optimization of Nonrecursive Queries.
The Case for Precision Sharing.
Processing Queries Over Generalization Hierarchies in a Multidatabase System.
Including Group-By in Query Optimization.
Random Sampling from Pseudo-Ranked B+ Trees.
Reasoning About Spatial Relationships in Picture Retrieval Systems.
A Pragmatic Approach to Structured Database Design.
On the Effectiveness of Optimization Search Strategies for Parallel Execution Spaces.
Data Warehouse Configuration.
The Principle of Commitment Ordering, or Guaranteeing Serializability in a Heterogeneous Environment of Multiple Autonomous Resource Mangers Using Atomic Commitment.
Multi-objective Query Processing for Database Systems.
Fast Computation of Sparse Datacubes.
The Starburst Long Field Manager.
Database Graph Views: A Practical Model to Manage Persistent Graphs.
Data Management for Real-Time Systems.
Taming XPath Queries by Minimizing Wildcard Steps.
Optimization for Spatial Query Processing.
The NEXT Logical Framework for XQuery.
A Framework for Using Materialized XPath Views in XML Query Processing.
On the performance of bitmap indices for high cardinality attributes.
Commit_LSN: A Novel and Simple Method for Reducing Locking and Latching in Transaction Processing Systems.
Query Decomposition and View Maintenance for Query Languages for Unstructured Data.
Distributed Concurrency Control Performance: A Study of Algorithms, Distribution, and Replication.
Parallel Algorithms for High-dimensional Similarity Joins for Data Mining Applications.
Efficient Search of Multi-Dimensional B-Trees.
Implementing Lazy Database Updates for an Object Database System.
On Maintaining Priorities in a Production Rule System.
The Buddy-Tree: An Efficient and Robust Access Method for Spatial Data Base Systems.
Derived Data Update in Semantic Databases.
QStream: Deterministic Querying of Data Streams.
SchemaSQL - A Language for Interoperability in Relational Multi-Database Systems.
XQuery on SQL Hosts.
Index Concurrency Control in Firm Real-Time Database Systems.
Priority in DBMS Resource Scheduling.
High-Concurrency Locking in R-Trees.
A Polygen Model for Heterogeneous Database Systems: The Source Tagging Perspective.
Efficient Main Memory Data Management Using the DBGraph Storage Model.
Automated Statistics Collection in DB2 UDB.
Handling Data Skew in Multiprocessor Database Computers Using Partition Tuning.
Merging the Results of Approximate Match Operations.
The REMIT System for Paraphrasing Relational Query Expressions into Natural Language.
The Power of Methods With Parallel Semantics.
Multiview: A Methodology for Supporting Multiple Views in Object-Oriented Databases.
Optimization of Relational Schemas Containing Inclusion Dependencies.
Optimizing Boolean Expressions in Object-Bases.
Query Optimization in the Presence of Foreign Functions.
The Case For Safe RAM.
Sampling Large Databases for Association Rules.
DB2 Query Parallelism: Staging and Implementation.
Measured Performance of Time Interval Concurrency Control Techniques.
Concurrent Garbage Collection in O2.
OODB Bulk Loading Revisited: The Partitioned-List Approach.
Deriving Production Rules for Incremental View Maintenance.
Parametric Query Optimization.
Cache-Conscious Radix-Decluster Projections.
Management of Complex Objects as Dynamic Forms.
High-Dimensional OLAP: A Minimal Cubing Approach.
Supporting a Semantic Data Model in a Distributed Database System.
Extending the Relational Algebra to Capture Complex Objects.
Online Balancing of Range-Partitioned Data with Applications to Peer-to-Peer Systems.
Effective & Efficient Document Ranking without using a Large Lexicon.
Operations and the Properties on Non-First-Normal-Form Relational Databases.
Object and File Management in the EXODUS Extensible Database System.
Translating Aggregate Queries into Iterative Programs.
Adaptable Recovery Using Dynamic Quorum Assignments.
Monitoring Database Objects.
Duplicate Removal in Information System Dissemination.
Understanding the Implications of View Update Policies.
Hit Data Model Data Bases from the Functional Point of View.
Where is Business Intelligence taking today's Database Systems?
Index Access with a Finite Buffer.
Constructing Database Systems in a Persistent Environment.
Parity Striping of Disk Arrays: Low-Cost Reliable Storage with Acceptable Throughput.
The O2 Database Programming Language.
A Combined Framework for Grouping and Order Optimization.
Mining Generalized Association Rules.
Fast Incremental Indexing for Full-Text Information Retrieval.
Control of an Extensible Query Optimizer: A Planning-Based Approach.
Dynamic Multi-Resource Load Balancing in Parallel Database Systems.
Memory-Adaptive External Sorting.
Finding Regular Simple Paths in Graph Databases.
Dynamic Load Balancing in Hierarchical Parallel Database Systems.
Applying Data Mining Techniques to a Health Insurance Information System.
Supporting State-Wide Immunisation Tracking Using Multi-Paradigm Workflow Technology.
Closed World Databases Opened Through Null Values.
An Evaluation of Non-Equijoin Algorithms.
The O2 Object Manager: an Overview.
A Model for Integrated Information Systems.
Don't Scrap It, Wrap It! A Wrapper Architecture for Legacy Data Sources.
OdeFS: A File System Interface to an Object-Oriented Database.
User Interfaces; Who Cares?
A Mechanism for Managing the Buffer Pool in a Relational Database System Using the Hot Set Model.
Masking System Crashes in Database Application Programs.
A Region Splitting Strategy for Physical Database Design of Multidimensional File Organizations.
Integration of Buffer Management and Query Optimization in Relational Database Environment.
Model-Driven Data Acquisition in Sensor Networks.
Near Neighbor Search in Large Metric Spaces.
Supporting Flat Relations by a Nested Relational Kernel.
Logical and Physical Versioning in Main Memory Databases.
STING: A Statistical Information Grid Approach to Spatial Data Mining.
An Automatic Data Grabber for Large Web Sites.
Database Experience in the Netherlands PTT (ITCIS).
Needed: Distributed Control.
Estimating Response Time for Auxiliary Memory Configuartions with Multiple Movable-Head Disk Modules.
Data Models for Secondary Storage Representations.
Selection of File Organization Using an Analytic Model.
Queries and Updates in the coDB Peer to Peer Database System.
Multiversion Query Locking.
Production Rules in Parallel and Distributed Database Environments.
Using Probabilistic Information in Data Integration.
Indexing XML Data Stored in a Relational Database.
Evaluating Multiple Server DBMS in General Purpors Operating System Environments.
Coping with Complexity in Automated Reasoning about Database Systems.
Choosing a View Update Translator by Dialog at View Definition Time.
Efficient Testing of High Performance Transaction Processing Systems.
Nested Transactions with Multiple Commit Points: An Approach to the Structuring of Advanced Database Applications.
Providing Database Migration Tools - A Practicioner's Approach.
An Analytical Method for Estimating and Interpreting Query Time.
Designing A Generalized NF2 Model with an SQL-Type Language Interface.
A Methodology for the Design and Transformation of Conceptual Schemas.
A Methodology for View Inegration in Logical Database Design.
An Analysis of Three Transaction Processing Architectures.
Cooperative Transaction Hierarchies: A Transaction Model to Support Design Applications.
Gral: An Extensible Relational Database System for Geometric Applications.
Query Rewrite for XML in Oracle XML DB.
ObjectRank: Authority-Based Keyword Search in Databases.
Efficiency-Quality Tradeoffs for Vector Score Aggregation.
The Private Workspace Model Feasibility and Applications to 2PL Performance Improvements.
Optimization and Dataflow Algorithms for Nested Tree Queries.
BigSur: A System For the Management of Earth Science Data.
The Theory of Probabilistic Databases.
The Performance of Concurrency Control Algorithms for Database Management Systems.
A Denotational Definition of the Semantics of DRC, A Domain Relational Calculus.
A Sophisticate's Introduction to Distributed Concurrency Control (Invited Paper).
Of Objects and Databases: A Decade of Turmoil
Multirelations - Semantice and Languages.
Calibrating the Query Optimizer Cost Model of IRO-DB, an Object-Oriented Federated Database System.
Event-Join Optimization in Temporal Relational Databases.
Maintaining Consistency of Client-Cached Data.
GTE SuperPages: Using IR Techniques for Searching Complex Objects.
Processing Read-Only Queries Over Views With Generalization.
A Multi-Resolution Relational Data Model.
A Practical and Modular Implementation of Extended Transaction Models.
An Electronic Patient Record "on Steroids": Distributed, Peer-to-Peer, Secure and Privacy-conscious.
Hash-Partitioned Join Method Using Dynamic Destaging Strategy.
Browsing Electronic Mail: Experiences Interfacing a Mail System to a DBMS.
Temporal Data Management.
A Theory of Timestamp-Based Concurrency Control for Nested Transactions.
Application of Novel Technologies to the Management of a Very Large Date Base.
A Signature Access Method for the Starburst Database System.
Implementing Queries and Updates on Universal Scheme Interfaces.
Managing Temporal Financial Data in an Extensible Database.
Bit Transposed Files.
Disseminating Updates on Broadcast Disks.
The XPS Approach to Loading and Unloading Terabyte Databases.
Content-Based Image Indexing.
The Voice of the Customer: Innovative and Useful Research Directions (Panel).
A Unifying Framework for Version Control in a CAD Environment.
Characteristics of Scientific Databases.
ShreX: Managing XML Documents in Relational Databases.
Towards an Optimal Data-Structure: CB-trees.
Completeness Information and Its Application to Query Processing.
Managing Complex Objects in an Extensible Relational DBMS.
Integrity Constraints Checking In Deductive Databases.
NetBook - a Data Model to Support Knowledge Exploration.
A Relational Database View Update Translation Mechanism.
Adaptive Load Control in Transaction Processing Systems.
Implementing Set-Oriented Production Rules as an Extension to Starburst.
A Temporal Knowledge Representation Model OSAM*/T and Its Query Language OQL/T.
Adaptive Density Estimation.
An Incrementally Maintainable Index for Approximate Lookups in Hierarchical Data.
Efficient Exact Set-Similarity Joins.
Similarity Search: A Matching Based Approach.
A Dip in the Reservoir: Maintaining Sample Synopses of Evolving Datasets.
Quality Views: Capturing and Exploiting the User Perspective on Data Quality.
A Linear Time Algorithm for Optimal Tree Sibling Partitioning and Approximation Algorithms in Natix.
Entirely Declarative Sensor Network Systems.
Continuous Nearest Neighbor Monitoring in Road Networks.
Efficient Discovery of XML Data Redundancies.
Foundations of Automated Database Tuning.
OntoQuest: Exploring Ontological Data Made Easy.
Data Mining with the SAP Netweaver BI Accelerator.
A Semantic Information Integration Tool Suite.
State-Slice: New Paradigm of Multi-query Optimization of Window-based Stream Queries.
SPIDER: a Schema mapPIng DEbuggeR.
Schema Summarization.
Cost-Based Query Transformation in Oracle.
Adaptive Cleaning for RFID Data Streams.
Advances in Memory Technology.
Putting Context into Schema Matching.
myPortal: Robust Extraction and Aggregation of Web Content.
Type-Based XML Projection.
IPAC - An Interactive Approach to Access Control for Semi-structured Data.
Contest of XML Lock Protocols.
A Middleware for Fast and Flexible Sensor Network Deployment.
Answering Queries from Statistics and Probabilistic Views.
FiST: Scalable XML Document Filtering by Sequencing Twig Patterns.
Data Integration with Uncertainty.
Improving Data Access of J2EE Applications by Exploiting Asynchronous Messaging and Caching Services.
CADS: Continuous Authentication on Data Streams.
Chip-Secured Data Access: Reconciling Access Rights with Data Encryption.
Unrolling Cycles to Decide Trigger Termination.
Clustering Categorical Data: An Approach Based on Dynamical Systems.
Diag-Join: An Opportunistic Join Algorithm for 1:N Relationships.
Resource Scheduling for Composite Multimedia Objects.
The Long-Term Preservation of Authentic Electronic Records.
The Boundary Between Privacy and Utility in Data Publishing.
Zoom*UserViews: Querying Relevant Provenance in Workflow Systems.
Merging Models Based on Given Correspondences.
RankSQL: Supporting Ranking Queries in Relational Database Management Systems.
Proof-Infused Streams: Enabling Authentication of Sliding Window Queries On Streams.
Sketching Streams Through the Net: Distributed Approximate Query Tracking.
Building Structured Web Community Portals: A Top-Down, Compositional, and Incremental Approach.
Query language support for incomplete information in the MayBMS system.
INSITE: A Tool for Interpreting Users? Interaction with a Web Space.
Context-Based Prefetch for Implementing Objects on Relations.
Atomicity versus Anonymity: Distributed Transactions for Electronic Commerce.
Complex Spatio-Temporal Pattern Queries.
The Integrated Microbial Genomes (IMG) System: A Case Study in Biological Data Management.
Recovery Principles in MySQL Cluster 5.1.
Locking Protocols for Materialized Aggregate Join Views.
VGRAM: Improving Performance of Approximate Queries on String Collections Using Variable-Length Grams.
The 3W Model and Algebra for Unified Data Mining.
Fast High-Dimensional Data Search in Incomplete Databases.
An Efficient and Resilient Approach to Filtering and Disseminating Streaming Data.
Building Hierarchical Classifiers Using Class Proximity.
Mapping Adaptation under Evolving Schemas.
Generating Call-Level Interfaces for Advanced Database Application Programming.
Developing an Indexing Scheme for XML Document Collection using the Oracle8i Extensibility Framework.
Warehousing Workflow Data: Challenges and Opportunities.
A Raster Approximation For Processing of Spatial Joins.
Supporting Top-k Join Queries in Relational Databases.
Bidirectional Expansion For Keyword Search on Graph Databases.
Table of Contents (pdf).
Media360 Workflow-Implementing a Workflow Engine Inside a Database.
Efficient Filtering of XML Documents for Selective Dissemination of Information.
FuSem - Exploring Different Semantics of Data Fusion.
Over-encryption: Management of Access Control Evolution on Outsourced Data.
Self-tuning Database Technology and Information Services: from Wishful Thinking to Viable Engineering.
Determining Text Databases to Search in the Internet.
Identifying Representative Trends in Massive Time Series Data Sets Using Sketches.
Hypothetical Queries in an OLAP Environment.
DTD-Directed Publishing with Attribute Translation Grammars.
Efficiently Publishing Relational Data as XML Documents.
Design and Analysis of Parametric Query Optimization Algorithms.
An Automated System for Web Portal Personalization.
Dynamic Update Cube for Range-sum Queries.
Adaptive Stream Filters for Entity-based Queries with Non-Value Tolerance.
Staying FIT: Efficient Load Shedding Techniques for Distributed Stream Processing.
Materialized Views in Probabilistic Databases for Information Exchange and Query Optimization.
Monitoring Streams - A New Class of Data Management Applications.
Ordering Information, Conference Organizers, Program Committees, Additional Reviewers, Additional Demonstrations Reviewers, Sponsors, VLDB Endowment, Preface, Foreword.
Efficient Approximation Of Optimization Queries Under Parametric Aggregation Constraints.
QUIET: Continuous Query-driven Index Tuning.
Lazy Maintenance of Materialized Views.
SQLB: A Query Allocation Framework for Autonomous Consumers and Providers.
NexusScout: An Advanced Location-Based Application on a Distributed, Open Mediation Platform.
Algorithms for Mining Distance-Based Outliers in Large Datasets.
Large-Scale, Standards-Based Earth Observation Imagery and Web Mapping Services.
Estimating the Selectivity of XML Path Expressions for Internet Scale Applications.
On Optimal Node Splitting for R-trees.
Data-Driven, One-To-One Web Site Generation for Data-Intensive Applications.
An Asynchronous Avoidance-Based Cache Consistency Algorithm for Client Caching DBMSs.
AReNA: Adaptive Distributed Catalog Infrastructure Based On Relevance Networks.
The Zero Latency Enterprise.
A Nanotechnology-based Approach to Data Storage.
Technology for Developing Regions.
Query Optimization for XML.
A Logical Framework for Scheduling Workflows under Resource Allocation Constraints.
Statistics on Views.
RainForest - A Framework for Fast Decision Tree Construction of Large Datasets.
MINERVA: Collaborative P2P Search.
A Faceted Query Engine Applied to Archaeology.
Histogram-Based Approximation of Set-Valued Query-Answers.
Adaptive, Hands-Off Stream Mining.
A Regression-Based Temporal Pattern Mining Scheme for Data Streams.
Using Schema Matching to Simplify Heterogeneous Data Translation.
Analyzing energy behavior of spatial access methods for memory-resident data.
KODA - The Architecture And Interface of a Data Model Independent Kernel.
Secure Data Outsourcing.
The End of an Architectural Era (It's Time for a Complete Rewrite).
HePToX: Marrying XML and Heterogeneity in Your P2P Databases.
Selectivity Estimation in Extensible Databases - A Neural Network Approach.
Cache Conscious Indexing for Decision-Support in Main Memory.
The Zero-Delay Data Warehouse: Mobilizing Heterogeneous Databases.
iTrails: Pay-as-you-go Information Integration in Dataspaces.
MDL Summarization with Holes.
The Propel Distributed Services Platform.
BANKS: Browsing and Keyword Searching in Relational Databases.
A Novel Index Supporting High Volume Data Warehouse Insertion.
Extending Practical Pre-Aggregation in On-Line Analytical Processing.
K-Anonymization as Spatial Indexing: Toward Scalable and Incremental Anonymization.
OLAP Over Uncertain and Imprecise Data.
From Tree Patterns to Generalized Tree Patterns: On Efficient Evaluation of XQuery.
Author Index.
Catching the Best Views of Skyline: A Semantic Approach Based on Decisive Subspaces.
A Dynamically Adaptive Distributed System for Processing Complex Continuous Queries.
Process Automation as the Foundation for E-Business.
COMA - A System for Flexible Combination of Schema Matching Approaches.
Data Sharing in the Hyperion Peer Database System.
Update Propagation Strategies for Improving the Quality of Data on the Web.
Streaming Pattern Discovery in Multiple Time-Series.
Novel Approaches to the Indexing of Moving Object Trajectories.
Constructing and integrating data-centric Web Applications: Methods, Tools, and Techniques.
OLAP over Imprecise Data with Domain Constraints.
NetCube: A Scalable Tool for Fast Data Mining and Compression.
Loading a Cache with Query Results.
Structure and Value Synopses for XML Data Graphs.
Query Translation from XPath to SQL in the Presence of Recursive DTDs.
iMeMex: Escapes from the Personal Information Jungle.
Multi-Dimensional Database Allocation for Parallel Data Warehouses.
Approximate String Joins in a Database (Almost) for Free.
Privacy-Preserving Indexing of Documents on the Network.
SOR: A Practical System for Ontology Storage, Reasoning and Search.
nD-SQL: A Multi-Dimensional Language for Interoperability and OLAP.
Hippocratic Databases.
A Dependability Benchmark for OLTP Application Environments.
The Denodo Data Integration Platform.
Operator Scheduling in a Data Stream Manager.
Tuple Routing Strategies for Distributed Eddies.
Systematic Development of Data Mining-Based Data Quality Tools.
Algorithms for Mining Association Rules for Binary Segmentations of Huge Categorical Databases.
An Efficient Method for Performing Record Deletions and Updates Using Index Scans.
The Value of Merge-Join and Hash-Join in SQL Server.
Tree Pattern Aggregation for Scalable XML Data Dissemination.
R-Tree Based Indexing of Now-Relative Bitemporal Data.
Evaluating Top-
A Shrinking-Based Approach for Multi-Dimensional Data Analysis.
Query Processing over Incomplete Autonomous Databases.
Reducing the Braking Distance of an SQL Query Engine.
Miro Web: Integrating Multiple Data Sources through Semistructured Data Types.
Proximity Search in Databases.
Generic Schema Matching with Cupid.
Integration of Data Mining with Database Technology.
Integrating Information for On Demand Computing.
Automated Selection of Materialized Views and Indexes in SQL Databases.
Extracting Large-Scale Knowledge Bases from the Web.
Avoiding Ordering and Grouping In Query Processing.
An Approach to Optimize Data Processing in Business Processes.
An Efficient and Versatile Query Engine for TopX Search.
The Generalized Pre-Grouping Transformation: Aggregate-Query Optimization in the Presence of Dependencies.
OBK - An Online High Energy Physics' Meta-Data Repository.
Structured Materialized Views for XML Queries.
Information Management Challenges from the Aerospace Industry.
Estimating the Output Cardinality of Partial Preaggregation with a Measure of Clusteredness.
Exploiting Versions for Handling Updates in Broadcast Disks.
Transaction Timestamping in (Temporal) Databases.
A Cost-Estimation Component for Statement Sequences.
A STEP Towards Realizing Codd's Vision of Rendezvous with the Casual User.
Sum-Max Monotonic Ranked Joins for Evaluating Top-K Twig Queries on Weighted Data Graphs.
VXMLR: A Visual XML-Relational Database System.
Query-by-Example: the Invocation and Definition of Tables and Forms.
Binary Search Tree Complex - Towards the Implementation of Relations.
The Use of Cluster Analysis in Physical Data Base Design.
An Experimental VM/370 Based Information System.
Optimal Choice of Data Restructuring Points.
Efficient User-Adaptable Similarity Search in Large Multimedia Databases.
Retrieval of Composite Multimedia Objects.
Answering XPath Queries over Networks by Sending Minimal Views.
Towards a Real Horn Clause Language.
LH*RS: A Highly Available Distributed Data Storage.
Reading a Set of Disk Pages.
GraphDB: Modeling and Querying Graphs in Databases.
Extensible Buffer Management of Indexes.
Query Transformation for PSJ-Queries.
Of Nests and Trees: A Unified Approach to Processing Queries That Contain Nested Subqueries, Aggregates, and Quantifiers.
A Formal Model of Trade-off between Optimization and Execution Costs in Semantic Query Optimization.
Hybrid-Range Partitioning Strategy: A New Declustering Strategy for Multiprocessor Database Machines.
The Idea of De-Clustering and its Applications.
A Multi-Purpose Implementation of Mandatory Access Control in Relational Database Management Systems.
Empirical Comparison of Database Concurrency Schemes.
Caprera: An Activity Framework for Transaction Processing on Wide-Area Networks.
A Language for Manipulating Arrays.
Groupwise Processing of Relational Queries.
The Effect of Skewed Data Access on Buffer Hits and Data Contention an a Data Sharing Environment.
Cache Coherency in Oracle Parallel Server.
Indexing Large Human-Motion Databases.
Query Processing for Distance Metrics.
Approximate NN queries on Streams with Guaranteed Error/performance Bounds.
An Abstract Introduction to the Temporal-Hierarchic Data Model (THM).
Multimedia Information Management in an Object-Oriented Database System.
ARIES/NT: A Recovery Method Based on Write-Ahead Logging for Nested Transactions.
A Top-Down Approach for Two Level Serializability.
Rapid Application Prototyping the PROQUEL Language.
A Functional Programming Approach to Deductive Databases.
Green Query Optimization: Taming Query Optimization Overheads through Plan Recycling.
Answering Queries with Aggregation Using Views.
Optimization of Queries with User-defined Predicates
DBMS Research at a Crossroads: The Vienna Update.
Updating Replicated Data During Communications Failures.
Estimating Block Accessses when Attributes are Correlated.
An Empirical Performance Study of the Ingres Search Accelerator for a Large Property Management Database System.
Update Logging for Persistent Programming Languages: A Comparative Performance Evaluation.
Accessing a Relational Database through an Object-Oriented Database Interface.
Constraint Equations: Declarative Expression of Constraints With Automatic Enforcement.
Cooperative Object Buffer Management in the Advanced Information Management Prototype.
Local Disk Caching for Client-Server Database Systems.
Certification by Intervals of Timestamps in Distributed Database Systems.
Qualified Answers That Reflect User Needs and Preferences.
A New SQL-like Operator for Mining Association Rules.
A Conceptual Model for Dynamic Clustering in Object Databases.
Techniques for Design and Implementation of Efficient Spatial Access Methods.
Dependency Satisfaction in Databases with Incomplete Information.
An Object-Oriented Environment for OIS Applications.
The Type Concept in Office Document Retrieval.
A Study of Index Structures for Main Memory Database Management Systems.
The Changing Landscape of the Software Industry and its Implications for India
Experiences With an Object Manager for a Process-Centered Environment.
Trust-Serv: A Lightweight Trust Negotiation Service.
Tioga: Providing Data Management Support for Scientific Visualization Applications.
Elimination of View and Redundant Variables in a SQL-like Database Language for Extended NF2 Structures.
An Architecture and Data Model for CAD Databases.
Microprocessor Assisted Tuple Access, Decompression and Assembly for Statistical Database Systems.
Managing Memory to Meet Multiclass Workload Response Time Goals.
Effective Memory Use in a Media Server.
Consistency and Transactions in CAD Database.
Database Challenges in the Integration of Biomedical Data Sets.
The Rufus System: Information Organization for Semi-Structured Data.
Pre-Analysis Locking: A Safe and Deadlock Free Locking Policy.
Query Processing in Tertiary Memory Databases.
A-ToPSS: A Publish/Subscribe System Supporting Imperfect Information Processing.
Building Usable Menu-Based Natural Language Interfaces To Databases.
A Heuristic Approach to Distributed Query Processing.
TPC-D: The Challenges, Issues and Results.
A Method for Change Computation in Deductive Databases.
Parallel Algorithms and Their Implementation in MICRONET.
A Deductive Method for Entity-Relationship Modeling.
A Very Large Database System to Serve National Welfare.
Finding Data in the Neighborhood.
STEPS towards Cache-resident Transaction Processing.
Performance Analysis of Disk Arrays under Failure.
Language Constructs for Programming Active Databases.
Information Processing for CAD/VLSI on a Generalized Data Management System.
A logical framework for temporal deductive databases.
The Impact of Global Clustering on Spatial Database Systems.
Relationship Merging in Schema Integration.
Efficient Search in Very Large Databases.
Memory-Contention Responsive Hash Joins.
On Restructuring Nested Relations in Partitioned Normal Form.
AIDA: an Adaptive Immersive Data Analyzer.
Extending the Algebraic Framework of Query Processing to Handle Outerjoins.
Adaptive Data Broadcast in Hybrid Networks.
Scheduling Real-Time Transactions with Disk Resident Data.
Selective Deferred Index Maintenance & Concurrency Control in Integrated Information Systems.
An Interactive Query Language for External Data Bases.
Program Analysis for Conversion from a Navigation to a Specification Database Interface.
Comprehensive Approach to the Design of Relational Database Schemes.
Computing Frequent Itemsets Inside Oracle 10G.
Coalescing in Temporal Databases.
A Cost-Effective Method for Providing Improved Data Availability During DBMS Restart Recovery After a Failure.
WS-CatalogNet: An Infrastructure for Creating, Peering, and Querying e-Catalog Communities.
Bypassing Joins in Disjunctive Queries.
A Low Communication Sort Algorithm for a Parallel Database Machine.
A Multidatabase Transaction Model for InterBase.
Cumulative Updates.
Incremental Organization for Data Recording and Warehousing.
Development of a Multimedia Information System for an Office Environment.
Composite Events for Active Databases: Semantics, Contexts and Detection.
COMPASS: A Concept-based Web Search Engine for HTML, XML, and Deep Web Data.
A Model of CAD Transactions.
A Family of Incomplete Relational Database Models.
Modelling Non Deterministic Queries and Updates in Deductive Databases.
Rule Ordering in Bottom-Up Fixpoint Evaluation of Logic Programs.
The Role of Integrity Constraints in Database Interoperation.
New Strategies for Computing the Transitive Closure of a Database Relation.
Managing Text as Data.
Querying and Updating the File.
Dynamic and Order Preserving Data Partitioning for Database Machines.
Memory-Limited Execution of Windowed Stream Joins.
Bulk Loading into an OODB: A Performance Study.
Active Databases as a Paradigm for Enhanced Computing Environments.
Managing Data from High-Throughput Genomic Processing: A Case Study.
Resource Scheduling in Enhanced Pay-Per-View Continuous Media Databases.
Optimizing Queries with Universal Quantification in Object-Oriented and Object-Relational Databases.
MOBY: An Architecture for Distributed Expert Database Systems.
A Superimposed Coding Scheme Based on Multiple Block Descriptor Files for Indexing Very Large Data Bases.
A Temporal Evolutionary Object-Oriented Data Model and Its Query Language for Medical Image Management.
Towards Event-Driven Modelling for Database Design.
New Seat Reservation System for Japanese National Railways - Distributed Processing Network and High Efficiency Databases.
Reducing Storage for Quorum Consensus Algorithms.
Scheduling Real-time Transactions: a Performance Evaluation.
Temporal Logic & Historical Databases.
R* Optimizer Validation and Performance Evaluation for Distributed Queries.
Statistical Databases: Characteristics, Problems, and some Solutions.
Towards an ODMG-Compliant Visual Object Query Language.
Progressive Optimization in Action.
Performance Evaluation of an Adaptive and Robust Load Control Method for the Avoidance of Data-Contention Thrashing.
A Privacy-Preserving Index for Range Queries.
Some Experimental Results on Distributed Join Algorithms in a Local Network.
Database Research Strategies of Funding Agencies (Panel).
Bloom Histogram: Path Selectivity Estimation for XML Data with Updates.
Selectivity Estimation Without the Attribute Value Independence Assumption.
V-Trees - A Storage Method for Long Vector Data.
W3QS: A Query System for the World-Wide Web.
A Tool for Modular Database Design.
Composite Event Specification in Active Databases: Model & Implementation.
Historical Multi-Media Databases.
A Target Logical Schema: The ACS.
ENIAM: A More Complete Conceptual Schema Language.
Simple Random Sampling from Relational Databases.
Fill-in-the-Form Programming.
File Processing Efficiency on the Content Addressable File Store.
Updating Derived Relations: Detecting Irrelevant and Autonomously Computable Updates.
Information Retrieval from an Incomplete Data Cube.
Access to Objects by Path Expressions and Rules.
Quasi Serializability: a Correctness Criterion for Global Concurrency Control in InterBase.
An Algebraic Approach to Rule Analysis in Expert Database Systems.
Implementation and Performance Evaluation of a Parallel Transitive Closure Algorithm on PRISMA/DB.
Selectivity Estimation and Query Optimization in Large Databases with Highly Skewed Distribution of Column Values.
On The Marriage of Lp-norms and Edit Distance.
Data Management for Large Rule Systems.
On the Computation of the Transitive Closure of Relational Operators.
Vertical Data Migration in Large Near-Line Document Archives Based on Markov-Chain Predictions.
A Cost Model for Clustered Object-Oriented Databases.
Heterogeneity in the Distributed Database Management System SIRIUS-DELTA.
Semantic Integrity Dependencies and Delayed Integrity Checking.
Database Tuning.
On-Demand Data Elevation in Hierarchical Multimedia Storage Servers.
The ClustRa Telecom Database: High Availability, High Throughput, and Real-Time Response.
Accommodating Exceptions in Databases, and Refining the Schema by Learning from them.
Synthesizing Database Transactions.
Intra-Transaction Parallelism in the Mapping of an Object Model to a Relational Multi-Processor System.
Using Formal Methods to Reason about Semantics-Based Decompositions of Transactions.
CHICAGO: A Test and Evaluation Environment for Coarse-Grained Optimization.
A Foundation for Multi-dimensional Databases.
Optimization Algorithms for Exploiting the Parallelism-Communication Tradeoff in Pipelined Parallelism.
A Formal Approach to Recovery by Compensating Transactions.
A Personal Data Manager.
Limiting Disclosure in Hippocratic Databases.
Fast Algorithms for Mining Association Rules in Large Databases.
An Overview of Repository Technology.
Principles of Optimally Placing Data in Tertiary Storage Libraries.
Update Semantics for Incomplete Databases.
LinkClus: Efficient Clustering via Heterogeneous Semantic Links.
EOS
A Deferred Cleansing Method for RFID Data Analytics.
Link Spam Detection Based on Mass Estimation.
Debugging Schema Mappings with Routes.
NUITS: A Novel User Interface for Efficient Keyword Search over Databases.
R-SOX: Runtime Semantic Query Optimization over XML Streams.
SIREN: A Similarity Retrieval Engine for Complex Data.
Answering Top-k Queries Using Views.
Efficient Allocation Algorithms for OLAP Over Imprecise Data.
TRAC: Toward Recency and Consistency Reporting in a Database with Distributed Data Sources.
Randomized Algorithms for Matrices and Massive Data Sets.
The New Casper: Query Processing for Location Services without Compromising Privacy.
A Decade of Progress in Indexing and Mining Large Time Series Databases.
Online Outlier Detection in Sensor Data Using Non-Parametric Models.
SMOQE: A System for Providing Secure Access to XML.
To Tune or not to Tune? A Lightweight Physical Design Alerter.
Full Disjunctions: Polynomial-Delay Iterators in Action.
ULDBs: Databases with Uncertainty and Lineage.
Window-Aware Load Shedding for Aggregation Queries over Data Streams.
AQAX: A System for Approximate XML Query Answers.
XCheck: A Platform for Benchmarking XQuery Engines.
Distance Indexing on Road Networks.
Reference-based Indexing of Sequence Databases.
WISE-Integrator: An Automatic Integrator of Web Search Interfaces for E-Commerce.
Selectivity Estimation for Fuzzy String Predicates in Large Data Sets.
Efficacious Data Cube Exploration by Semantic Summarization and Compression.
Updates for Structure Indexes.
Performance Issues in Incremental Warehouse Maintenance.
OASIS: An Online and Accurate Technique for Local-alignment Searches on Biological Sequences.
Optimistic Intra-Transaction Parallelism on Chip Multiprocessors.
The TEXTURE Benchmark: Measuring Performance of Text Queries on a Relational DBMS.
Distributed Hypertext Resource Discovery Through Examples.
Database Publication Practices.
Optimal Histograms with Quality Guarantees.
Reasoning about the Behavior of Semantic Web Services with Concurrent Transaction Logic.
DISCOVER: Keyword Search in Relational Databases.
A Knowledge-Based Approach to Data Management for Intelligent User Interfaces.
A Framework for Automating Physical Database Design.
Fast Text Access Methods for Optical and Large Magnetic Disks: Designs and Performance Comparison.
How to Forget the Past Without Repeating It.
Efficiently Linking Text Documents with Relevant Structured Information.
Active and Accelerated Learning of Cost Models for Optimizing Scientific Applications.
GMine: A System for Scalable, Interactive Graph Visualization and Mining.
HISA: A Query System Bridging The Semantic Gap For Large Image Databases.
The Design of a Rotating Associative Array Memory for a Relational Database Management Application.
Efficient Detection of Empty-Result Queries.
An Algebraic Query Model for Effective and Efficient Retrieval of XML Fragments.
XML Evolution: A Two-phase XML Processing Model Using XML Prefiltering Techniques.
Crimson: A Data Management System to Support Evaluating Phylogenetic Tree Reconstruction Algorithms.
Compact Histograms for Hierarchical Identifiers.
Inference of Concise DTDs from XML Data.
Analysis of Two Existing and One New Dynamic Programming Algorithm for the Generation of Optimal Bushy Join Trees without Cross Products.
Trustworthy Keyword Search for Regulatory-Compliant Record Retention.
Query Co-Processing on Commodity Processors.
CURE for Cubes: Cubing Using a ROLAP Engine.
Twig
Meaningful Labeling of Integrated Query Interfaces.
Adaptive Self-tuning Memory in DB2.
Streaming in a Connected World.
Composite Subset Measures.
Multi-column Substring Matching for Database Schema Translation.
Mapping Moving Landscapes by Mining Mountains of Logs: Novel Techniques for Dependency Model Generation.
PARAgrab: A Comprehensive Architecture for Web Image Management and Multimodal Querying.
Simple and Realistic Data Generation.
Answering Imprecise Queries over Web Databases.
Quality-driven Integration of Heterogenous Information Systems.
Value-Based Notification Conditions in Large-Scale Publish/Subscribe Systems.
Best Position Algorithms for Top-k Queries.
Tabular Placement of Relational Data on MEMS-based Storage Devices.
CMS-ToPSS: Efficient Dissemination of RSS Documents.
ULoad: Choosing the Right Storage for Your XML Application.
Dynamic Pipeline Scheduling for Improving Interactive Query Performance.
Supporting Frequent Updates in R-Trees: A Bottom-Up Approach.
BlogScope: A System for Online Analysis of High Volume Text Streams.
DTL's DataSpot: Database Exploration Using Plain Language.
Effective Change Detection Using Sampling.
Semantic Overlay Networks.
The TreeScape System: Reuse of Pre-Computed Aggregates over Irregular OLAP Hierarchies.
A Multi-version Cache Replacement and Prefetching Policy for Hybrid Data Delivery Environments.
Oracle Industrial Exhibit.
Hubble: An Advanced Dynamic Folder Technology for XML.
P2P Authority Analysis for Social Communities.
Tuning Schema Matching Software using Synthetic Scenarios.
Efficient IR-Style Keyword Search over Relational Databases.
Link Spam Alliances.
Ad-hoc Top-k Query Answering for Data Streams.
Biodiversity Informatics: The Challenge of Rapid Development, Large Databases, and Complex Data (Keynote).
Querying XML Views of Relational Data.
DAMIA - A Data Mashup Fabric for Intranet Applications.
Adaptive Fastest Path Computation on a Road Network: A Traffic Mining Approach.
Multiscale Histograms: Summarizing Topological Relations in Large Spatial Datasets.
ICICLES: Self-Tuning Samples for Approximate Query Answering.
LegoDB: Customizing Relational Storage for XML Documents.
GhostDB: Hiding Data from Prying Eyes.
An Ultra Highly Available DBMS.
Client Assignment in Content Dissemination Networks for Dynamic Data.
Large Scale P2P Distribution of Open-Source Software.
Bridging the Gap between OLAP and SQL.
Flexible and scalable digital library search.
The ND-Tree: A Dynamic Indexing Technique for Multidimensional Non-ordered Discrete Data Spaces.
RRXF: Redundancy reducing XML storage in relations.
Declarative Data Cleaning: Language, Model, and Algorithms.
Graph Indexing: Tree + Delta >= Graph.
Integrated Data Management for Mobile Services in the Real World.
XML Schemas in Oracle XML DB.
Adaptive query processing: Why, How, When, and What Next?
Benefits of Path Summaries in an XML Query Optimizer Supporting Multiple Access Methods.
FeedbackBypass: A New Approach to Interactive Similarity Query Processing.
Materialized Views in Oracle.
Efficient Index Structures for String Databases.
Issues in Developing Very Large Data Warehouses.
The Cubetree Storage Organization.
Processing Forecasting Queries.
Parallel Execution of Test Runs for Database Application Systems.
RankMass Crawler: A Crawler with High PageRank Coverage Guarantee.
Experience Report: Exploiting Advanced Database Optimization Features for Large-Scale SAP R/3 Installations.
XSEarch: A Semantic Search Engine for XML.
Pattern Tree Algebras: Sets or Sequences?
Memory Requirements for Query Execution in Highly Constrained Devices.
Concurrency in the Data Warehouse.
Efficient Processing of XML Path Queries Using the Disk-based F&B Index.
Peer-to-Peer Similarity Search in Metric Spaces.
Xcerpt and visXcerpt: From Pattern-Based to Visual Querying of XML and Semistructured Data.
Implementing Xquery 1.0: The Galax Experience.
Probabilistic Graphical Models and their Role in Databases.
From Data Privacy to Location Privacy: Models and Algorithms.
Indexing and Querying XML Data for Regular Path Expressions.
n-Gram/2L: A Space and Time Efficient Two-Level n-Gram Inverted Index Structure.
GeMBASE: A Geometric Mediator for Brain Analysis with Surface Ensembles.
Managing Intervals Efficiently in Object-Relational Databases.
Information Integration and XML in IBM's DB2.
Active Storage Hierarchy, Database Systems and Applications - Socratic Exegesis.
XMark: A Benchmark for XML Data Management.
Mapping Maintenance for Data Integration Systems.
Multi-Probe LSH: Efficient Indexing for High-Dimensional Similarity Search .
WISE-Integrator: A System for Extracting and Integrating Complex Web Search Interfaces of the Deep Web.
Optimized Query Execution in Large Search Engines with Global Page Ordering.
Temporal Management of RFID Data.
A Quantitative Analysis and Performance Study for Similarity-Search Methods in High-Dimensional Spaces.
Self-Organizing Schema Mappings in the GridVine Peer Data Management System.
ConQuer: A System for Efficient Querying Over Inconsistent Databases.
RoadRunner: Towards Automatic Data Extraction from Large Web Sites.
Change-Centric Management of Versions in an XML Warehouse.
Hash Joins and Hash Teams in Microsoft SQL Server.
Preference SQL - Design, Implementation, Experiences.
ACTIVIEW: Adaptive data presentation using SuperSQL.
DB2 Spatial Extender - Spatial data within the RDBMS.
O-O, What Have They Done to DB2?
Xquec: Pushing Queries to Compressed XML Data.
Business Process Coordination: State of the Art, Trends, and Open Issues.
MIST: Distributed Indexing and Querying in Sensor Networks using Statistical Models.
SELF-SERV: A Platform for Rapid Composition of Web Services in a Peer-to-Peer Environment.
Analyzing Plan Diagrams of Database Query Optimizers.
BATON: A Balanced Tree Structure for Peer-to-Peer Networks.
Spatio-Temporal Retrieval with RasDaMan.
MIX: A Meta-data Indexing System for XML.
Repeating History Beyond ARIES.
Matching Twigs in Probabilistic XML.
AniPQO: Almost Non-intrusive Parametric Query Optimization for Nonlinear Cost Functions.
StreamGlobe: Processing and Sharing Data Streams in Grid-Based P2P Infrastructures.
Plan Selection Based on Query Clustering.
Eliminating Fuzzy Duplicates in Data Warehouses.
Distributed Privacy Preserving Information Sharing.
On Efficiently Implementing SchemaSQL on an SQL Database System.
Extending Q-Grams to Estimate Selectivity of String Matching with Low Edit Distance.
Information Management for Genome Level Bioinformatics.
The GCX System: Dynamic Buffer Minimization in Streaming XQuery Evaluation.
Context-Aware Wrapping: Synchronized Data Extraction.
MV3R-Tree: A Spatio-Temporal Access Method for Timestamp and Interval Queries.
Illuminating the Dark Side of Web Services.
On the minimization of Xpath queries.
Controlling Data Warehouses with Knowledge Networks.
Offline and Data Stream Algorithms for Efficient Computation of Synopsis Structures.
Parallel Querying with Non-Dedicated Computers.
Advanced Database Technologies in a Diabetic Healthcare System.
Efficient Skyline Computation over Low-Cardinality Domains.
Indexable PLA for Efficient Similarity Search.
Searching on the Secondary Structure of Protein Sequences.
Exact Indexing of Dynamic Time Warping.
To Share or Not To Share?
Declarative Information Extraction Using Datalog with Embedded Extraction Predicates.
Evolution of Groupware for Business Applications: A Database Perspective on Lotus Domino/Notes.
Chameleon: an Extensible and Customizable Tool for Web Data Translation.
Fast Time Sequence Indexing for Arbitrary Lp Norms.
WARLOCK: A Data Allocation Tool for Parallel Warehouses.
XML Repository and Active Views Demonstration.
An Evaluation of Generic Bulk Loading Techniques.
Adaptable Similarity Search using Non-Relevant Information.
Definition and Evaluation of Access Rules in Data Management Systems.
Reorganization Points for File Designs with Nonlinear Processing Costs.
PRTV: An Efficient Implementation for Large Relational Data Bases.
A Reliable Backend Using Multiattribute Clustering and Select-Join Operator.
LAURA: A Formal Data Model and her Logical Design Methodology.
Using Flexible Transactions to Support Multi-System Telecommunication Applications.
Aggregates in Possibilistic Databases.
A Surrogate Concept for Engineering Databases.
Hilbert R-tree: An Improved R-tree using Fractals.
DataGuides: Enabling Query Formulation and Optimization in Semistructured Databases.
Analysis of n-Dimensional Quadtrees using the Hausdorff Fractal Dimension
A New Presumed Commit Optimization for Two Phase Commit.
Sorting, Grouping and Duplicate Elimination in the Advanced Information Management Prototype.
Locking and Latching in a Memory-Resident Database System.
Structures, Semantics and Statistics.
Measuring the Complexity of Join Enumeration in Query Optimization.
Recursive Strategies for Answering Recursive Queries - The RQA/FQI Strategy.
Data Sharing Analysis for a Database Programming Lanaguage via Abstract Interpretation.
Maximizing Buffer and Disk Utilizations for News On-Demand.
Search Key Substitution in the Encipherment of B-Trees.
Split-Transactions for Open-Ended Activities.
Indexing in a Hypertext Database.
Object-Oriented Specification of Databases: An Algebraic Approach.
Fido: A Cache That Learns to Fetch.
Effective Resource Utilization for Multiprocessor Join Execution.
Database De-Centralization - A Practical Approach.
Obtaining Complete Answers from Incomplete Databases.
ROX: Relational Over XML.
Retrieval of Relational Structures for Image Sequence Analysis.
Multiple-View Self-Maintenance in Data Warehousing Environments.
Querying Multiple Features of Groups in Relational Databases.
A Strategy for Decomposing Complex Queries in a Heterogeneous DDB.
The POSTGRES Data Model.
Estimating the Size of Generalized Transitive Closures.
On Implementing a Language for Specifying Active Database Execution Models.
Efficient Transitive Closure Algorithms.
Using Referential Integrity To Easily Define Consistent Subset Replicas.
Returning Modified Rows - SELECT Statements with Side Effects.
Database Applications in Developing Countries.
Innovation in Database Management: Computer Science vs. Engineering.
SVT: Schema Validation Tool for Microsoft SQL-Server.
A Taxonomy and Performance Model of Data Skew Effects in Parallel Joins.
Semantic Integration in Heterogeneous Databases Using Neural Networks.
Query and Update Efficient B+-Tree Based Indexing of Moving Objects.
Generalized Search Trees for Database Systems.
Similarity based Retrieval of Pictures Using Indices on Spatial Relationships.
Effects of Database Size on Rule System Performance: Five Case Studies.
From VLDB to VMLDB (Very MANY Large Data Bases): Dealing with Large-Scale Semantic Heterogenity.
Optimization of Nested Queries in a Distributed Relational Database.
Recovering Information from Summary Data.
Accurate and Efficient Crawling for Relevant Websites.
Storage Estimation for Multidimensional Aggregates in the Presence of Hierarchies.
Log-Based Recovery for Nested Transactions.
Experimental Evaluation of Real-Time Optimistic Concurrency Control Schemes.
Knowledge Discovery in Databases: An Attribute-Oriented Approach.
What is the Data Warehousing Problem? (Are Materialized Views the Answer?)
Merging Ranks from Heterogeneous Internet Sources.
WATCHMAN : A Data Warehouse Intelligent Cache Manager.
Checking Consistency of Database Constraints: a Logical Basis.
Top-k Query Evaluation with Probabilistic Guarantees.
Sampling-Based Estimation of the Number of Distinct Values of an Attribute.
Ode as an Active Database: Constraints and Triggers.
Experiments on Access to Digital Libraries: How can Images and Text be Used Together.
The Performance and Utility of the Cactis Implementation Algorithms.
The Oracle Warehouse.
Practical Skew Handling in Parallel Joins.
The Bloomba Personal Content Database.
An Implementation of Hypothetical Relations.
NeuroRule: A Connectionist Approach to Data Mining.
DWMS: Data Warehouse Management System.
On the Algebraic Specification of Databases.
Production Database Systems: Making Them Easy is Hard Work.
Implementation and Analysis of a Parallel Collection Query Language.
Design of a Signature File Method that Accounts for Non-Uniform Occurrence and Query Frequencies.
Dynamic Memory Allocation for Multiple-Query Workloads.
Dynamic Constraints and Object Migration.
Managing Intra-operator Parallelism in Parallel Database Systems.
Freeform: A User-Adaptable Form Management System.
Promises and Realities of Active Database Systems.
Efficient Construction of Regression Trees with Range and Region Splitting.
Relating Distributed Objects.
On Analogical Query Processing in Logic Database.
An Interval Classifier for Database Mining Applications.
The Microsoft Repository.
Extending the Search Strategy in a Query Optimizer.
Managing Semantic Heterogeneity with Production Rules and Persistent Queues.
Schema and Database Evolution in the O2 Object Database System.
Computing Queries from Derived Relations.
OS Support for VLDBs: Unix Enhancements for the Teradata Data Base.
Toward Practical Constraint Databases.
Framework for the Security Component of an Ada DBMS.
A Product Specification Database for Visual Prototyping.
Metadata Management for Large Statistical Databases.
Using Taxonomy, Discriminants, and Signatures for Navigating in Text Databases.
Magic Functions: A Technique to Optimize Extended Datalog Recursive Programs.
BilVideo Video Database Management System.
Implementation Techniques of Complex Objects.
Reordering Query Execution in Tertiary Memory Databases.
An Extended Relational Database Model for Uncertain and Imprecise Information.
HiFi: A Unified Architecture for High Fan-in Systems.
Parallel Query Scheduling and Optimization with Time- and Space-Shared Resources.
ARIEL - A Semantic Front-End to Relational DBMSs.
Supporting Ontology-Based Semantic matching in RDBMS.
Dynamic Memory Adjustment for External Mergesort.
Parallel Processing of Recursive Queries in Distributed Architectures.
CMD: A Multidimensional Declustering Method for Parallel Data Systems.
Efficient and Effective Clustering Methods for Spatial Data Mining.
Relational link-based ranking.
Non-Monotonic Knowledge Evolution in VLKDBs.
View Management in Distributed Data Base Systems.
A Study of Three Alternative Workstation-Server Architectures for Object Oriented Database Systems.
Ski: A Semantics-Knowledgeable Interface.
Schema-based Scheduling of Event Processors and Buffer Minimization for Queries on Structured Data Streams.
Compact 0-Complete Trees.
Performance and Scalability of Client-Server Database Architectures.
Improved Unnesting Algorithms for Join Aggregate SQL Queries.
Lifting the Burden of History from Adaptive Query Processing.
Aggregate-Query Processing in Data Warehousing Environments.
Fast Similarity Search in the Presence of Noise, Scaling, and Translation in Time-Series Databases.
Design and Implementation of an Extensible Database Management System Supporting User Defined Data Types and Functions.
G-WHIZ, a Visual Interface for the Functional Model with Recursion.
Predictive Load Control for Flexible Buffer Allocation.
The Double Life of the Transaction Abstraction: Fundamental Principle and Evolving System Concept.
The R+-Tree: A Dynamic Index for Multi-Dimensional Objects.
Design and Analysis of Integrated Concurrency-Coherence Controls.
Cost-based Selection of Path Expression Processing Algorithms in Object-Oriented Databases.
Random Sampling from B+ Trees.
Algebraic Optimization of Computations over Scientific Databases.
Mind Your Grammar: a New Approach to Modelling Text.
Querying a Multilevel Database: A Logical Analysis.
Incremental File Reorganization Schemes.
Efficient Snapshot Differential Algorithms for Data Warehousing.
A Transactional Model for Long-Running Activities.
Flexible Relations - Operational Support of Variant Relational Structures.
On Affinity Based Routing in Multi-System Data Sharing.
End User Access to Very Large Databases in an Automated Office/Workstation Environment.
A Plan-Operator Concept for Client-Based Knowledge Progressing.
Functional Dependencies in Logic Programs.
Persistent Threads.
Proclamation-Based Model for Cooperating Transactions.
Hash-Based Join Algorithms for Multiprocessor Computers.
Integrating Triggers and Declarative Constraints in SQL Database Sytems.
A Metadata Approach to Resolving Semantic Conflicts.
Mobile Computing: Fertile Research Area or Black Hole? (Panel).
The Effect of Bucket Size Tuning in the Dynamic Hybrid GRACE Hash Join Method.
Concurrent Operations in Extendible Hashing.
NCR 3700 - The Next-Generation Industrial Database Computer.
Kaleidoscope Data Model for An English-like Query Language.
ILOG: Declarative Creation and Manipulation of Object Identifiers.
Benchmarking Spatial Join Operations with Spatial Output.
An Information-Theoretic Study on Aggregate Responses.
Aggregation and Relevance in Deductive Databases.
Semantics of Network Data Manipulation Languages: An Object-Oriented Approach.
MineSet(tm): A System for High-End Data Mining and Visualization.
Optimization of Systems of Algebraic Equations for Evaluating Datalog Queries.
Research and Development on Knowledge Bases Systems at ICOT.
Management Of Schema Evolution In Databases.
Semantic Modeling of Object Oriented Databases.
A Dual Space Representation for Geometric Data.
Adaptive Locking Strategies in a Multi-node Data Sharing Environment.
Optimizing Random Retrievals from CLV format Optical Disks.
Integrating Automatic Data Acquisition with Business Processes - Experiences with SAP's Auto-ID Infrastructure.
Modelling and Querying Video Data.
Fast Nearest Neighbor Search in Medical Image Databases.
Viewers: A Data-World Analogue of Procedure Calls.
Distributed Linear Hashing and Parallel Projection in Main Memory Databases.
The Complexity of Transformation-Based Join Enumeration.
Incremental Reorganization of Relational Databases.
WIC: A General-Purpose Algorithm for Monitoring Web Information Sources.
Local and Global Query Optimization Mechanisms for Relational Databases.
Querying Shapes of Histories.
Querying in Highly Mobile Distributed Environments.
From a laguna to open waters: Another view on the next generations of databases.
Reverse kNN Search in Arbitrary Dimensionality.
Enhancements to the Voting Algorithm.
Investigation of Algebraic Query Optimisation Techniques for Database Programming Languages.
Direct Algorithms for Computing the Transitive Closure of Database Relations.
Data Manager for Evolvable Real-time Command and Control Systems.
An Implementation of Impure Surrogates.
Locking with Prevention of Cyclic and Infinite Restarting in Distributed Database Systems.
The Complexity of Fully Materialized Coalesced Cubes.
Global Memory Management in Client-Server Database Architectures.
The Design of GridDB: A Data-Centric Overlay for the Scientific Grid.
Resilient Rights Protection for Sensor Streams.
A Study of Sort Algorithms for Multiprocessor Database Machines.
Integrity Constraint Reformulation for Efficient Validation.
Performance Measurements of Tertiary Storage Devices.
Filtering with Approximate Predicates.
Checking for k-Anonymity Violation by Views.
Crawling the Hidden Web.
Aqua: A Fast Decision Support Systems Using Approximate Query Answers.
Distinct Sampling for Highly-Accurate Answers to Distinct Values Queries and Event Reports.
Mixed Mode XML Query Processing.
Relational Databases for Querying XML Documents: Limitations and Opportunities.
Supporting Time-Constrained SQL Queries in Oracle.
Low-Cost Compensation-Based Query Processing.
Improving Business Process Quality through Exception Understanding, Prediction, and Prevention.
A Single Pass Computing Engine for Interactive Analysis of VLDBs.
Scientific OLAP for the Biotech Domain.
Database Change Notifications: Primitives for Efficient Database Query Result Caching.
On the Correctness Criteria of Fine-Grained Access Control in Relational Databases.
Cache-conscious Frequent Pattern Mining on a Modern Processor.
Business Process Cockpit.
On Efficient Spatial Matching.
Personalized Systems: Models and Methods from an IR and DB Perspective.
Caching with 'Good Enough' Currency, Consistency, and Completeness.
Rewriting XPath Queries Using Materialized Views.
U-DBMS: A Database System for Managing Constantly-Evolving Data.
Consistently Estimating the Selectivity of Conjuncts of Predicates.
An Interpolated Volume Data Model.
From Data Independence to Knowledge Independence: An on-going Story.
The Heterogeneity Problem and Middleware Technology: Experiences with and Performance of Database Gateways.
Supporting RFID-based Item Tracking Applications in Oracle DBMS Using a Bitmap Datatype.
Tree-Pattern Queries on a Lightweight XML Processor.
CellSort: High Performance Sorting on the Cell Processor.
UQLIPS: A Real-time Near-duplicate Video Clip Detection System.
Prediction Cubes.
PrediCalc: A Logical Spreadsheet Management System.
Local Dimensionality Reduction: A New Approach to Indexing High Dimensional Spaces.
Summarizing and Mining Inverse Distributions on Data Streams via Dynamic Inverse Sampling.
CXHist : An On-line Classification-Based Histogram for XML String Selectivity Estimation.
Automatic Composition of Transition-based Semantic Web Services with Messaging.
Memex: A Browsing Assistant for Collaborative Archiving and Mining of Surf Trails.
LoPiX: A System for XML Data Integration and Manipulation.
The Mirror MMDBMS Architecture.
Practical Applications of Triggers and Constraints: Success and Lingering Issues (10-Year Award).
PUBLIC: A Decision Tree Classifier that Integrates Building and Pruning.
High-Performance and Scalability through Application Tier,In-Memory Data Management.
OLAP++: Powerful and Easy-to-Use Federations of OLAP and Object Databases.
A Prototype Content-Based Retrieval System that Uses Virtual Images to Save Space.
Storage and Querying of E-Commerce Data.
Cost Models DO Matter: Providing Cost Information for Diverse Data Sources in a Federated System.
Continuous Nearest Neighbor Search.
Querying Continuous Time Sequences.
Networked Data Management Design Points.
Grid and Applications (Industrial Session).
PM3: An Orthogonal Persistent Systems Programming Language - Design, Implementation, Performance.
TOPAZ: a Cost-Based, Rule-Driven, Multi-Phase Parallelizer.
On Map-Matching Vehicle Tracking Data.
Indexing Mixed Types for Approximate Retrieval.
Optimization of Frequent Itemset Mining on Multiple-Core Processor.
User-Defined Table Operators: Enhancing Extensibility for ORDBMS.
Offering a Precision-Performance Tradeoff for Aggregation Queries over Replicated Data.
OrientStore: A Schema Based Native XML Storage System.
Temporal Slicing in the Evaluation of XML Queries.
The WorlInfo Assistant: Spatio-Temporal Information Integration on the Web.
Using Association Rules for Fraud Detection in Web Advertising Networks.
Query Processing in Spatial Network Databases.
A One-Pass Aggregation Algorithm with the Optimal Buffer Size in Multidimensional OLAP.
HiSbase: Histogram-based P2P Main Memory Data Management.
Approximate Frequency Counts over Data Streams.
Optimizing View Queries in ROLEX to Support Navigable Result Trees.
RE-Tree: An Efficient Index Structure for Regular Expressions.
MARS: A System for Publishing XML from Mixed and Redundant Storage.
The SphereSearch Engine for Unified Ranked Retrieval of Heterogeneous XML and Web Documents.
DBMSs on a Modern Processor: Where Does Time Go?
Form-Based Proxy Caching for Database-Backed Web Sites.
REED: Robust, Efficient Filtering and Event Detection in Sensor Networks.
Efficient Use of the Query Optimizer for Automated Database Design.
Improving Data Quality: Consistency and Accuracy.
Expiring Data in a Warehouse.
Getting Priorities Straight: Improving Linux Support for Database I/O.
Detecting Attribute Dependencies from Query Feedback.
Depth Estimation for Ranking Query Optimization.
Hyper-Programming in Java.
The BEA/XQRL Streaming XQuery Processor.
Potter's Wheel: An Interactive Data Cleaning System.
Semantic Adaptation of Schema Mappings when Schemas Evolve.
A 20/20 Vision of the VLDB-2020?
Path Queries on Compressed XML.
Inspector Joins.
Semi-Automatic Schema Integration in Clio.
Mining Multi-Dimensional Constrained Gradients in Data Cubes.
Data Bubbles for Non-Vector Data: Speeding-up Hierarchical Clustering in Arbitrary Metric Spaces.
Foreword from the PC Chairs.
A Relational Approach to Incrementally Extracting and Querying Structure in Unstructured Data.
SASH: A Self-Adaptive Histogram Set for Dynamically Changing Workloads.
Main-Memory Operation Buffering for Efficient R-Tree Update.
Design, Implementation, and Performance of the LHAM Log-Structured History Data Access Method.
Semantic Compression and Pattern Extraction with Fascicles.
SMART: Making DB2 (More) Autonomic.
Anytime Measures for Top-k Algorithms.
Incremental Maintenance for Materialized Views over Semistructured Data.
Why You Should Run TPC-DS: A Workload Analysis.
Holistic Twig Joins on Indexed XML Documents.
Work and Information Practices in the Sciences of Biodiversity.
WaveCluster: A Multi-Resolution Clustering Approach for Very Large Spatial Databases.
Scalable Sweeping-Based Spatial Join.
Extending XQuery with Window Functions.
Efficient Computation of the Skyline Cube.
Supervised Wrapper Generation with Lixto.
Architectures for Internal Web Services Deployment.
XRPC: Interoperable and Efficient Distributed XQuery.
Hyperqueries: Dynamic Distributed Query Processing on the Internet.
Time Series Compressibility and Privacy.
Biodiversity Informatics Infrastructure: An Information Commons for the Biodiversity Community.
Lachesis: Robust Database Storage Management Based on Device-specific Performance Characteristics.
Raster databases.
Processing Star Queries on Hierarchically-Clustered Fact Tables.
Linking Business to Deliver Value: A Data Management Challenge.
Increasing Buffer-Locality for Multiple Index Based Scans through Intelligent Placement and Index Scan Speed Control.
Shuffling a Stacked Deck: The Case for Partially Randomized Ranking of Search Engine Results.
Surfing Wavelets on Streams: One-Pass Summaries for Approximate Aggregate Queries.
A Framework for Clustering Evolving Data Streams.
General Purpose Database Summarization.
Industrial Panel on Data Warehousing Technologies: Experiences, Challenges, and Directions.
Adaptive Index Structures.
Fast Evaluation Techniques for Complex Similarity Queries.
Toward Recovery-Oriented Computing.
Query Execution Assurance for Outsourced Databases.
VIPAS: Virtual Link Powered Authority Search in the Web.
Query By Excel.
IrisNet: An Architecture for Internet-scale Sensing Services.
What does Web 2.0 have to do with databases?
French government activity in the conservation of data and electronic documents.
Efficient Numerical Error Bounding for Replicated Network Services.
Querying Complex Structured Databases.
Modeling and Querying Vague Spatial Objects Using Shapelets.
Online Estimation For Subset-Based SQL Queries.
The National Medical Knowledge Bank.
Approximate Query Processing: Taming the TeraBytes.
RTMonitor: Real-Time Data Monitoring Using Mobile Agent Technologies.
Visual Web Information Extraction with Lixto.
Supporting Incremental Join Queries on Ranked Inputs.
Periscope/SQ: Interactive Exploration of Biological Sequence Databases.
Composing Mappings Among Data Sources.
Towards Graph Containment Search and Indexing.
Intelligent Rollups in Multidimensional OLAP Data.
Efficient Evaluation of XQuery over Streaming Data.
Structural Function Inlining Technique for Structurally Recursive XML Queries.
Computing Geographical Scopes of Web Resources.
Efficiently Processing Queries on Interval-and-Value Tuples in Relational Databases.
Microsoft English Query 7.5: Automatic Extraction of Semantics from Relational Databases and OLAP Cubes.
Discovering Large Dense Subgraphs in Massive Graphs.
Rainbow: Distributed Database System for Classroom Education and Experimental Research.
Weaving Relations for Cache Performance.
Buffering Accesses to Memory-Resident Index Structures.
C-Store: A Column-oriented DBMS.
C
Enabling End-users to Construct Data-intensive Web-sites from XML Repositories: An Example-based Approach.
From Region Encoding To Extended Dewey: On Efficient Processing of XML Twig Pattern Matching.
CASSM: A Cellular System for Very Large Data Bases.
Hierarchical Performance Analysis Models for Data Base Systems.
Automatic Data Base Schema Design and Optimization.
Semantic Integrity in a Relational Data Base System.
Implementation Strategies for the Census Data Base.
The Multipurpose Presentation System.
TIMBER: A Sophisticated Relation Browser (Invited Paper).
A Less Costly Constraints Checking for Join Dependency.
Analysis of Dynamic Load Balancing Strategies for Parallel Shared Nothing Database Systems.
An Evaluation of Buffer Management Strategies for Relational Database Systems.
Efficient Indexing Methods for Probabilistic Threshold Queries over Uncertain Data.
An Adaptive Hash Join Algorithm for Multiuser Environments.
Scalablity and Availability in Oracle7 7.3.
An Efficient Cost-Driven Index Selection Tool for Microsoft SQL Server.
Data Constructors: On the Integration of Rules and Relations.
Practical Issues with Commercial Use of Federated Databases.
Resource Sharing in Continuous Sliding-Window Aggregates.
Translation and Optimization of Logic Queries: The Algebraic Approach.
FAD, a Powerful and Simple Database Language.
Redo Recovery after System Crashes.
Containment of Nested XML Queries.
Estimating the Selectivity of Spatial Queries Using the `Correlation' Fractal Dimension.
OPOSSUM: Desk-Top Schema Management through Customizable Visualization.
Supporting Exceptions to Schema Consistency to Ease Schema Evolution in OODBMS.
Providing Dynamic Security Control in a Federated Database.
Query Optimization by Predicate Move-Around.
Client-Server Paradise.
A Blackboard Architecture for Query Optimization in Object Bases.
Dependency Inference.
Solving the Phantom Problem by Predicative Optimistic Concurrency Control.
Dynamic Derivation of Personalized Views.
Benchmarking Database Systems A Systematic Approach.
Performance Analysis of a Load Balancing Hash-Join Algorithm for a Shared Memory Multiprocessor.
PLACE: A Query Processor for Handling Real-time Spatio-temporal Data Streams.
The Representation and Deductive Retrieval of Complex Objects.
Database Technologies for the 90's and Beyond (Panel).
The GMAP: A Versatile Tool for Physical Data Independence.
Hot Block Clustering for Disk Arrays with Dynamic Striping.
High Throughput Escrow Algorithms for Replicated Databases.
Data Structures for an Integrated Data Base Management and Information Retrieval System.
An Effective Deductive Object-Oriented Database Through Language Integration.
From XML View Updates to Relational View Updates: old solutions to a new problem.
Determining when a Structure is a Nested Relation.
Performance of Data-Parallel Spatial Operations.
Linear Road: A Stream Data Management Benchmark.
Rule Management in Object Oriented Databases: A Uniform Approach.
Some Issues in Design of Distributed Deductive Databases.
XWAVE: Approximate Extended Wavelets for Streaming Data.
Clotho: Decoupling memory page layout from storage organization.
L/MRP: A Buffer Management Strategy for Interactive Continuous Data Flows in a Multimedia DBMS.
Discovering and Ranking Semantic Associations over a Large RDF Metabase.
Key Range Locking Strategies for Improved Concurrency.
Sybase IQ Multiplex - Designed For Analytics.
Document Management as a Database Problem.
A Transaction Mechanism for Engineering Design Databases.
Materialization: A Powerful and Ubiquitous Abstraction Pattern.
A Relationship Mechanism for a Strongly Typed Object-Oriented Database Programming Language.
Advanced Query Processing in Object Bases Using Access Support Relations.
Toward a General Spatial Data Model for an Object-Oriented DBMS.
Loading the Data Warehouse Across Various Parallel Architectures
A Time Bound on the Materialization of some Recursively Defined Views.
Improving Performance in Replicated Databases through Relaxed Coherency.
Detecting Change in Data Streams.
Extracting Large Data Sets using DB2 Parallel Edition.
ZOO : A Desktop Experiment Management Environment.
Applying Database Technology in the ADSM Mass Storage System.
Storage and Access Structures to Support a Semantic Data Model.
On Indexing Line Segments.
An Iterative Method for Distributed Database Design.
Alert: An Architecture for Transforming a Passive DBMS into an Active DBMS.
Maintenance of Spatial Semijoin Queries on Moving Points.
A Domain-theoretic Approach to Integrating Functional and Logic Database Languages.
A Mapping Function for the Directory of a Multidimensional Extendible Hashing.
A Parallel Processing Strategy for Evaluating Recursive Queries.
Garbage Collection in Object Oriented Databases Using Transactional Cyclic Reference Counting.
Using History Information to Process Delayed Database Updates.
Temporal Relationships in Databases.
Very Large Databases: How Large, How Different?
Efficient Query Evaluation on Probabilistic Databases.
Safe Referential Integrity Structures in Relational Databases.
AWESOME - A Data Warehouse-based System for Adaptive Website Recommendations.
Recovery and Coherency-Control Protocols for Fast Intersystem Page Transfer and Fine-Granularity Locking in a Shared Disks Transaction Environment.
SPRINT: A Scalable Parallel Classifier for Data Mining
Evaluation of Main Memory Join Algorithms for Joins with Set Comparison Join Predicates.
Towards DBMSs for Supporting New Applications.
Using Design Axioms and Topology to Model Database Semantics.
Pasta-3's Graphical Query Language: Direct Manipulation, Cooperative Queries, Full Expressive Power.
A Formal Model for Maximum Concurrency in Transaction Systems with Predeclared Writesets.
Fast Incremental Maintenance of Approximate Histograms.
On The Satisfiability of Dependency Constraints in Entity-Relationship Schemata.
Multiple Query Processing in Deductive Databases using Query Graphs.
Extending Logging for Database Snapshot Refresh.
Physical Design of Network Model Databases Using the Property of Separability.
Hybrid Transitive Closure Algorithms.
Predictions and Challenges for Database Systems in the Year 2000.
An Efficient Implementation of a Relational Data Base.
Applying Hash Filters to Improving the Execution of Bushy Trees.
A Multimedia Office Filing System.
Efficient XML-to-SQL Query Translation: Where to Add the Intelligence?
Formalization of Database Systems - and a Formal Definition of IMS (Invited Paper).
Constructing Efficient Decision Trees by Using Optimized Numeric Association Rules.
Performance Evaluation of an Operating System Transaction Manager.
Integration of Time Versions into a Relational Database System.
Object Placement in Parallel Hypermedia Systems.
Anatomy of a Mudular Multiple Query Optimizer.
Parallelism in a Main-Memory DBMS: The Performance of PRISMA/DB.
A Model for Active Object Oriented Databases.
The Design of the POSTGRES Storage System.
Large Databases for Remote Sensing and GIS.
Updates in a Rule-Based Language for Objects.
Queries Independent of Updates.
A Source-to-Source Meta-Translation System for Relational Query Languages.
Managing a DB2 Parallel Edition Database.
Towards a Formal Approach for Object Database Design.
Adaptive Predicate Managers in Database Systems.
Distributed Processing over Stand-alone Systems and Applications.
Generalizing GlOSS to Vector-Space Databases and Broker Hierarchies.
An Efficient Deadlock Removal Scheme for Non-Two-Phase Locking Protocols.
A Data Manipulation Model: An Extension of the Alpha Expression.
Database Partitioning in a Cluster of Processors.
Further Improvements on Integrity Constraint Checking for Stratifiable Deductive Databases.
High-Level Navigational Facilities for Network and Relational Databases.
Knowledge-based Integrity Constraint Validation.
Discovery of Multiple-Level Association Rules from Large Databases.
Referential Integrity Revisited: An Object-Oriented Perspective.
Towards an Internet-Scale XML Dissemination Service.
Join Index Hierarchies for Supporting Efficient Navigations in Object-Oriented Databases.
Informix-Online XPS: A Dynamically Scalable RDBMS for Open Parallel Platforms.
Specifying and Enforcing Intertask Dependencies.
Collections of Objects in SQL3.
Unified Dynamic Hashing.
Disk Shadowing.
Achieving Zero Information-Loss in a Classical Database Environment.
Bucket Spreading Parallel Hash: A New, Robust, Parallel Hash Join Method for Data Skew in the Super Database Computer (SDC).
Tamper Detection in Audit Logs.
Simlarity Search for Web Services.
Transactions in Relational Databases (Preliminary Report).
Type Classification of Semi-Structured Documents.
Computing Facts in Non-Horn Deductive Systems.
Towards a Cooperative Transaction Model - The Cooperative Activity Model.
Software Repositories.
An Object Data Model with Roles.
FaceKit: A Database Interface Design Toolkit.
Mixed concurrency control: Dealing with heterogeneity in distributed database systems.
LDL: A Logic-Based Data Language.
On Correctly Configuring Versioned Objects.
A One-Pass Algorithm for Accurately Estimating Quantiles for Disk-Resident Data.
GUIDE: Graphical User Interface for Database Exploration.
Reflections on Boyce-Codd Normal Form.
Incremental Maintenance of Externally Materialized Views.
Percentile Finding Algorithm for Multiple Sorted Runs.
Commutativity and its Role in the Processing of Linear Recursion.
Optimizing Queries Across Diverse Data Sources.
Object Fusion in Mediator Systems.
FluXQuery: An Optimizing XQuery Processor for Streaming XML Data.
Declustering Databases on Heterogeneous Disk Systems.
On-the-Fly, Incremental, Consistent Reading of Entire Databases.
Eager Aggregation and Lazy Aggregation.
The Case for Enhanced Abstract Data Types.
A Performance Evaluation of Multi-Level Transaction Management.
Retrieval-By-Unification Operation on a Relational Knowledge Base.
Distributed Transitive Closure Computations: The Disconnection Set Approach.
An Active Object-Oriented Database: A Multi-Paradigm Approach to Constraint Management.
Query Optimization by Stored Queries.
Optimization of Multi-Way Join Queries for Parallel Execution.
Coloring Away Communication in Parallel Query Optimization.
SVP: A Model Capturing Sets, Lists, Streams, and Parallelism.
Integrating SQL Databases with Content-Specific Search Engines.
Adaptive Database Buffer Allocation Using Query Feedback.
A Transaction Replication Scheme for a Replicated Database with Node Autonomy.
Randomizing, A Practical Method for Protecting Statistical Databases Against Compromise.
The Oracle Universal Server Buffer.
Choices in Practical Data Design.
Hamming Filters: A Dynamic Signature File Organization for Parallel Stores.
Indexing Multiple Sets.
A Non-Two-Phase Locking Protocol for Concurrency Control in General Databases.
Coral++: Adding Object-Orientation to a Logic Database Language.
Database Updates through Abduction.
Characterization of Well-Behaved Database Schemata and Their Update Semantics.
VizTree: a Tool for Visually Mining and Monitoring Massive Time Series Databases.
A Modularization Mechanism for Conceptual Modeling.
Behaviour Management in Database Applications.
A Multidatabase System for Tracking and Retrieval of Financial Data.
The Tree Quorum Protocol: An Efficient Approach for Managing Replicated Data.
Disjoint-Interval Topological Sort: A Useful Concept in Serializability Theory (Extended Abstract).
Cache Conscious Algorithms for Relational Query Processing.
Temporal Query Processing and Optimization in Multiprocessor Database Machines.
Schema-Free XQuery.
Enhancing P2P File-Sharing with an Internet-Scale Query Processor.
A Practical Issue Concerning Very Large Data Bases: The Need for Query Governors.
Modeling Skewed Distribution Using Multifractals and the `80-20' Law.
A Single-File Version of Linear Hashing with Partial Expansions.
Interval Queries on Object Histories: Extended Abstract.
The LSD tree: Spatial Access to Multidimensional Point and Nonpoint Objects.
Compressing Large Boolean Matrices using Reordering Techniques.
On the design and implementation of information systems from deductive conceptual models.
A Performance Study of Workfile Disk Management for Concurrent Mergesorts in a Multiprocessor Database System.
A Quantitative Comparison of Lockprotocols for Centralized Databases.
Equivalence and Mapping of Database Schemes.
An Adaptive Data Placement Scheme for Parallel Database Computer Systems.
Versions of Simple and Composite Objects.
New Concurrency Control Algorithms for Accessing and Compacting B-Trees.
A Model of Queries for Object-Oriented Databases.
PIVOT and UNPIVOT: Optimization and Execution Strategies in an RDBMS.
Computing PageRank in a Distributed Internet Search Engine System.
Voronoi-Based K Nearest Neighbor Search for Spatial Network Databases.
Bit-Sliced VLSI Algorithm for Search and Sort.
Dual-Buffering Strategies in Object Bases.
Efficient Incremental Garbage Collection for Client-Server Object Database Systems.
A Probabilistic Framework for Vague Queries and Imprecise Information in Databases.
Dealing with Temporal Schema Anomalies in History Databases.
Networked Query Processing for Distributed Stream-Based Applications.
Querying Heterogeneous Information Sources Using Source Descriptions
Language Support for Office Modelling.
Indexing Temporal XML Documents.
The Spatial Skyline Queries.
Implementing Mapping Composition.
Progressive Computation of the Min-Dist Optimal-Location Query.
Next Generation Data Management in Enterprise Application Platforms.
Nested Mappings: Schema Mapping Reloaded.
Data Integration: The Teenage Years.
POP/FED: Progressive Query Optimization for Federated Queries in DB2.
Lazy Database Replication with Snapshot Isolation.
GignoMDA - Exploiting Cross-Layer Optimization for Complex Database Applications.
Globalization: Challenges to Database Community.
Indexing for Function Approximation.
Scalable Continuous Query Processing by Tracking Hotspots.
The Making of TPC-DS.
Answering Tree Pattern Queries Using Views.
On Biased Reservoir Sampling in the Presence of Stream Evolution.
Efficient and Decentralized PageRank Approximation in a Peer-to-Peer Web Search Network.
On the Path to Efficient XML Queries.
Efficient Incremental Maintenance of Data Cubes.
Anatomy: Simple and Effective Privacy Preservation.
Using High Dimensional Indexes to Support Relevance Feedback Based Interactive Images Retrival.
Mining Frequent Closed Cubes in 3D Datasets.
Using Partial Evaluation in Distributed Query Evaluation.
Delay Aware Querying with Seaweed.
Approximate Encoding for Direct Access and Query Processing over Compressed Bitmaps.
Efficient Computation of Reverse Skyline Queries.
Mining Compressed Frequent-Pattern Sets.
Database-Inspired Search.
NILE-PDT: A Phenomenon Detection and Tracking Framework for Data Stream Management Systems.
Research Directions in Biodiversity Informatics
Business Modelling Using SQL Spreadsheets.
The TPR*-Tree: An Optimized Spatio-Temporal Access Method for Predictive Queries.
Approximate Query Processing Using Wavelets.
DataScope: Viewing Database Contents in Google Maps' Way.
Native XML Support in DB2 Universal Database.
Fast nGram-Based String Search Over Data Encoded Using Algebraic Signatures.
A Transducer-Based XML Query Processor.
CallAssist: Helping Call Center Agents in Preference Elicitation.
Large Scale Data Warehouses on Grid: Oracle Database 10g and HP ProLiant Systems.
Designing Information-Preserving Mapping Schemes for XML.
LCS-TRIM: Dynamic Programming Meets XML Indexing and Querying.
Information Preserving XML Schema Embedding.
A Data Warehousing Architecture for Enabling Service Provisioning Process.
Light-weight Domain-based Form Assistant: Querying Web Databases On the Fly.
A Database Index to Large Biological Sequences.
Extending an ORDBMS: The StateMachine Module.
A Scalable Algorithm for Answering Queries Using Views.
Issues in Network Management in the Next Millennium.
Scalable Techniques for Mining Causal Structures.
Probabilistic Skylines on Uncertain Data.
The Persistent Cache: Improving OID Indexing in Temporal Object-Oriented Database Systems.
SciPort: An Adaptable Scientific Data Integration Platform for Collaborative Scientific Research.
Italian Electronic Identity Card - principle and architecture.
Pathfinder: XQuery - The Relational Way.
From Focused Crawling to Expert Information: an Application Framework for Web Exploration and Portal Generation.
Privacy Skyline: Privacy with Multidimensional Adversarial Knowledge.
Incremental Clustering for Mining in a Data Warehousing Environment.
Lineage Tracing for General Data Warehouse Transformations.
Efficient Processing of Expressive Node-Selecting Queries on XML Data in Secondary Storage: A Tree Automata-based Approach.
Robust Estimation With Sampling and Approximate Pre-Aggregation.
Model-Based Information Integration in a Neuroscience Mediator System.
Viator - A Tool Family for Graphical Networking and Data View Creation.
Improving Performance with Bulk-Inserts in Oracle R-Trees.
Fast Data Anonymization with Low Information Loss.
Scaling and Time Warping in Time Series Querying.
Early Profile Pruning on XML-aware Publish/Subscribe Systems.
Active Storage for Large-Scale Data Mining and Multimedia.
Improving Adaptable Similarity Query Processing by Using Approximations.
XPERANTO: Middleware for Publishing Object-Relational Data as XML Documents.
Incorporating XSL Processing into Database Engines.
The ADABAS Buffer Pool Manager.
Update Exchange with Mappings and Provenance.
Structure and Content Scoring for XML.
A System for Keyword Proximity Search on XML Databases.
XML Full-Text Search: Challenges and Opportunities.
Cache Portal: Technology for Accelerating Database-driven e-commerce Web Sites.
Dynamic Maintenance of Wavelet-Based Histograms.
Plan-Per-Tuple Optimization Solution - Parallel Execution of Expensive User-Defined Functions.
Approximate Query Translation Across Heterogeneous Information Sources.
An Adaptive Hybrid Server Architecture for Client Caching ODBMSs.
Data Access Patterns in The Amazon.com Technology Platform.
A Case for Fractured Mirrors.
A Trajectory Splitting Model for Efficient Spatio-Temporal Indexing.
RadixZip: Linear-Time Compression of Token Streams.
Generic Database Cost Models for Hierarchical Memory Systems.
Early Hash Join: A Configurable Algorithm for the Efficient and Early Production of Join Results.
CheeTah: a Lightweight Transaction Server for Plug-and-Play Internet Data Management.
Indexing Data-oriented Overlay Networks.
SPIRIT: Sequential Pattern Mining with Regular Expression Constraints.
Interactive Schema Translation with Instance-Level Mappings.
Efficient Mining of XML Query Patterns for Caching.
Data Stream Query Processing: A Tutorial.
The New Locking, Logging, and Recovery Architecture of Microsoft SQL Server 7.0.
Dynamic Workload Management for Very Large Data Warehouses: Juggling Feathers and Bowling Balls.
Maximal Vector Computation in Large Data Sets.
TRAX - Real-World Tracking of Moving Objects.
The Challenge of Process Data Warehousing.
Streaming Queries over Streaming Data.
Watermarking Relational Databases.
Managing Business Processes via Workflow Technology.
A Bayesian Method for Guessing the Extreme Values in a Data Set.
A Generic solution for Warehousing Business Process Data.
Customizable Parallel Execution of Scientific Stream Queries.
Stop-and-Restart Style Execution for Long Running Decision Support Queries.
Cache Tables: Paving the Way for an Adaptive Database Cache.
Small Materialized Aggregates: A Light Weight Index Structure for Data Warehousing.
Projecting XML Documents.
Approximate Joins: Concepts and Techniques.
A Heartbeat Mechanism and Its Application in Gigascope.
XQuery Implementation in a Relational Database System.
WmXML: A System for Watermarking XML Data.
Mining Surprising Patterns Using Temporal Description Length.
Improving Database Performance on Simultaneous Multithreading Processors.
Optimizing Result Prefetching in Web Search Engines with Segmented Indices.
Grid Data Management Systems & Services.
Integrating the UB-Tree into a Database System Kernel.
Bulk-Loading Techniques for Object Databases and an Application to Relational Data.
Efficient Algorithms for Processing XPath Queries.
Bridging Heterogeneity: Research and Practice of Database Middleware Technology.
Efficient Processing of Top-k Dominating Queries on Multi-Dimensional Data.
Cache-Conscious Concurrency Control of Main-Memory Indexes on Shared-Memory Multiprocessor Systems.
Similarity Search for Adaptive Ellipsoid Queries Using Spatial Transformation.
Why Search Engines are Used Increasingly to Offload Queries from Databases.
Space Efficiency in Synopsis Construction Algorithms.
PSYCHO: A Prototype System for Pattern Management.
Approaching the Skyline in Z Order.
The Data-Centric Revolution in Networking.
SVM in Oracle Database 10g: Removing the Barriers to Widespread Adoption of Support Vector Machines.
Rethinking Database System Architecture: Towards a Self-Tuning RISC-Style Database System.
Answering Aggregation Queries in a Secure System Model.
Complex Queries over Web Repositories.
Schema-driven Customization of Web Services.
Bridging the Application and DBMS Profiling Divide for Database Application Developers.
QoS-based Data Access and Placement for Federated Information Systems.
Efficient Bulk Deletes for Multi Dimensionally Clustered Tables in DB2.
Comparing Hybrid Peer-to-Peer Systems.
Monitoring Business Processes with Queries.
Online Dynamic Reordering for Interactive Data Processing.
Extending Dependencies with Conditions.
NS2: Networked Searchable Store with Correctness.
Curio: A Novel Solution for Efficient Storage and Indexing in Data Warehouses.
Database Technologies for Electronic Commerce.
Privacy-Enhanced Data Management for Next-Generation e-Commerce.
Adaptive Aggregation on Chip Multiprocessors.
Binding Propagation in Disjunctive Databases.
Inferring XML Schema Definitions from XML Data.
Materialized View Selection for Multidimensional Datasets.
Hierarchical Compact Cube for Range-Max Queries.
View Matching for Outer-Join Views.
Making Sense of Suppressions and Failures in Sensor Data: A Bayesian Approach.
Telcordia's Database Reconciliation and Data Quality Analysis Tool.
Revisiting Pipelined Parallelism in Multi-Join Query Processing.
Self-Tuning Database Systems: A Decade of Progress.
SQL Memory Management in Oracle9i.
A genetic approach for random testing of database systems.
Tracing Lineage Beyond Relational Operators.
Security in Outsourcing of Association Rule Mining.
Physical Data Independence, Constraints, and Optimization with Universal Plans
Executing Stream Joins on the Cell Processor.
Heterogeneous Database Query Optimization in DB2 Universal DataJoiner.
Maintaining Coherency of Dynamic Data in Cooperating Repositories.
The History of Histograms (abridged).
The A-tree: An Index Structure for High-Dimensional Spaces Using Relative Approximation.
EntityRank: Searching Entities Directly and Holistically.
Data Routing Rather than Databases: The Meaning of the Next Wave of the Web Revolution to Data Management.
User-Optimizer Communication using Abstract Plans in Sybase ASE.
Continuous Queries in Oracle.
EOS: Exactly-Once E-Service Middleware.
Capturing and Querying Multiple Aspects of Semistructured Data.
A Scalable and Highly Available Networked Database Architecture.
Challenges and Experience in Prototyping a Multi-Modal Stream Analytic and Monitoring Application on System S.
Cache Fusion: Extending Shared-Disk Clusters with Shared Caches.
Experiences in Federated Databases: From IRO-DB to MIRO-Web.
Fine-Grained Replication and Scheduling with Freshness and Correctness Guarantees.
XBenchMatch: a Benchmark for XML Schema Matching Tools.
Hierarchical Prefix Cubes for Range-Sum Queries.
On the Production of Anorexic Plan Diagrams.
S-ToPSS: Semantic Toronto Publish/Subscribe System.
Profiling and Internet Connectivity in Automotive Environments.
Safely and Efficiently Updating References During On-line Reorganization.
Querying the Internet with PIER.
Mining Approximate Top-K Subspace Anomalies in Multi-Dimensional Time-Series Data.
WebService Composition with O'GRAPE and OSIRIS.
ATLAS: A Small but Complete SQL Extension for Data Mining and Data Streams.
The Evolution of the Web and Implications for an Incremental Crawler.
PicoDMBS: Scaling Down Database Techniques for the Smartcard.
Chip-Secured Data Access: Confidential Data on Untrusted Servers.
On Computing Top-t Most Influential Spatial Sites.
Foundations of Preferences in Database Systems.
DMS: A Parallel Data Mining Server.
Ranked Subsequence Matching in Time-Series Databases.
Consistency for Web Services Applications.
Functional Specifications of Subsystem for Database Integrity.
A DBMS for the U.S. Bureo of the Census.
Specification of Stored Data Structures and Desired Output Results in DIAM II with FORAL.
Granularity of Locks in a Large Shared Data Base.
A Multi-Level Architecture for Relational Data Base Systems.
Stanford's Generalized Database System.
On the Feasibility of Implementing a Large Relational Data Base with Optimal Performance on a Mini-Computer.
Using Semantic Networks for Database Management.
Flexible String Matching Against Large Databases in Practice.
Transposition Algorithms on Very Large Compressed Databases.
Multi-Join Optimization for Symmetric Multiprocessors.
Activity Model: A Declarative Approach for Capturing Communication Behavior in Object-Oriented Databases.
Semantic Queries with Pictures: The VIMSYS Model.
GAMMA - A High Performance Dataflow Database Machine.
Algebraic Manipulation of Scientific Datasets.
Mining Insurance Data at Swiss Life.
Integrity Maintenance in Object-Oriented Databases.
Database Support for Knowledge-Based Image Evaluation.
Value-cognizant Speculative Concurrency Control.
Facilitating Multimedia Database Exploration through Visual Interfaces and Perpetual Query Reformulations.
Distributed Set Expression Cardinality Estimation.
The Size of Projections of Relations Satisfying a Functional Dependency.
A Formalism for Extended Transaction Model.
The hcC-tree: An Efficient Index Structure for Object Oriented Databases.
A Modal System of Algebras for Database Specification and Query/Update Language Support.
Supporting Periodic Authorizations and Temporal Reasoning in Database Access Control.
NAOS - Efficient and Modular Reactive Capabilities in an Object-Oriented Database System.
A Dynamic Hash File for Random and Sequential Accessing.
Managing Change in a Computer-Aided Design Database.
A New Compression Method with Fast Searching on Large Databases.
On Spatially Partitioned Temporal Join.
Molecular Objects, Abstract Data Types, and Data Models: A Framework.
Towards Automated Performance Tuning for Complex Workloads.
Two Epoch Algorithms for Disaster Recovery.
A Framework for Projected Clustering of High Dimensional Data Streams.
Efficiency of Nested Relational Document Database Systems.
Tradeoffs in Processing Complex Join Queries via Hashing in Multiprocessor Database Machines.
Hardware Acceleration in Commercial Databases: A Case Study of Spatial Operations.
DB2 Design Advisor: Integrated Automatic Physical Database Design.
Efficient Implementation of Loops in Bottom-Up Evaluation of Logic Queries.
Principles of Transaction-Based On-Line Reorganization.
A Dynamic Perfect Hash Function Defined by an Extended Hash Indicator Table.
Consistency of Versions in Object-Oriented Databases.
An Extensible Object-Oriented Approach to Databases for VLSI/CAD.
A Performance Study of Query Optimization Algorithms on a Database System Supporting Procedures.
UNIBASE - An Integrated Access to Databases.
Integrating Reliable Memory in Databases.
Dal: A High Performance Main Memory Storage Manager.
Semantic Query Optimization in an Automata-Algebra Combined XQuery Engine over XML Streams.
Fast, Randomized Join-Order Selection - Why Use Transformations?
An Extended Relational Database System and It's Application to Management of Logic Diagrama.
The X-tree : An Index Structure for High-Dimensional Data
Implementing High Level Active Rules on Top of a Relational DBMS.
Client-Based Access Control Management for XML documents.
Practical Suffix Tree Construction.
Data Compression Support in Databases.
PRIMA - a DBMS Prototype Supporting Engineering Applications.
The Network as a Global Database: Challenges of Interoperability, Proactivity, Interactiveness, Legacy.
The Magic of Duplicates and Aggregates.
Spatial Joins Using R-trees: Breadth-First Traversal with Global Optimizations.
An Efficient Indexing Technique for Full Text Databases.
Preferences; Putting More Knowledge into Queries.
On Testing Satisfiability of Tree Pattern Queries.
DVSS: A Distributed Version Storage Server for CAD Applications.
Algorithms for Materialized View Design in Data Warehousing Environment.
A Temporal Relational Algebra as Basis for Temporal Relational Completeness.
The Need for Data Quality.
EROC: A Toolkit for Building NEATO Query Optimizers.
Providing Time-Related Constraints for Conventional Database Systems.
Universality of Serial Histograms.
A Requirement-Based Approach to Data Modeling and Re-Engineering.
On Index Selection Schemes for Nested Object Hierarchies.
Dynamic Data Distribution (D
Searching Large Lexicons for Partially Specified Terms using Compressed Inverted Files.
DB2 Common Server: Technology, Progress, & Directions.
The Continued Saga of DB-IR Integration.
An Injection of Tree Awareness: Adding Staircase Join to PostgreSQL.
Materialized Views Selection in a Multidimensional Database.
Universal Relation Views: A Pragmatic Approach.
Cascade Hashing.
Remembrance of Streams Past: Overload-Sensitive Management of Archived Streams.
A Model of Methods Access Authorization in Object-oriented Databases.
BioPatentMiner: An Information Retrieval System for BioMedical Patents.
Integrating a Structured-Text Retrieval System with an Object-Oriented Database System.
Factoring Augmented Regular Chain Programs.
Situation Monitoring for Active Databases.
A Superjoin Algorithm for Deductive Databases.
A Data Modeling Approach to Simplify the Design of User Interfaces.
Database Portals: A New Application Program Interface.
Fixed-point semantics and the representation of algorithms on large data.
Declustering Objects for Visualization.
PESTO : An Integrated Query/Browser for Object Databases.
Triggered Real-Time Databases with Consistency Constraints.
Performance of Catalog Management Schemes for Running Access Modules in a Locally Distributed Database System.
Query Languages and Data Models for Database Sequences and Data Streams.
An Annotation Management System for Relational Databases.
Combating Web Spam with TrustRank.
Towards a Spatial Query Language: User Interface Considerations.
Concept Description Language for Statistical Data Modeling.
A Uniform System for Publishing and Maintaining XML Data.
A Data Transformation System for Biological Data Sources.
Implementing an Interpreter for Functional Rules in a Query Optimizer.
Semantic Mining and Analysis of Gene Expression Data.
CORDS: Automatic Generation of Correlation Statistics in DB2.
Trends in Data Warehousing: A Practitioner's View.
Versions of Schema for Object-Oriented Databases.
OQL: A Query Language for Manipulating Object-oriented Databases.
Administration and Autonomy in a Replication-Transparent Distributed DBMS.
An Extended Disjunctive Normal Form Approach for Optimizing Recursive Logic Queries in Loosely Coupled Environments.
Query-By-Example: Operations on Piecewise Continuous Data (Extended Abstract).
Robustness to Crash in a Distributed Database: A Non Shared-memory Multi-Processor Approach.
Semantic Data Caching and Replacement.
Database Machine Morphology.
On the Computation of Multidimensional Aggregates.
Computer and Communication System Development among Financial Institutions in Japan.
Instance-based Schema Matching for Web Databases by Domain-specific Query Probing.
A Parallel Strategy for Transitive Closure usind Double Hash-Based Clustering.
An Observation on Database Buffering Performance Metrics.
Processing Object-Oriented Queries with Invertible Late Bound Functions.
Expert Database Support for Consistent Dynamic Objects.
A Non-Uniform Data Fragmentation Strategy for Parallel Main-Menory Database Systems.
Exploiting A History Database for Backup.
Building a Laboratory Information System Around a C++-Based Object-Oriented DBMS.
A Temporal Framework for Database Specifications.
M-tree: An Efficient Access Method for Similarity Search in Metric Spaces.
File Redundancy Issues in Distributed Database Systems.
An Example of Knowledge-Based Query Processing in a CAD/CAM DBMS.
An Implementation for Nested Relational Databases.
GPX: Interactive Mining of Gene Expression Data.
Using Segmented Right-Deep Trees for the Execution of Pipelined Hash Joins.
Procedures in Object-Oriented Query Languages.
A Performance Study of Alternative Object Faulting and Pointer Swizzling Strategies.
Aggregate Evaluability in Statistical Databases.
Algebraic Properties of Bag Data Types.
A Low-Cost Storage Server for Movie on Demand Databases.
Using Write Protected Data Structures To Improve Software Fault Tolerance in Highly Available Database Management Systems.
Object Fusion in Geographic Information Systems.
Incomplete Information in Relational Temporal Databases.
Optimizing the Rule-Data Interface in a KMS.
Estimation of Query-Result Distribution and its Application in Parallel-Join Load Balancing.
The Reconstruction and Optimization of Trie Hashing Functions.
Managing Derived Data in the Gaea Scientific DBMS.
Argument Reduction by Factoring.
Translating and Optimizing SQL Queries Having Aggregates.
Self-Managing Technology in Database Management Systems.
Optimizing Star Queries in a Distributed Database System.
An Approach for Building Secure Database Federations.
An Approach to Object Sharing in Distributed Datbase Systems.
Using Integrity Constraints to Provide Intensional Answers to Relational Queries.
Right-, left- and multi-linear rule transformations that maintain context information.
Query Processing Techniques for Multiversion Access Methods.
Database Application Development as an Object Modeling Activity.
Multidimensional Access Methods: Trees Have Grown Everywhere.
1-Safe Algorithms for Symmetric Site Configurations.
An Adaptive Algorithm for Incremental Evaluation of Production Rules in Databases.
An Analytic Approach to Statistical Databases.
The hBP-tree: A Modified hB-tree Supporting Concurrency, Recovery and Node Consolidation.
STDL - A Portable Language for Transaction Processing.
Database Research at MCC (Abstract).
StreamMiner: A Classifier Ensemble-based Engine to Mine Concept-drifting Data Streams.
ARIES/KVL: A Key-Value Locking Method for Concurrency Control of Multiaction Transactions Operating on B-Tree Indexes.
The Time Index: An Access Structure for Temporal Data.
Query Optimization in a Heterogeneous DBMS.
Multiprocessor Hash-Based Join Algorithms.
Geo/Environmental and Medical Data Management in the RasDaMan System.
Managing RFID Data.
On B-Tree Indices for Skewed Distributions.
Obtaining Progressive Protocols for a Simple Multiversion Database Model.
Priority-Hints: An Algorithm for Priority-Based Buffer Management.
RP*: A Family of Order Preserving Scalable Distributed Data Structures.
Independent Database Schemes under Functional and Inclusion Dependencies.
Databases and Workflow Management: What is it All About? (Panel).
Write-Optimized B-Trees.
Clustering Techniques for Minimizing External Path Length.
Data Integration in the Large: The Challenge of Reuse.
The Design of XPRS.
The Design and Implementation of a Sequence Database System.
Towards on Open Architecture for LDL.
Specification, Semantics, and Enforcement of Dynamic Database Constraints.
On the Properties of Extended Inclusion Dependencies.
Symmetric Relations and Cardinality-Bounded Multisets in Database Systems.
Object-Oriented Database Systems: Promises, Reality, and Future.
Critical Database Technologies for High Energy Physics.
A Performance Evaluation of OID Mapping Techniques.
Implementing Abstract Objects with Inheritance in Datalog
FlowCube: Constructuing RFID FlowCubes for Multi-Dimensional Analysis of Commodity Flows.
Efficient Scheduling of Heterogeneous Continuous Queries.
Creating Probabilistic Databases from Information Extraction Models.
Enterprise Information Mashups: Integrating Information, Simply.
Building Conference Proceedings Requires Adaptable Workflow and Content Management.
Trio: A System for Data, Uncertainty, and Lineage.
Performance Tradeoffs in Read-Optimized Databases.
Providing Resiliency to Load Variations in Distributed Stream Processing.
Load Shedding in Stream Databases: A Control-Based Approach.
IO-Top-k: Index-access Optimized Top-k Query Processing.
Incremental Schema Matching.
HUX: Handling Updates in XML.
Towards Robustness in Query Auditing.
iDM: A Unified and Versatile Data Model for Personal Dataspace Management.
Panel: One Platform for Mining Structured & Unstructured Data: Dream or Reality?
Query Processing in the AquaLogic Data Services Platform.
Efficient XSLT Processing in Relational Database System.
Safety Guarantee of Continuous Join Queries over Punctuated Data Streams.
LGeDBMS: A Small DBMS for Embedded System with Flash Memory.
Efficient Secure Query Evaluation over Encrypted XML Databases.
Adaptive Execution of Variable-Accuracy Functions.
Answering Top-k Queries with Multi-Dimensional Selections: The Ranking Cube Approach.
Automatic Extraction of Dynamic Record Sections From Search Engine Result Pages.
Bellwether Analysis: Predicting Global Aggregates from Local Regions.
FIX: Feature-based Indexing Technique for XML Documents.
Containment of Conjunctive Object Meta-Queries.
GORDIAN: Efficient and Scalable Discovery of Composite Keys.
LB_Keogh Supports Exact Indexing of Shapes under Rotation Invariance with Arbitrary Representations and Distance Measures.
An Integrated Approach to Recovery and High Availability in an Updatable, Distributed Data Warehouse.
How to Wring a Table Dry: Entropy Compression of Relations and Querying of Compressed Relations.
Maintaining XPath Views In Loosely Coupled Systems.
Query Optimization over Web Services.
Towards Robust Indexing for Ranked Queries.
InteMon: Intelligent System Monitoring on Large Clusters.
Relaxing Join and Selection Queries.
The Partial Normalized Storage Model of Nested Relations.
Specification-Based Computing Environments.
Modeling Design Versions.
Support for Temporal Data by Complex Objects.
An Information-Retrieval Approach for Image Databases.
CORAL - Control, Relations and Logic.
Disk Mirroring with Alternating Deferred Updates.
A Generic Approach to Bulk Loading Multidimensional Index Structures.
Architectural Issues of Transaction Management in Multi-Layered Systems.
Supporting Lists in a Data Model (A Timely Approach).
Preliminary Design of ADMS: A Workstation-Mainframe Integrated Architecture for Database Management Systems.
Hashing Methods and Relational Algebra Operations.
Concurrency Control in B+-Trees Databases Using Preparatory Operations.
Probabilistic Ranking of Database Query Results.
Integrity Constraint and Rule Maintenance in Temporal Deductive Knowledge Bases.
Auditing Compliance with a Hippocratic Database.
An Integration Framework for Sensor Networks and Data Stream Management Systems.
Deriving Production Rules for Constraint Maintainance.
Describing and Using Query Capabilities of Heterogeneous Sources.
The Fittest Survives: An Adaptive Approach to Query Optimization.
Solving Domain Mismatch and Schema Mismatch Problems with an Object-Oriented Database Programming Language.
Data Sharing Through Query Translation in Autonomous Sources.
Processing Inequality Queries Based on Generalized Semi-Joins.
REHIST: Relative Error Histogram Construction Algorithms.
Filter Trees for Managing Spatial Data over a Range of Size Granularities
Problems/Challenges facing Industry Data Base Users.
Integrating Implicit Answers with Object-Oriented Queries.
IDBD - An Interactive Design Tool for CODASYL-DBTG-Type Data bases.
A Comparison of Self-Contained and Embedded Database Languages.
P*TIME: Highly Scalable OLTP DBMS for Managing Update-Intensive Stream Workload.
Integrity Checking in Deductive Databases.
Low-cost Semantic Enhancement to Digital Library Metadata and Indexing: Simple Yet Effective Strategies.
Content management for digital museum exhibitions.
Two supervised learning approaches for name disambiguation in author citations.
Domain-specific iterative readability computation.
Understanding target users of a digital reference library.
Building federation of digital libraries basing on concept of atomic services.
Evaluating topic models for digital libraries.
Learning to assess the quality of scientific conferences: a case study in computer science.
Gazetiki: automatic creation of a geographical gazetteer.
Note-taking, selecting, and choice: designing interfaces that encourage smaller selections.
Developing a flexible content model for media repositories: a case study.
Automatic patent classification using citation network information: an experimental study in nanotechnology.
Evaluating the Quality of Educational Answers in Community Question-Answering.
Dynamically generating conceptual browsing interfaces for digital libraries.
A mixed digital / physical snapshot of early internet / web usage in New Zealand.
PIM through a 5S perspective.
How much of the web is archived?
Combining DOM tree and geometric layout analysis for online medical journal article segmentation.
Towards usage-based impact metrics: first results from the mesur project.
Schema extraction from XML collections.
An Instrument for Merging of Bibliographic Databases.
Integrating knowledge components for writer identification in a digital archive of historical music scores.
Docear's PDF inspector: title extraction from PDF files.
Who are the Rising Stars in Academia?
How do you feel about "dancing queen"?: deriving mood & theme annotations from user tags.
Stanford encyclopedia of philosophy: a dynamic reference work.
Mediating team work for digital heritage archiving.
Mobile G-Portal supporting collaborative sharing and learning in geography fieldwork: an empirical study.
Experimental Evaluation of Affective Embodied Agents in an Information Literacy Game.
A Supervised Learning Algorithm for Binary Domain Classification of Web Queries using SERPs.
A dynamic ontology for a dynamic reference work.
Extracting Academic Genealogy Trees from the Networked Digital Library of Theses and Dissertations.
Automatic extraction of table metadata from digital documents.
Comparative evaluation of text- and citation-based plagiarism detection approaches using guttenplag.
Improving optical character recognition through efficient multiple system alignment.
Annotated program examples as first class objects in an educational digital library.
Using resources across educational digital libraries.
CARES: a ranking-oriented CADAL recommender system.
Semantometrics: Towards Fulltext-based Research Evaluation.
A metadata generation system for scanned scientific volumes.
Increasing the visibility of web-based information systems via client-side mash-ups.
A framework for collaborative information environments and unified access to distributed digital content.
On the institutional archiving of social media.
Timeline interactive multimedia experience (time): on location access to aggregate event information.
What do faculty need and want from digital libraries?
FishTraits version 2: integrating ecological, biogeographic and bibliographic information.
Overcoming impediments to effective health and biomedical digital libraries.
Copyright transfer agreements and self-archiving.
Flickr feedback framework: a service model for leveraging user interactions.
Domain-specific image geocoding: a case study on Virginia tech building photos.
Archiving the web using page changes patterns: a case study.
The logical form of the proposition expressed by a metadata record.
Social reference: aggregating online usage of scientific literature in CiteULike for clustering academic resources.
Tagging for health information organisation and retrieval.
BDBComp: building a digital library for the Brazilian computer science community.
Introducing high performance computing in digital library processing workflows.
Curve Separation for Line Graphs in Scholarly Documents.
Integrating digital libraries and electronic publishing in the DART project.
Learning from artifacts: metadata utilization analysis.
Developing a review process for online resources.
ETANA-GIS: GIS for archaeological digital libraries.
SearchGen: a synthetic workload generator for scientific literature digital libraries and search engines.
Information synthesis: a new approach to explore secondary information in scientific literature.
Visiting virtual reality museum exhibits.
WikiMirs: a mathematical information retrieval system for wikipedia.
StoryBank: an indian village community digital library.
GRE: hybrid recommendations for NSDL collections.
A fluid treemap interface for personal digital libraries.
Cross-disciplinary molecular science education in introductory science courses: an nsdl matdl collection.
The effects of topic familiarity on information search behavior.
Selection and context scoping for digital video collections: an investigation of youtube and blogs.
A tree-based method for fast melodic retrieval.
Chinese calligraphy specific style rendering system.
Extending SDARTS: extracting metadata from web databases and interfacing with the open archives initiative.
Standards alignment for metadata assignment.
Autotagging to improve text search for 3d models.
The multi-faceted use of the OAI-PMH in the lanl repository.
Analyzing News Events in Non-Traditional Digital Library Collections.
Music-notation searching and digital libraries.
Document relevance assessment via term distribution analysis using fourier series expansion.
User-centered approach in creating a metadata schema for video games and interactive media.
Improving scalability by self-archiving.
No bull, no spin: a comparison of tags with other forms of user metadata.
Tools for a new generation of scholarly edition unified by a tei-based interchange format.
Acceptance and use of electronic library services in ugandan universities.
Exploiting log files in video retrieval.
Word order matters: measuring topic coherence with lexical argument structure.
How to annotate an image?: the need of an image annotation guide agent.
5e
Developing a digital library of reusable historical artifacts.
A retrospective review on a decade of building a national science digital library to transform STEM education.
This is what i'm doing and why: reflections on a think-aloud study of dl users' information behaviour.
Computer classification system usage in citeseer.
Using the repository explorer to achieve OAI protocol compliance.
Efficient topic-based unsupervised name disambiguation.
Breathing life into digital archives: use of natural language processing to revitalize the grey literature of public health.
Formal foundations for systematic digital library generation.
A hybrid two-stage approach for discipline-independent canonical representation extraction from references.
Predicting Temporal Intention in Resource Sharing.
Using an ontology and a multilingual glossary for enhancing the nautical archaeology digital library.
Different cultures meet: lessons learned in global digital library development (panel session).
An approach to modeling content for digital repositories.
Collection understanding for OAI-PMH compliant repositories.
Virtual multimedia libraries built from the web.
How do people organize their photos in each event and how does it affect storytelling, searching and interpretation tasks?
The OAI-PMH NASA technical report server.
Visual interfaces for stimulating exploratory search.
Redeye: a digital library for forensic document triage.
The digital atheneum: new approaches for preserving, restoring and analyzing damaged manuscripts.
PDLib: personal digital libraries with universal access.
Lessons learned from developing and evaluating a comprehensive digital library for engineering education.
Using controlled query generation to evaluate blind relevance feedback algorithms.
ConfAssist: A Conflict Resolution Framework for Assisting the Categorization of Computer Science Conferences.
WPv4: a re-imagined Walden's paths to support diverse user communities.
Finding topic trends in digital libraries.
Integrating collections at the cervantes project.
The fused library: integrating digital and physical libraries with location-aware sensors.
Game development documentation and institutional collection development policy.
A study of
Light-weight communal digital libraries.
Access patterns for robots and humans in web archives.
Towards a Distributed Digital Library for Sign Language Content.
Enhancing usability in CITIDEL: multimodal, multilingual, and interactive visualization interfaces.
Search engine driven author disambiguation.
Quantitatively evaluating the influence of online social interactions in the community-assisted digital library.
High tech or high touch: automation and human mediation in libraries (panel session).
Integration of simultaneous searching and reference linking across bibliographic resources on the web.
Preserving digital data in heterogeneous environments.
Studying digital library users in the wild: theories, methods, and analytical approaches.
Use of multiple digital libraries: a case study.
A hierarchical, HMM-based automatic evaluation of OCR accuracy for a digital library of books.
An algorithm for automated rating of reviewers.
Keyphrase extraction-based query expansion in digital libraries.
Augmenting OAI-PMH repository holdings using search engine APIs.
Linked active content: a service for digital libraries for education.
Citing for high impact.
Windowing time in digital libraries.
JAFER ToolKit project: interfacing Z39.50 and XML.
The Energy of Delusion: The New York Art Resources Consortium (NYARC) & The Digital.
EnTag: enhancing social tagging for discovery.
The fschlr digital video system: a digital library of broadcast TV programmes.
Creating meta-indexes for digital domains.
A language modelling approach to relevance profiling for document browsing.
When use cases are not useful: data practices, astronomy, and digital libraries.
Integrating image-rich biological information with a web search tool: the inside wood model.
Multi-view of the ACM classification system.
Introducing Docear's research paper recommender system.
Research on the Follow-up Actions of College Students' Mobile Search.
Using standards in digital library design & development.
Unified Relevance Feedback for Multi-Application User Interest Modeling.
SharedCanvas: a collaborative model for medieval manuscript layout dissemination.
VCenter: a digital video management system with mobile search service.
Music-to-knowledge (M2K): a prototyping and evaluation environment for music digital library research.
Automatic event generation from multi-lingual news stories.
Using strand maps to engage digital library users with science content.
A comparative study of citations and links in document classification.
Preservation decisions: terms and conditions apply.
Erasmus': an organization- and user-centered dublin core metadata tool.
How do users' search tactic selections influence search outputs in exploratory search tasks?
SlideSeer: a digital library of aligned document and presentation pairs.
Delineating the citation impact of scientific discoveries.
Towards Use And Reuse Driven Big Data Management.
A national digital library for undergraduate mathematics and science teacher preparation and professional development.
BEN collaborative poster.
ETANA-ADD: an interactive tool for integrating archaeological DL collections.
Content-based layouts for exploratory metadata search in scientific research data.
EVIADA: ethnomusicological video for instruction and analysis digital archive.
Public use of digital community information systems: findings from a recent study with implications for system design.
A new framework for building digital library collections.
Using an institutional repository for personal digital collections of retired faculty members.
Goal-directed evaluation for the improvement of optical music recognition on early music prints.
FRBRPedia: a tool for FRBRizing web products and linking FRBR entities to DBpedia.
Towards automatic conceptual personalization tools.
YADDA2: assemble your own digital library application from LEGO bricks.
How to choose a digital preservation strategy: evaluating a preservation planning procedure.
Agreeing to disagree: search engines and their public interfaces.
User uncertainties with tabular statistical data: identification and resolution.
Primarily history: historians and the search for primary source materials.
Reconstruction of the US First Website.
Exploring user perceptions of digital image similarity.
Analyzing User Requests for Anime Recommendations.
If you build it, will they come?: lessons learned from the workshop on participant interaction in digital libraries.
A focus-context browser for multiple timelines.
A bucket architecture for the open video project.
OmniMea: an approach to improved content recruitment for institutional repositories.
An effective approach to entity resolution problem using quasi-clique and its application to digital libraries.
An evaluation methodology for coordinated event visualization in digital libraries.
Unraveling K-12 Standard Alignment: Report on a New Attempt.
Non-linear book manifolds: learning from associations the dynamic geometry of digital libraries.
Physical Samples and Digital Libraries.
Document quality indicators and corpus editions.
A scalable, distributed and dynamic workflow system for digitization processes.
Exploiting Network Analysis to Investigate Topic Dynamics in the Digital Library Evaluation Domain.
Digital libraries and data scholarship.
Metadata aggregation and "automated digital libraries": a retrospective on the NSDL experience.
Experimenting with the automatic assignment of educational standards to digital library content.
DSpace: durable digital documents.
XML as the articulation between information retrieval and multimedia in a musical heritage dissemination.
Automatically generating high quality metadata by analyzing the document code of common file types.
Keeping narratives of a desktop to enhance continuity of on-going tasks.
Ontology services for curriculum development in NSDL.
How can spreaders affect the indirect infuence on twitter?
In the company of readers: the digital library book as "practiced place".
Approximate ad-hoc query engine for simulation data.
Interpretation of web page layouts by blind users.
Issues of Dealing with Fluid Data in Digital Libraries.
Time as essence for photo browsing through personal digital libraries.
A user-centered design of a personal digital library for music exploration.
Environmental studies faculty attitudes towards sharing of research data.
Online Person Name Disambiguation with Constraints.
Automatic removal of advertising from web-page display.
The Problem of "Additional Content" in Video Games.
Guided linking: efficiently making image-to-transcript correspondence.
A workbench for information quality evaluation.
Locating text in scanned books.
Real-time collaboration through visual search and voice-over-IP.
Semantic video classification and feature subset selection under context and concept uncertainty.
Browsing and searching behavior in the renardus web service a study based on log analysis.
The HathiTrust Research Center: Providing analytic access to the HathiTrust Digital Library's 4.7 billion pages.
Adaptive personalized eLearning on top of existing LCMS.
Indiana university digital music library project.
TilePic: a file format for tiled hierarchical data.
Impact and prospect of social bookmarks for bibliographic information retrieval.
Evaluating digital libraries.
Finding centuries-old hyperlinks with a novel semi-supervised learning technique.
Hermes: a notification service for digital libraries.
Merging the Norwegian gazetteer with the ADL gazetteer.
TheAdvisor: a webservice for academic recommendation.
Question types in digital reference: an evaluation of question taxonomies.
Generating fuzzy semantic metadata describing spatial relations from images using the R-histogram.
The OAI-ORE effort: progress, challenges, synergies.
Toward a model of self-administering data.
Looking for a picture: an analysis of everyday image information searching.
Building a hypertextual digital library in the humanities: a case study on London.
Overview of the virtual data center project and software.
Personal & soho archiving.
Real-time genre classification for music digital libraries.
Studying Chinese-English Mixed Language Queries from the User Perspectives.
Designing map-based visualizations for collection understanding.
An integrated participatory platform for human evaluation of machine translation.
Transferring structural markup across translations using multilingual alignment and projection.
Web question answering through automatically learned patterns.
A system for indexing tables, algorithms and figures.
An approach to search for the digital library.
ViGOR: a grouping oriented interface for search and retrieval in video libraries.
Exploiting real-time information retrieval in the microblogosphere.
Realistic books: a bizarre homage to an obsolete medium?
JISC metadata schema registry.
Review-oriented metadata enrichment: a case study.
A system for adding content-based searching to a traditional music library catalogue server.
Large-scale ETD repositories: a case study of a digital library application.
Supporting creative work in educational digital libraries.
An Ontological Framework for Describing Games.
Preservation functionality in a digital archive.
Digital trail libraries.
Correlation of music charts and search engine rankings.
The value of risk management for data management in science and engineering.
Automated Semantic Annotation and Retrieval Based on Sharable Ontology and Case-Based Learning Techniques.
Towards building a scholarly big data platform: Challenges, lessons and opportunities.
The avalon media system: a platform for access-controlled delivery of time-based media.
An Open Cultural Digital Content Infrastructure.
When should I make preservation copies of myself?
Big Brother is Watching You - But in a Good Way.
Mink: Integrating the live and archived web viewing experience using web browsers and memento.
Extracting Geometry from Digital Models in a Cultural Heritage Digital Library.
When catalogs collide: A mashup of the bibliographic records from New Zealand's National Bibliography and the HathiTrust.
Comic2CEBX: A system for automatic comic content adaptation.
Fourth-Phase Digital Libraries: Pacing, Linking, Annotating and Citing in Multimedia Collections.
Detecting and modeling local text reuse.
Using ACM DL paper metadata as an auxiliary source for building educational collections.
Modularization Framework for Digital Museum Exhibition.
RefSeer: A citation recommendation system.
Cross-Cultural Usability for Digital Libraries.
Collections and Access Policies of the Digital Material of Ten National Libraries.
Towards automatic identification of core concepts in educational resources.
SNAC: The Social Networks and Archival Context project - Towards an archival authority cooperative.
Repository Synchronization in the OAI Framework.
eBizSearch: An OAI-Compliant Digital Library for eBusiness.
A Comparison of Two Educational Resource Discovery Systems.
The Dienst-OAI Gateway.
Crowd-sourcing Web knowledge for metadata extraction.
Enabling multilingual information access to digital collections: An investigation of metadata records translation.
The OAI-PMH Static Repository and Static Repository Gateway.
Taxonomies for Automated Question Triage in Digital Reference.
CKGHV: a comprehensive knowledge graph for history visualization.
Genescene: Biomedical Text And Data Mining.
Explore the stacks: A system for exploration in large digital libraries.
Modeling abstractions for dance digital libraries.
The ups and downs of knowledge infrastructures in science: Implications for data management.
Zeri e LODE. Extracting the Zeri photo archive to linked open data: formalizing the conceptual model.
MetaTest: Evaluation of Metadata from Generation to Use.
What triggers human remembering of events? A large-scale analysis of catalysts for collective memory in Wikipedia.
Steps Towards Establishing Shared Evaluation Goals and Procedures in the National Science Digital Librar.
Topic Detection and Interest Tracking in a Dynamic Online News Source.
An argument for archiving Facebook as a heterogeneous personal store.
Cost and benefit analysis of mediated enterprise search.
Assembling and Enriching Digital Library Collections.
PerCon: A personal digital library for heterogeneous data.
Full-text based context-rich heterogeneous network mining approach for citation recommendation.
Bridging the gap between real world repositories and Scalable Preservation Environments.
Microscopic analysis of document handling while reading: Classification of behavior toward paper document.
Towards a Cultural Heritage Digital Library.
Exploring relationships among video games.
Method for supporting analysis of personal relationships through place names extracted from documents.
Using affective embodied agents in information literacy education.
Correcting Broken Characters in the Recognition of Historical Printed Documents.
Amplifying scientific paper's abstract by leveraging data-weighted reconstruction.
Life span of web pages: A survey of 10 million pages collected in 2001.
Data mapping framework in a digital library with computational epidemiology datasets.
Bend me, shape me: A practical experience of repurposing research data.
REEL: A Relation Extraction Learning framework.
The Organization information integration in the management of a Digital Library System.
Topical establishment leveraging literature evolution.
A computational approach to understanding and predicting the behavior of educators using an online curriculum planning tool.
Collaborative visual interfaces to digital libraries.
Automatic tag recommendation for metadata annotation using probabilistic topic modeling.
Desiderata for Exploratory Search Interfaces to Web Archives in Support of Scholarly Activities.
Evaluating the distributed national electronic resource.
The processing of digitized works.
Capturing content for virtual museums: from pieces to exhibits.
Evaluating and ranking patents using weighted citations.
Digitizing &amp; providing access to contextual cultural materials: the liner notes digitization project.
Interactively browsing movies in terms of action, foreshadowing and resolution.
How to build a digital library using open-source software.
You can lead a horse to water: teacher development and use of digital library resources.
From kinescope to rich media: 50 years (ago) with Mike Wallace.
Digital library education in computer science programs.
Variations2: a digital music library system.
Combined searching of web and oai digital library resources.
Discovering Australia's research data.
Categorizing web search results into meaningful and stable categories using fast-feature techniques.
The Dawn of Today's Popular Domains: A Study of the Archived German Web over 18 Years.
Insights into collections gaps through examination of null result searches in DLESE.
Meta-line: lineage information for improved metadata quality.
Developing a digital library education program.
A curriculum customization service.
Before the Repository: Defining the Preservation Threats to Research Data in the Lab.
The climate change collection: a case study on digital library collection review and the integration of research, education and evaluation.
A roadmap for data services.
Automatic organization for digital photographs with geographic coordinates.
Discovery of retrograde and inverted themes for indexing musical scores.
Human evaluation of Kea, an automatic keyphrasing system.
A study of annotations for a consumer health portal.
How Well Are Arabic Websites Archived?
Using citations for ranking in digital libraries.
Looking for new, not known music only: music retrieval by melody style.
Entertainment history museums in virtual worlds: video game and music preservation in second life.
A DL server with OAI capabilities: LOVE.
Future Digital Libraries: Research and Responsibilities.
Cooperative collection building in NSDL MatDL pathway through IVIa data fountains.
Structured audio content analysis and metadata in a digital library.
Extending sitemaps for ResourceSync.
Icon abacus and ghost icons.
Considering users and their opinions in knowledge management systems.
Augmenting interoperability across scholarly repositories.
Question Identification and Classification on an Academic Question Answering Site.
Information Extraction for Scholarly Digital Libraries.
Teaching box builder: customizing pedagogical contexts for use of digital library resources in classrooms.
When personalization meets socialization: an iCADAL approach.
Robust registration of manuscript images.
Are learned topics more useful than subject headings.
A classification scheme for algorithm citation function in scholarly works.
Using google analytics to explore ETDs use.
Accessing the alexandria digital library from geographic information systems.
Collection synthesis.
MANGAS infrastructure.
Mining and analyzing digital archive usage data to support collection development decisions.
What do exploratory searchers look at in a faceted search interface?
Large introductory science courses & digital libraries.
Enki: open infrastructure for adaptive digital libraries.
Pinterest: social collecting for #linking #using #sharing.
Feature selection for automatic classification of musical instrument sounds.
eLibrary and ARTE: two opendlib digital libraries.
Read between the lines: A Machine Learning Approach for Disambiguating the Geo-location of Tweets.
Learning to deduplicate.
An architecture for the aggregation and analysis of scholarly usage data.
Our Americas archive partnership demonstration.
PivotViz: Interactive Visual Analysis of Multidimensional Library Transaction Data.
Developing a review rubric for learning resources in digital libraries.
Improving Accessibility of Archived Raster Dictionaries of Complex Script Languages.
Caspar: cultural, artistic and scientific knowledge for preservation, access and retrieval.
Preservation and transition of NCSTRL using an OAI-based architecture.
Characterize scientific domain and domain context.
Interface design for browsing faceted metadata.
Modeling search assistance mechanisms within web-scale discovery systems.
Core services in the architecture of the national science digital library (NSDL).
Creating a searchable map library via data mining.
Middle school children's use of the ARTEMIS digital library.
Impact: the last frontier in digital library evaluation.
Mobile image capture and management.
Electronic records processing: it's a CINCH!
Slide image retrieval: a preliminary study.
Real-time Filtering on Interest Profiles in Twitter Stream.
Recommender system for MIR research community.
A performance support systems approach to digital publishing in libraries.
XEB: a markup language document container format suitable for handheld devices.
Practical digital library interoperability standards.
Context identification of sentences in related work sections using a conditional random field: towards intelligent digital libraries.
Digital libraries for scientific data discovery and reuse: from vision to practical reality.
Thesauri and ontologies in digital libraries: 2. design, evaluation, and development.
Assessing tools for use with webcasts.
Distributed resource discovery: using z39.50 to build cross-domain information servers.
Fluid interaction for the document in context.
Visualizing Published Metadata in Large Aggregations.
Developing digital libraries education and training programs.
Using the internet to communicate with immigrant/refugee communities about health.
Comparative interoperability project: configurations of community, technology, organization.
Topic model methods for automatically identifying out-of-scope resources.
Digital gazetteers: integration into distributed digital library services.
Recovering missing citations in a scholarly network: a 2-step citation analysis to estimate publication importance.
Kindle usage among LIS students: an exploratory study.
Adapting digital libraries to continual evolution.
A personalized learning environment.
Mobile digital libraries for geography education.
NSDL: from prototype to production to transformational national resource.
Using the open archives initiative protocols with EAD.
The ncsu catalog research testbed: a tool for evaluating faceted library catalog interfaces.
Constructing an anonymous dataset from the personal digital photo libraries of mac app store users.
An interoperability service framework for high-resolution image applications.
OntoFrame S3: academic research information portal service using semantic web technologies and linguistic knowledge.
Developing recommendation services for a digital library with uncertain and changing data.
Msica colonial: 18th century music score meets 21st century digitalization technology.
Efficient summarization-aware search for online news articles.
Generating citation digests for scientific publications.
Mobile Mink: Merging Mobile and Desktop Archived Webs.
PERSIVAL, a system for personalized search and summarization over multimedia healthcare information.
Designing e-books for legal research.
On content-driven search-keyword suggesters for literature digital libraries.
A web service framework for embedding discovery services in distributed library interfaces.
Effects of structure and interaction style on distinct search tasks.
An ethnographic study of technical support workers: why we didn't build a tech support digital library.
Schema mapper: a visualization tool for DL integration.
Style-consistency calligraphy synthesis system in digital library.
What patrons want: supporting interaction for novice information seeking scholars.
Addressing researchers' needs through the data curation profile.
Free benchmark corpora for preservation experiments: using model-driven engineering to generate data sets.
Apparatus and methods for production of printed aromatic and gustative information.
The ingest and maintenance of electronic records: moving from theory to practice.
Early returns on an institutional repository: an exploration of the validity and functionality of pocketknowledge.
Motivating and supporting faculty use of educational digital libraries: an example from the geosciences.
Modeling personal and social network context for event annotation in images.
Information-theoretic term weighting schemes for document clustering.
How children find books for leisure reading: implications for the digital library.
Metababble: a clash of metadata cultures.
Developing practical automatic metadata assignment and evaluation tools for internet resources.
Visualizing the archive of a computer mediated communication process.
Digital preservation in a box: outreach resources for digital stewardship.
Moving the Needle: From Innovation to Impact.
Collaboration and communication tools used by the biodiversity heritage library.
Retrieval in text collections with historic spelling using linguistic and spelling variants.
Hierarchical indexing and document matching in BoW.
Knowledge extraction and integration for semi-structural information in digital libraries.
Do public library websites consider the disabled or senior citizens?
Towards an electronic variorum dition of Don Quixote.
AIRFrame: integrating diverse digital collections in astrobiology.
Measuring historical word sense variation.
Evaluating Cost of Cloud Execution in a Data Repository.
Enhancing access to research data: the challenge of crystallography.
Repurposing data across disciplines: a study of data reuse issues between climate science and social science.
Effective self-training author name disambiguation in scholarly digital libraries.
A tool for teaching principles of image metadata generation.
XSLT for tailored access to a digtal video library.
A search engine for Japanese academic papers.
Detecting and supporting known item queries in online public access catalogs.
Dynamic online views of meta-indexes.
Rapid document navigation for information triage support.
slab: smart labeling of family photos through an interactive interface.
Personal name-matching through name transformation.
The digital atlas of American religion.
AckSeer: a repository and search engine for automatically extracted acknowledgments from digital libraries.
Building a search engine for computer science course syllabi.
Scaffolding the infrastructure of the computational science digital library.
Instrument distribution and music notation search for enhancing bibliographic music score retrieval.
The return of the trivial: problems formalizing collection/item metadata relationships.
A framework for describing web repositories.
Building cross-browser interfaces for digital libraries with scalable vector graphics (SVG).
Designing the reading experience for scanned multi-lingual picture books on mobile phones.
Books' Interest Grading and Fiction Readers' Search Actions During Query Reformulation Intervals.
Improving algorithm search using the algorithm co-citation network.
Evaluation of OAI-ORE via large-scale information topology visualization.
Collecting fragmentary authors in a digital library.
Multi-modal classification in digital news libraries.
Introduction to Digital Libraries.
Knowledge Curation Discussions and Activity Dynamics in a Short Lived Social Q&A Community.
BinarizationShop: a user-assisted software suite for converting old documents to black-and-white.
An exploration of pattern-based subtopic modeling for search result diversification.
Indexing institutional data to promote library resource discovery.
First class objects and indexes for chant manuscripts.
Making web annotations persistent over time.
Metaextract: an NLP system to automatically assign metadata.
Lost in memories: interacting with photo collections on PDAs.
User interface evaluation of meta-indexes for search.
Medusa at the university of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign: a digital preservation service based on PREMIS.
Eliminating the redundancy in blocking-based entity resolution methods.
Visual interfaces to digital libraries.
Supporting access to large digital oral history archives.
Interactive visualization of video metadata.
Comparative appraisal: systematic assessment of expressive qualities.
Automatic extraction of titles from general documents using machine learning.
Introduction to Digital Libraries.
Usability, learning, and subjective experience: user evaluation of K-MODDL in an undergraduate class.
Using concept maps in digital libraries as a cross-language resource discovery tool.
Automatic Classification of Research Documents using Textual Entailment.
Concept maps to support oral history search and use.
The role of the dikw hierarchy in the design of a digital library system for the scientific data of large-scale evaluation campaigns.
Oer recommender: linking nsdl pathways and opencourseware repositories.
Icon abacus: positional display of document attributes.
Integrating ddi metadata into the nara transcontinental persistent archive prototype via the oai-pmh.
Detecting events with date and place information in unstructured text.
Curriculum development for digital libraries.
The materials digital library: MatDL.org.
Taking chemistry to the task: personalized queries for chemical digital libraries.
Metadata data dictionary for analog sound recordings.
Multi-linguistic collaborative distance learning: from information translation to knowledge translation.
Digital libraries and educational practice: a case for new models.
SIMPEL: a superimposed multimedia presentation editor and player.
Is tagging multilingual?: a case study with BibSonomy.
Faceted search for heterogeneous digital collections.
A comparative study of academic and Wikipedia ranking.
Facilitating content creation and content research in building the city of lit digital library.
Tipple: location-triggered mobile access to a digital library for audio books.
Context Matters: Towards Extracting a Citation's Context Using Linguistic Features.
Task-based interaction with an integrated multilingual, multimedia information system: a formative evaluation.
Name disambiguation in author citations using a K-way spectral clustering method.
Reading the correct history?: modeling temporal intention in resource sharing.
Evaluating the national science digital library.
CSSeer: an expert recommendation system based on CiteseerX.
Panel on digital preservation.
An evaluation of caching policies for memento timemaps.
Annotating illuminated manuscripts: an effective tool for research and education.
Exploring erotics in Emily Dickinson's correspondence with text mining and visual interfaces.
Improving mood classification in music digital libraries by combining lyrics and audio.
Harvana: harvesting community tags to enrich collection metadata.
From playful exhibits to LOM: lessons from building an exploratorium digital library.
Mining Advisor-Advisee Relationships in Scholarly Big Data: A Deep Learning Approach.
View segmentation and static/dynamic summary generation for echocardiogram videos.
The challenges of digging data: a study of context in archaeological data reuse.
DRIADE: a data repository for evolutionary biology.
A longitudinal study of exploratory and keyword search.
Data Curation with a Focus on Reuse.
Variations2: improving music findability in a digital library through work-centric metadata.
Drowning in data: digital library architecture to support scientific use of embedded sensor networks.
MetRe: supporting the metadata revision process.
Ontology acquisition and semantic retrieval from semantic annotated chinese poetry.
Enforcing interoperability with the open archives initiative repository explorer.
Extended XQuery for digital libraries.
Automatic syllabus classification.
Local histories in global digital libraries: identifying demand and evaluating coverage.
Inter-search engine lexical signature performance.
Unicode for multilingual representation in digital libraries from the indian perspective.
Can't see the forest for the trees?: a citation recommendation system.
Building searchable collections of enterprise speech data.
Digital library education: some international course structure comparisons.
Rediscovering missing web pages using link neighborhood lexical signatures.
Museum materials in a digital library context and beyond.
Generalized formal models for faceted user interfaces.
The ADEPT digital library architecture.
A digital library for geography examination resources.
Emphasis on examining results in fiction searches contributes to finding good novels.
Digital facsimile editions and on-line editing.
5SL: a language for declarative specification and generation of digital libraries.
An analysis of the named entity recognition problem in digital library metadata.
E-informing the public: communicative intents in the production of online government information.
Enhancing access to the levy sheet music collection: reconstructing full-text lyrics from syllables.
A digital library for health sciences educators: the health education assets library (heal).
Glyph Miner: A System for Efficiently Extracting Glyphs from Early Prints in the Context of OCR.
Digital Donne: workflow, editing tools, and the reader's interface of a collection of 17th-century english poetry.
Docear: an academic literature suite for searching, organizing and creating academic literature.
Video retrieval with multiple image search strategies.
The challenges of statistical digital libraries.
Scholarly paper recommendation via user's recent research interests.
The digital ideakeeper: integrating digital libraries with a scaffolded environment for online inquiry.
Automatic categorization of figures in scientific documents.
CiteSearch: next-generation citation analysis.
Template-based authoring of educational artifacts.
Identifying core concepts in educational resources.
The David L. Bassett stereoscopic atlas of human anatomy: developing a specialized collection within the stanford mediaserver digital library.
Integrating digital libraries by CORBA, XML and Servlet.
Modeling and exploiting heterogeneous bibliographic networks for expertise ranking.
Exploring the usability of folksonomies in the online art museum community.
Selective harvesting of regional digital libraries and national metadata aggregators.
Toponym extraction and resolution in a digital library.
On-demand metadata extraction network (OMEN).
Automatic performance evaluation of dewarping methods in large scale digitization of historical documents.
Stanford encyclopedia of philosophy: a dynamic reference work.
Demonstration of hierarchical document clustering of digital library retrieval results.
Games for Crowdsourcing Mobile Content: An Analysis of Contribution Patterns.
Marine realms information bank: a distributed geolibrary for the ocean.
SNAC: the social networks and archival context project.
Shuhai Wenyuan interactive internet worktable: studying ancient chinese philosophy online.
The Iowa City UNESCO City of literature digital library.
Localizing experience of digital content via structural metadata.
Induced tagging: promoting resource discovery and recommendation in digital libraries.
Error anaylsis of Chinese text segmentation using statistical approach.
Exploring digital libraries: integrating browsing, searching, and visualization.
Creating the infrastructure for collaboration between digital reference services and researchers: the digital reference electronic warehouse (DREW) project.
A practical ontology for the large-scale modeling of scholarly artifacts and their usage.
Facilitating the effective use of earth science data in education through digital libraries: bridging the gap between scientists and educators.
A study of awareness in multimedia search.
Longitudinal analysis of historical texts' readability.
User and Topical Factors in Perceived Self-Efficacy of Video Digital Libraries.
User search behaviors within a library gateway.
Toolkits for visualizing co-authorship graph.
The virtual naval hospital: the digital library as knowledge management tool for nomadic patrons.
Next generation knowledge organization systems: integration challenges and strategies.
Probabilistic, object-oriented logics for annotation-based retrieval in digital libraries.
An experimental framework for comparative digital library evaluation: the logging scheme.
Text categorization for multi-page documents: a hybrid naive Bayes HMM approach.
Vertical selection in the information domain of children.
An application for semantic markup of biodiversity documents.
Socialtrust: tamper-resilient trust establishment in online communities.
World explorer: visualizing aggregate data from unstructured text in geo-referenced collections.
Quantifying software requirements for supporting archived office documents using emulation.
Democratic access to information in a rapidly changing society: the case of Brazil.
Mapping the intersection of science and philosophy.
Trust and epistemic communities in biodiversity data sharing.
Supporting revisitation with contextual suggestions.
Personalizing information retrieval for people with different levels of topic knowledge.
Scholars portal: beyond simple metasearch.
If you harvest arXiv.org, will they come?
Toward alternative measures for ranking venues: a case of database research community.
Building domain-specific web collections for scientific digital libraries: a meta-search enhanced focused crawling method.
Enhancing digital libraries with TechLens+.
Joint Workshop on Bibliometric-enhanced Information Retrieval and Natural Language Processing for Digital Libraries (BIRNDL 2016).
Scientific cyberlearning resources referential metadata creation via information retrieval.
Addressing diverse corpora with cluster-based term weighting.
A usability evaluation study of a digital library self-archiving service.
Highly structured scientific publications.
Semi-automated rediscovery of lost YouTube music videos.
A publisher of last resort: enduring document access.
Exposing the hidden web for chemical digital libraries.
Avoiding the Drunkard's Search: Investigating Collection Strategies for Building a Twitter Dataset.
Improving a hybrid literary book recommendation system through author ranking.
A comparison of melodic database retrieval techniques using sung queries.
Running greenstone on an ipod.
In the bookshop: examining popular search strategies.
Personalized spiders for web search and analysis.
Integrating expertise into the NSDL: putting a human face on the digital library.
Modeling Faceted Browsing with Category Theory to Support Interoperability and Reuse.
Thesauri and ontologies in digital libraries.
Semantically augmented annotations in digitized map collections.
Toward melodic access and title uniformity in the chopin early editions music digital library.
Document search interface design for large-scale collections and intelligent access.
Exploiting image semantics for picture libraries.
Investigating influential factors influencing users to share news in social media: a diffusion of innovations perspective.
Towards a unified framework for assessing the complexity of digital libraries.
Digital libraries for computational journalism.
Topic models for taxonomies.
Characterizing Users Tagging Behavior in Academic Blogs.
The learning matrix: cataloging resources with rich metadata.
Recovering a website's server components from the web infrastructure.
The dspace repository: can multiple institutions live in one space? a different approach.
Document level interoperability for collection creators.
Translation of on-screen text into visual expressions.
The profiles in science digital library: behind the scenes.
An alignment based system for chord sequence retrieval.
Workshop on the creation of standardized test collections, tasks and metrics for music information retrieval (MIR) and music digital library (MDL) evaluation.
Studying the presence of terrorism on the web: an knowledge portal approach.
Modeling web data.
How people find videos.
A relevance feedback approach for the author name disambiguation problem.
Measuring the quality of network visualization.
Web Archiving and Digital Libraries (WADL).
Building image-based electronic editions using the edition production technology.
Can you learn it?: Probably! Developing Learning Analytics Tools in R.
Library leaders on digital libraries and the future of the research library: a panel discussion.
Active netlib: an active mathematical software collection for inquiry-based computational science & engineering education.
Knowledge representation from information extraction.
Live television in a digital library.
A digital library data model for music.
How to Identify Specialized Research Communities Related to a Researcher's Changing Interests.
NBDL: a CIS framework for NSDL.
Can an intermediary collection help users search image databases without annotations?
Publishing earthquake engineering research data.
Structure extraction from PDF-based book documents.
Active associative sampling for author name disambiguation.
International scientific data, standards, & digital libraries.
Computationally Supported Collection-level Descriptions in Large Heterogeneous Metadata Aggregations.
A figure search engine architecture for a chemistry digital library.
Journal ranking based on social information.
WikiMirs 3.0: A Hybrid MIR System Based on the Context, Structure and Importance of Formulae in a Document.
Creating a multi disciplinary digital library in the 5S framework.
Categorization and analysis of text in computer mediated communication archives using visualization.
Tagging semantics: investigations with wordnet.
An approach to automatic classification of text for information retrieval.
A content analysis of institutional data policies.
Comparative study of name disambiguation problem using a scalable blocking-based framework.
Detecting and exploiting stability in evolving heterogeneous information spaces.
Time period directories: a metadata infrastructure for placing events in temporal and geographic context.
G-Portal: a map-based digital library for distributed geospatial and georeferenced resources.
Analyzing OPAC use with screen views and eye tracking.
Pilot testing the DigiQUAL
CollabSeer: a search engine for collaboration discovery.
Content Analysis of Social Tags Generated by Health Consumers.
Finding a metaphor for collecting and disseminating distributed NSDL content and communications.
Big Data Text Summarization for Events: A Problem Based Learning Course.
GROTOAP: ground truth for open access publications.
Panorama: extending digital libraries with topical crawlers.
Generating best-effort preservation metadata for web resources at time of dissemination.
The effectiveness of automatically structured queries in digital libraries.
A simple method for citation metadata extraction using hidden markov models.
Subject metadata enrichment using statistical topic models.
LSH-based large scale chinese calligraphic character recognition.
Global web archive integration with memento.
NanoPort: a web portal for nanoscale science and technology.
MOOD-lighting: massive open online discovery using solr and blacklight.
Constructing digital library interfaces.
The digital library of historical cartography of the University of So Paulo.
A signal/semantic framework for image retrieval.
Use of MatML with software applications for e-learning.
Community design of DLESE's collections review policy: a technological frames analysis.
Research discovery through linked open data.
Building a research social network from an individual perspective.
Understanding digital library adoption: a use diffusion approach.
Panel: Preserving Born-digital News.
Building a MARC-to-OLAC crosswalk: repurposing library catalog data for the language resources community.
Greenbug: a hybrid web-inspector, debugger and design editor for greenstone.
Text mining for indexing.
A semi-automatic system for managing multiple digital preservation risks of digital libraries in china.
FRBR: enriching and integrating digital libraries.
User search characteristics on a specialized digital collection fordomain- and task-specific information.
Serendipitous recommendation for scholarly papers considering relations among researchers.
The nuestra Iowa project: creating a digital collection as a tool for history education.
Comprehensive access to printed materials (CAPM).
HeinOnline: An Online Arcive of Law Journals.
Resolving the unencoded character problem for chinese digital libraries.
The State of Practice and Use of Digital Collections: The Digital Public Library of America as a platform for research.
Following bibliometric footprints: the ACM digital library and the evolution of computer science.
Leveraging context to resolve identity in photo albums.
Supporting biological information work: research and education for digital resources and long-lived data.
Mining events and new name translations from online daily news.
Multiple sources with multiple portals: a demonstration of the ensemble computing portal in second life.
Understanding cultural heritage experts' information seeking needs.
Document clustering using small world communities.
Factors affecting website reconstruction from the web infrastructure.
BibRank: a language-based model for co-ranking entities in bibliographic networks.
Use of online digital learning materials and digital libraries: comparison by discipline.
Profiling vs. Time vs. Content: What does Matter for Top-k Publication Recommendation based on Twitter Profiles?
Topic Modeling Users' Interpretations of Songs to Inform Subject Access in Music Digital Libraries.
Looking at digital library usability from a reuse perspective.
Using sharable ontology to retrieve historical images.
A formal ontology for temporal entities and its application in knowledge extraction.
Towards an electronic variorum edition of Cervantes' Don Quixote: : visualizations that support preparation.
Query parameters for harvesting digital video and associated contextual information.
Sharing encountered information: digital libraries get a social life.
A source independent framework for research paper recommendation.
Exploring Wikipedia with HMpara.
Users' adjustments to unsuccessful queries in biomedical search.
Designing exploratory search tasks for user studies of information seeking support systems.
EMU: the emory user behavior data management system for automatic library search evaluation.
Generating ground truth for music mood classification using mechanical turk.
FRBR and facets provide flexible, work-centric access to items in library collections.
From nsdl 1.0 to nsdl 2.0: towards a comprehensive cyberinfrastructure for teaching and learning.
Using national bibliographies for rights clearance.
Thesauri and ontologies in digital libraries: 1. structure and use in knowledge-based assistance to users.
A document corpus browser for in-depth reading.
Evaluation of header metadata extraction approaches and tools for scientific PDF documents.
Building a dynamic lexicon from a digital library.
Visual understanding environment.
Collaborative classifier agents: studying the impact of learning in distributed document classification.
Demonstrating education impact: challenges in the years ahead.
Digmap: a service for searching and browsing old maps.
Evaluation of DEFINDER: a system to mine definitions from consumer-oriented medical text.
The 3D vase museum: a new approach to context in a digital library.
Digital libraries and community networking: the canadian experience.
A search engine approach to estimating temporal changes in gender orientation of first names.
Video recommendations for the open video project.
Exploring content-actor paired network data using iterative query refinement with NetLens.
What do digital librarians do.
RFV: interactive geographical visualization for citation network exploration.
Building a story tracer out of a web archive.
A new generation of textual corpora: mining corpora from very large collections.
Cross-cultural usability of the library metaphor.
Static reformulation: a user study of static hypertext for query-based reformulation.
The working scientist and the realities of data curation: a qualitative study addressing attitudes and needs.
DP9: an OAI gateway service for web crawlers.
Capturing and curating published data.
Math information retrieval: user requirements and prototype implementation.
Book selection behavior in the physical library: implications for ebook collections.
Developing the DigiQUAL protocol for digital library evaluation.
Routing Memento Requests Using Binary Classifiers.
The dcc curation lifecycle model.
Full-text and topic based authorrank and enhanced publication ranking.
Visual understanding environment.
Automatic extraction of morphological information from botanical collections.
Measuring inter-indexer consistency using a thesaurus.
The social life of books in the humane library.
Resolving author name homonymy to improve resolution of structures in co-author networks.
Meaningful presentations of photo libraries: rationale and applications of bi-level radial quantum layouts.
Using sentence-selection heuristics to rank text segments in TXTRACTOR.
Recommendation as link prediction: a graph kernel-based machine learning approach.
On assigning place names to geography related web pages.
Personalized project space for managing metadata of geography learning objects.
Automating open educational resources assessments: a machine learning generalization study.
Spatiotemporal mapping of Wikipedia concepts.
Improving simulation management systems through ontology generation and utilization.
Overview of digital libraries.
Adaptive sorted neighborhood methods for efficient record linkage.
Using word sense discrimination on historic document collections.
User centred interactive search in the humanities.
CTRnet DL for disaster information services.
A lightweight metadata quality tool.
National digital newspaper program: a case study in sharing, linking, and using data.
oreChem ChemXSeer: a semantic digital library for chemistry.
Discovering gis sources on the web using summaries.
Trends in metadata practices: a longitudinal study of collection federation.
The Alexandria digital earth prototype.
An evaluation model for a digital library services tool.
Argentinean historical heritage project.
Bioinformatics and digital libraries.
Finding authoritative people from the web.
A multilingual, multimodal digital video library system.
Using librarian techniques in automatic text summarization for information retrieval.
Customizing science instruction with educational digital libraries.
User Activity Characterization in a Cultural Heritage Digital Library System.
Use vs. access: design and use in educational digital libraries.
ContextMiner: building context-rich digital collections.
Developing a metadata schema for CSERD: a computational science digital library.
Merging metadata: a sociotechnical study of crosswalking and interoperability.
Towards a virtual organization for data cyberinfrastructure.
To envisage and design the transition from a digital archive system developed for domain experts to one for non-domain users.
SCOR/IODE/MBLWHOI library collaboration on data publication.
Annotating historical archives of images.
BIBSURF: Discover Bibliographic Entities by Searching for Units of Interest, Ranking and Filtering.
The user-centered development and testing of a dublin core metadata tool.
Ensemble PDP-8: eight principles for distributed portals.
Databrary: Enabling Sharing and Reuse of Research Video.
Adapting peer verification, validation and accreditation processes for digital libraries.
Co-reading: investigating collaborative group reading.
Using web information for author name disambiguation.
Video-cuebik: adapting image search to video shots.
MemGator - A Portable Concurrent Memento Aggregator: Cross-Platform CLI and Server Binaries in Go.
A digital library for water main break identification and visualization.
Quantifying the accuracy of relational statements in Wikipedia: a methodology.
Do graphical search interfaces support effective search for and evaluation of digital library resources.
CADAL digital calligraphy system.
Quality Assessment of Wikipedia Articles without Feature Engineering.
An architecture for a distributed digital library from the desktop up: the fascinator.
IssueLab: the social sector's digital library.
Identifying personal photo digital library features.
Legal deposit of digital publications: a review of research and development activity.
OpenArXiv = arXiv + RDBMS + web services.
Introduction to (teaching/learning about) digital libraries.
Towards a model of the e-science data environment.
What happens when facebook is gone?
Big Data Processing of School Shooting Archives.
Physics pathway: a digital library filled with synthetic interviews.
Reprocessing paper-based reference materials for the digital environment.
Investigating Cluster Stability when Analyzing Transaction Logs.
Mapping life events: temporal and geographic context for biographical information.
Greenstone digital library software: current research.
Institutional structures for research data and metadata curation.
Analyzing viewing patterns while reading picture books.
Plato: a preservation planning tool.
VideoGraph: a new tool for video mining and classification.
A user-friendly metadata quality control tool for the internet public library.
Thesaurus based automatic keyphrase indexing.
5th International Workshop on Mining Scientific Publications (WOSP 2016).
Information system media education (ISM): cooperating for media literacy.
Demonstrating the use of a SenseCam in two domains.
Introduction to the open archives initiative protocol for metadata harvesting.
Coupling browse and search in highly interactive user interfaces: a study of the relation browser++.
Personalized query expansion in the QIC system.
ForeCite: towards a reader-centric scholarly digital library.
Enhancing Scholarly Use of Digital Libraries: A Comparative Survey and Review of Bibliographic Metadata Ontologies.
A framework for analyzing semantic change of words across time.
CED
Finding pages on the unarchived Web.
Object-Oriented Modeling, Import and Query Processing of Digital Documents.
Reading from paper versus reading from a touch-based tablet device in proofreading.
Acquisition, Representation, Query and Analysis of Spatial Data: A Demonstration 3D Digital Library.
How Fast Is Too Fast? Evaluating Fast Forward Surrogates for Digital Video.
A System for Building Expandable Digital Libraries.
Leveraging a Common Representation for Personalized Search and Summarization in a Medical Digital Library.
OAI Metadata Harvesting Worksho.
Learning Digital Library Technology Across Borders.
A preliminary evaluation of hathitrust metadata: Assessing the sufficiency of legacy records.
Personal Spaces in the Context of OA.
Establishing an online access panel for interactive information retrieval research.
Keeping your aggregative infrastructure under control.
A comparative analysis of disciplinary data management workflows.
Sustainability Issues and Activities for the NSDL.
Social information behaviour in physical libraries: Implications for the design of digital libraries.
A Quantified Fidelity Criterion for Parameter-Embedded Watermarking of Audio Archives.
A Scientific Digital Library in Context: An Earth Radiation Budget Experiment Collection in the Atmospheric Sciences Data Center Digital Library.
CephSchool: A Pedagogic Portal for Teaching Biological Principles with Cephalopod Molluscs.
Automatic Document Metadata Extraction Using Support Vector Machines.
The Roadies Take the Stage: On-Going Development and Maintenance of the Legacy Tobacco Documents Library at the University of California Sa.
A context model for digital preservation of processes and its application to a digital library system.
How to Turn the Page.
XML Semantics and Digital Libraries.
Lend me some sugar: Borrowing rates of neighbouring books as evidence for browsing.
VIVO - A Video Indexing and Visualization Organizer.
A quantitative comparison on file folder structures of two groups of information workers.
Identifying the same records across multiple Ukiyo-e image databases using textual data in different languages.
Do altmetrics follow the crowd or does the crowd follow altmetrics?
Making research data findable in digital libraries: A layered model for user-oriented indexing of survey data.
Methods for Precise Named Entity Matching in Digital Collections.
Correcting Common Distortions in Camera-Imaged Library Materials.
Creating lightweight ontologies for dataset description practical applications in a cross-domain research data management workflow.
The Archival Acid Test: Evaluating archive performance on advanced HTML and JavaScript.
The SCAPE preservation lifecycle.
Cross-cultural mood regression for music digital libraries.
Comparing Published Scientific Journal Articles to Their Pre-print Versions.
A study of automation from seed URL generation to focused web archive development: the CTRnet context.
Towards a new reading experience via semantic fusion of text and music.
The NDIIPP preservation network: progress, problems, and promise.
Responsibility for research data quality in open access: a slovenian case.
Automatic feature thesaurus enrichment: extracting generic terms from digital gazetteer.
A retrospective look at Greenstone: lessons from the first decade.
Can Academic Conferences Promote Research Collaboration?
A hybrid approach to generating and utilizing faceted vocabulary for knowledge discovery on the web.
combinFormation: a mixed-initiative system for representing collections as compositions of image and text surrogates.
HMM-based musical query retrieval.
Tools and techniques for harvesting the world wide web.
Ensuring quality in peer review.
Link prediction approach to collaborative filtering.
Digital History Meets Wikipedia: Analyzing Historical Persons in Wikipedia.
Usability of digital libraries: an evaluation model.
Using a hidden Markov model to transcribe handwritten bushman texts.
The myth of find: user behaviour and attitudes towards the basic search feature.
The UpLib personal digital library system.
Using web metrics to analyze digital libraries.
Is it time to change the OER repositories role?
Towards Identifying Potential Research Collaborations from Scientific Research Networks using Scholarly Data.
Persistent annotations deserve new URIs.
Application of kalman filters to identify unexpected change in blogs.
Preliminary Exploration of the Effect of Time Constraint on Search Interactions on Webpages.
Measuring the reputation of web sites: a preliminary exploration.
A tale of two studies: is dissemination working?
ETANA-DL: a digital library for integrated handling of heterogeneous archaeological data.
An exploration of the research trends in the digital library evaluation domain.
The SEAD DataNet prototype: data preservation services for sustainability science.
How people describe their image information needs: a grounded theory analysis of visual arts queries.
UpdateNews: a news clustering and summarization system using efficient text processing.
Early Prediction of Scholar Popularity.
WARCreate: create wayback-consumable WARC files from any webpage.
The variety of ways in which instructors implement a modular digital library curriculum.
Interactive search result clustering: a study of user behavior and retrieval effectiveness.
Project ANGEL: an open virtual learning envoronment with sophisticated access management.
Distinguishing venues by writing styles.
Generative model-based metasearch for data fusion in information retrieval.
Using bilingual ETD collections to mine phrase translations.
Evaluation of digital community information systems.
Digital preservation and knowledge discovery based on documents from an international health science program.
Automated text classification using a multi-agent framework.
ArcLink: optimization techniques to build and retrieve the temporal web graph.
Zoomable user interface for in-depth reading.
Biodiversity and biocomplexity informatics: policy and implementation science versus citizen science.
Perambulating libraries: demonstrating how a victorian idea can help OLPC users share books.
Harvesting needed to maintain scientific literature online.
Liquid benchmarks: benchmarking-as-a-service.
Iscapes: digital libraries environments for the promotion of scientific thinking by undergraduates in geography.
Identification of useful user comments in social media: a case study on flickr commons.
Puget sound's MARS (media asset retrieval systems) digital library.
cloudalicious: folksonomy over time.
Improving historical research by linking digital library information to a global genealogical database.
Building a digital library of traditional mongolian historical documents.
Binding browsing and reading activities in a 3D digital library.
DLIST: opening lis research and practice.
Curriculum overlay model for embedding digital resources.
Units of evidence for analyzing subdisciplinary difference in data practice studies.
Integrating data and text mining processes for digital library applications.
Factors motivating use of digital libraries.
Evaluation of a curriculum for digital libraries.
The cyberinfrastructure for scholars project: componentized architecture for sustainable scholarly portals.
Using Transactional Web Archives To Handle Server Errors.
Usage analysis of a public website reconstruction tool.
Enabling exploration: travelers in the middle east archive.
Enabling interoperability for autonomous digital libraries: an API to citeseer services.
Isovera digital library.
Expanding the search for digital preservation solutions: adopting PREMIS in cultural heritage institutions.
Tacit user and developer frames in user-led collection development: the case of the digital water education library.
Open Datasets for Evaluating the Interpretation of Bibliographic Records.
Evaluating sliding and sticky target policies by measuring temporal drift in acyclic walks through a web archive.
Visualizing personal digital collections.
Visualizing an enterprise social network from email.
Streamlining user interaction in tag-based conversational navigation of knowledge resource libraries.
Measuring conference quality by mining program committee characteristics.
Rethinking preservation validation with the preserved object and repository risks ontology (PORRO).
A data model and architecture for long-term preservation.
Selected component technologies in digital libraries.
Learning metadata from the evidence in an on-line citation matching scheme.
Take note: academic note-taking and annotation behavior.
Annotation functionality for digital libraries supporting collaborative performance: an example of musical scores.
A competitive environment for exploratory query expansion.
Implementation and evaluation of palm leaf manuscript metadata schema (PLMM).
The "City of Lit" digital library: a case study of interdisciplinary research and collaboration.
A reciprocal platform for archiving interview videos about arts and crafts.
World vs. method: educational standard formulation impacts document retrieval.
MedTextus: an intelligent web-based medical meta-search system.
Scientific research groups, digital libraries, & education: metadata from nanoscale simulation code.
Crowdsourcing the assembly of concept hierarchies.
Virtual DL poster sessions in second life.
Grid-based digital libraries: cheshire3 and distributed retrieval.
Sentiment-based search in digital libraries.
CQE: a collaborative querying environment.
Organizing the OCA: learning faceted subjects from a library of digital books.
User-assisted ink-bleed correction for handwritten documents.
Toward a distributed terabyte text retrieval system in China-US million book digital library.
Improving Similar Document Retrieval Using a Recursive Pseudo Relevance Feedback Strategy.
Exploring the relationship between personal and public annotations.
Summarizing user-generated reviews in digital libraries: a visual clustering approach.
Predicting Medical Subject Headings Based on Abstract Similarity and Citations to MEDLINE Records.
A ranking and exploration service based on large-scale usage data.
Tailoring greenstone for seniors.
The Greenstone plugin architecture.
Indexing musical pieces using their major repetition.
AskDragon: a redundancy-based factoid question answering system with lightweight local context analysis.
Use of subimages in fish species identification: a qualitative study.
Services for a customizable authority linking environment.
A technique for suggesting related Wikipedia articles using link analysis.
Dimensional standard alignment in K-12 digital libraries: assessment of self-found vs. recommended curriculum.
Emulation based services in digital preservation.
Representing pulaar digitally.
Content-based filtering and personalization using structured metadata.
Visualizing collaboration networks implicit in digital libraries using OntoStarFish.
Text clustering with important words using normalization.
Locating thematic pinpoints in narrative texts with short phrases: a test study on Don Quixote.
Identifying Duplicate and Contradictory Information in Wikipedia.
Language preference in a bi-language digital library.
Turbo recognition: decoding page layout.
Detecting academic papers on the web.
Enhancing the ENVISION interface for digital libraries.
To grow in wisdom: vannevar bush, information overload, and the life of leisure.
Semtinel: interactive supervision of automatic indexing.
DialogPlus: digital libraries in support of innovative approaches to learning and teaching in geography.
The DLESE evaluation services group: a framework for evaluation within a digital library.
Tagging video: conventions and strategies of the YouTube community.
Locating question difficulty through explorations in question space.
Evaluation of kernel-based link analysis measures on research paper recommendation.
Digital libraries supporting digital government.
Teacher sociality and information diffusion in educational digital libraries.
Ncore: architecture and implementation of a flexible, collaborative digital library.
A curated harvesting approach to establishing a multi-protocol online subject portal.
Developing a concept extraction technique with ensemble pathway.
Tagging of name records for genealogical data browsing.
Using the Gamera framework for the recognition of cultural heritage materials.
Whetting the appetite of scientists: producing summaries tailored to the citation context.
Docear4Word: reference management for microsoft word based on BibTeX and the citation style language (CSL).
Applying verification, validation, and accreditation processes to digital libraries.
An Example of Automatic Authority Control.
Why watermark?: the copyright need for an engineering solution.
WADL 2016: Third International Workshop on Web Archiving and Digital Libraries.
Cross-lingual searching and visualization for greek and latin and old norse texts.
Comparison of three digital library interfaces: open library, Google books, and Hathi Trust.
The open archives initiative: building a low-barrier interoperability framework.
The vocalsearch music search engine.
Segregating and extracting overlapping data points in two-dimensional plots.
FRBRization of MARC records in multiple catalogs.
Knowledge Extraction for Literature Review.
Active netlib: an active mathematical software collection for inquiry-based computational science & engineering education.
Semantics and syntax of dublin core usage in open archives initiative data providers of cultural heritage materials.
Query-page intention matching using clicked titles and snippets to boost search rankings.
Mining a digital library for influential authors.
On identifying academic homepages for digital libraries.
Seeking information in realistic books: a user study.
Evalutron 6000: collecting music relevance judgments.
Dynamic classification explorer for music digital libraries.
Extracting taxonomic relationships from on-line definitional sources using LEXING.
Inventor Name Disambiguation for a Patent Database Using a Random Forest and DBSCAN.
Evaluating G-portal for geography learning and teaching.
Integrating greenstone with an interactive map visualizer.
Accessing the densho and historymakers oral history collections via informedia technologies.
An interactive flash website for oral histories.
Towards Better Understanding of Academic Search.
The gray lady gets a new dress: a field study of the times news reader.
Retrieval effectiveness of table of contents and subject headings.
Analyzing user's book-loan behaviors in Peking university library from social network perspective.
Measuring the user's experience with digital libraries.
Do Wikipedians follow domain experts?: a domain-specific study on Wikipedia knowledge building.
ProcessTron: efficient semi-automated markup generation for scientific documents.
Partnership reviewing: a cooperative approach for peer review of complex educational resources.
A query interface for an event gazetteer.
Long term preservation of digital information.
Turning the page on navigation.
Workshop 3: classification crosswalks.
Digital restoration using volumetric scanning.
Digitizing the flea market: eBay as a data source for historic collections.
Improving Consistency of Crowdsourced Multimedia Similarity for Evaluation.
Digital libraries' support for the user's 'information journey'.
An ajax-based digital music stand for greenstone.
Selecting books: a performance-based study.
A methodology and system for preserving digital data.
The Sum of All Human Knowledge in Your Pocket: Full-Text Searchable Wikipedia on a Raspberry Pi.
Information visualization of nuclear decay chain libraries.
Power to the people: end-user building of digital library collections.
Retrieving attributes using web tables.
Unsupervised structure discovery for biodiversity information.
Querylog-based Assessment of Retrievability Bias in a Large Newspaper Corpus.
A model for inclusive design of digital libraries.
Inferring intra-organizational collaboration from cosine similarity distributions in text documents.
Providing context for digital library content.
Improving video browsing with an eye-tracking evaluation of feature-based color bars.
Synchronicity: automatically rediscover missing web pages in real time.
Visualizing aggregated biological pathway relations.
Topic Exploration with the HTRC Data Capsule for Non-Consumptive Research.
Aggregating productivity indices for ranking researchers across multiple areas.
Digitization and 3D modeling of movable books.
Blogger perceptions on digital preservation.
A qualitative analysis of information dissemination through twitter in a digital library.
Exploring educational standard alignment: in search of 'relevance'.
iCrawl: Improving the Freshness of Web Collections by Integrating Social Web and Focused Web Crawling.
A multilingual approach to technical manuscripts: 16th and 17th-century Portuguese shipbuilding treatises.
Refactoring HUBzero for linked data.
Looking back, looking forward: a metadata standard for LANL's aDORe repository.
E-library of medieval chant manuscript transcriptions.
CEBBIP: a parser of bibliographic information in chinese electronic books.
Retrieval and exploratory search in multivariate research data repositories using regressional features.
The David Livingstone spectral imaging project.
Arc: an OAI service provider for cross-archive searching.
Event detection with spatial latent Dirichlet allocation.
Adding content-based searching to a traditional music library catalogue server.
Designing interconnected distributed resources for collaborative inquiry based science education.
Has it been already digitized?: how to find information about digitized documents.
Mendeley group as a new source of interdisciplinarity study: how do disciplines interact on mendeley?
DSpace at MIT: meeting the challenges.
Compound descriptors in context: a matching function for classifications and thesauri.
PDFFigures 2.0: Mining Figures from Research Papers.
The ownership and reuse of visual media.
InfoGallery: informative art services for physical library spaces.
Introduction to the Digital Public Library of America API.
Product review summarization from a deeper perspective.
Image-based evaluation of video-acquired research skills.
A Methodology to Evaluate Triple Confidence and Detect Incorrect Triples in Knowledge Bases.
A very efficient approach to news title and content extraction on the web.
Creating trading networks of digital archives.
ClaimID: a system for personal identity management.
Identification of works of manga using LOD resources: an experimental FRBRization of bibliographic data of comic books.
Automatic extraction of core learning goals and generation of pedagogical sequences through a collection of digital library resources.
NLM video search.
Interviews with NSDL grantees on core values and service perspectives.
Building FLOW: federating libraries on the web.
Capturing relevant information for digital curation.
Personal Video Collection Management Behavior.
Mapping the interoperability landscape for networked information retrieval.
Components for constructing open archives.
Managing intellectual property issues in a commons of geographic data.
Evaluating the contributions of video representation for a life oral history collection.
Automated name authority control.
A rich OPAC user interface with AJAX.
Categorization of computing education resources with utilization of crowdsourcing.
Analyzing Tagging Patterns by Integrating Visual Analytics with the Inferential Test.
The ResultsSpace collaborative search environment.
What type of page is this?: genre as web descriptor.
Recommendation based on Deduced Social Networks in an educational digital library.
An approach to named entity extraction from historical documents in traditional mongolian script.
International Workshop on Information Visualization Interfaces for Retrieval and Analysis (IVIRA) at the Joint Conference on Digital Libraries 2003.
Fast Image-based Chinese Calligraphic Character Retrieval on Large Scale Data.
Community-based endogamy as an influence indicator.
On Querying Geospatial and Georeferenced Metadata Resources in G-Portal.
Vector-Borne Disease Network digital library.
Processing and Formatting System for Digital Collections.
Human and machine error analysis on dependency parsing of ancient Greek texts.
Towards a stratified learning approach to predict future citation counts.
Design of Europeana Cloud technical infrastructure.
Educational Tools in Support of the Stanford MediaServer.
The anatomy of a search and mining system for digital humanities.
Rexplore: Unveiling the dynamics of scholarly data.
Representing topics labels for exploring digital libraries.
Understanding Educator Perceptions of "Quality" in Digital Libraries.
EconPort: A Digital Library for Microeconomics Education.
Personalised PageRank for making recommendations in digital cultural heritage collections.
Explorations in Linked Data practice for early music corpora.
The DSpace Institutional Digital Repository System: Current Functionality.
V2V: A Second Variation on Query-by-Humming.
Where should I publish? Detecting journal similarity based on what have been published there.
An Application of Multiple Viewpoints to Content-Based Image Retrieval.
Content-Based Summarization for Personal Image Library.
ICON (Innovation Curriculum Online Network): The National Digital Library for Technological Literacy.
Integrating Digital Libraries into Learning Environments: The LEBONED Approach.
Balancing factors affecting Virtual Reference Services: Identified from academic Librarians' perspective.
PageRank-based Word Sense Induction within Web Search Results Clustering.
Increasing the visibility of library records via consortial search engine.
Distributed Proofreading.
Finding and Using Data in Educational Digital Libraries.
Digital Library Service Integratio.
What is this song about anyway?: Automatic classification of subject using user interpretations and lyrics.
Great War stories told by the people - Crowdsourced cultural heritage in digital museums.
Mood metadata for video games and interactive media.
Ranking experts using author-document-topic graphs.
An iterative reliability measure for semi-anonymous annotators.
Review mining for music digital libraries: phase II.
Exploring a digital library through key ideas.
Print to electronic: measuring the operational and economic implications of an electronic journal collection.
Interacting with and through a digital library collection: commenting behavior in Flickr's the commons.
Representing educational content in digital library resources.
Analytic potential of data: assessing reuse value.
Charting the digital library evaluation domain with a semantically enhanced mining methodology.
Toward information retrieval web services for digital libraries.
Disambiguating authors in academic publications using random forests.
Cumulating and sharing end users knowledge to improve video indexing in a video digital library.
Repository software evaluation using the audit checklist for certification of trusted digital repositories.
TableSeer: automatic table metadata extraction and searching in digital libraries.
From writing and analysis to the repository: taking the scholars' perspective on scholarly archiving.
Technology and values: lessons from central and eastern europe.
Evaluating methods to rediscover missing web pages from the web infrastructure.
The challenge of virginia banks: an evaluation of named entity analysis in a 19th-century newspaper collection.
Digital libraries settling the score: 10 years hence and 10 before.
ArchiveSpark: Efficient Web Archive Access, Extraction and Derivation.
Supporting personal collections across digital libraries in spatial hypertext.
The concept space interchange protocol.
Leveraging Tweet Ranking in an Optimization Frameworkfor Tweet Timeline Generation.
An assessment of access and use rights for licensed scholarly digital resources.
Building Complex Research Collections in Digital Libraries: A Survey of Ontology Implications.
Toward automatic generation of image-text document surrogates to optimize cognition.
Comparison of two approaches to building a vertical search tool: a case study in the nanotechnology domain.
Debugging a Crowdsourced Task with Low Inter-Rater Agreement.
Demonstrating the semantic growbag: automatically creating topic facets for faceteddblp.
A memento web browser for iOS.
Semi automated metadata extraction for preprints archives.
Social bookmarking in digital library systems: framework and case study.
Mobility, digital libraries and a rural indian village.
Design principles for the information architecture of a SMET education digital library.
IFME: information filtering by multiple examples with under-sampling in a digital library environment.
MyPDL: a web-based personal digital library.
Video grammar for locating named people.
Time will Tell: Temporal Linking of News Stories.
Science teachers' use of online resources and the digital library for Earth system education.
xTagger: a new approach to authoring document-centric XML.
Crf-based authors' name tagging for scanned documents.
A link-based visual search engine for Wikipedia.
Architecting an extensible digital repository.
Phrases as subtopical concepts in scholarly text.
NIKE: integrating workflow, digital library, and online catalog systems.
HiBO: a system for automatically organizing bookmarks.
Demystifying the Semantics of Relevant Objects in Scholarly Collections: A Probabilistic Approach.
Building a research library for the history of the web.
Hands-on workshop: build your own digital library collections.
A new video text detection method.
Coagmento 2.0: A System for Capturing Individual and Group Information Seeking Behavior.
Re-ranking bibliographic records for personalized library search.
Is digital preservation an oxymoron?
Social network document ranking.
Evaluating Link-based Recommendations for Wikipedia.
Building a thailand researcher network based on a bibliographic database.
Interactive digital library resource information system: a web portal for digital library education.
An analysis of personal collections among users of social media.
Facilitating access to large digital oral history archives through informedia technologies.
Lifelong Digital Libraries.
Aligning METS with the OAI-ORE data model.
From harvesting to cultivating: transformation of a web collecting system into a robust curation environment.
Usability for digital libraries.
QuASM: a system for question answering using semi-structured data.
Longitudinal study of changes in blogs.
Representing aggregate works in the digital library.
Using Markov models and innovation-diffusion as a tool for predicting digital library access and distribution.
Digital library services for authors of learning materials.
WOSP2015: 4th International Workshop on Mining Scientific Publications.
Mirroring an OAI archive on the I2-DSI channel.
Digital library system: capture, analysis, query, and display 3D data.
A unified platform for archival description and access.
Sharing culture shock through a collection of experiences.
Exploiting potential citation papers in scholarly paper recommendation.
Web video search by mutual boosting between the inside and outside text of video.
AlouetteCanada metadata toolkit.
A metadata geoparsing system for place name recognition and resolution in metadata records.
Task difficulty in information searching behavior: expected difficulty and experienced difficulty.
SpidersRUs: automated development of vertical search engines in different domains and languages.
Managing change on the web.
Reading-in-the-small: a study of reading on small form factor devices.
Exploring discussion lists: steps and directions.
Exploiting time-based synonyms in searching document archives.
A multi-view intelligent editor for digital video libraries.
Alessandro kraus music pamphlet digitization.
Integration of biomedical text and sequence OAI repositories.
Downloading textual hidden web content through keyword queries.
Toward a metadata standard for digitized historical newspapers.
A content-based video browsing system based on visual neighbor similarity.
What does Twitter Measure?: Influence of Diverse User Groups in Altmetrics.
Automatic quality assessment of content created collaboratively by web communities: a case study of wikipedia.
Combination Effects of Word-based and Extended Co-citation Search Algorithms.
5SQual: a quality assessment tool for digital libraries.
Adaptive graphical approach to entity resolution.
BioPortal: a case study in infectious disease informatics.
Applying web analysis in web page filtering.
Similar researcher search in academic environments.
No More 404s: Predicting Referenced Link Rot in Scholarly Articles for Pro-Active Archiving.
Transforming Japanese archives into accessible digital books.
What humanists want: how scholars use source materials.
Also by the same author: AKTiveAuthor, a citation graph approach to name disambiguation.
A social network-aware top-N recommender system using GPU.
Defining what digital curators do and what they need to know: the digccurr project.
Improving multi-faceted book search by incorporating sparse latent semantic analysis of click-through logs.
Distributed web search efficiency by truncating results.
Social network-based recommendation: a graph random walk kernel approach.
Dynamic digital libraries for children.
Combining Classifiers and User Feedback for Disambiguating Author Names.
That's '' not '' '?' or '': a user-driven context-aware approach to erroneous metadata in digital libraries.
The internet public library: an online learning laboratory for digital libraries.
Using digital libraries to build educational communities: the chemcollective.
Learning topics and related passages in books.
Using timed-release cryptography to mitigate the preservation risk of embargo periods.
Checking out: customizing and downloading complex and compound digital library resources.
Machine learning for information architecture in a large governmental website.
Sheer curation for experimental data and provenance.
Tags in domain-specific sites: new information?
A wearable digital library of personal conversations.
Result List Actions in Fiction Search.
Music Information Seeking via Social Q&A: An Analysis of Questions in Music StackExchange Community.
An unsupervised technical difficulty ranking model based on conceptual terrain in the latent space.
Integrating harvesting into digital library content.
An atmospheric visualization collection for the NSDL.
The Alexandria Digital Library and the alexandria digital earth prototype.
Where My Books Go: Choice and Place in Digital Reading.
Unsupervised semantic markup of literature for biodiversity digital libraries.
The University of North Texas libraries' portal to Texas history: archival challenges and solutions.
Modeling heterogeneous data resources for social-ecological research: a data-centric perspective.
Studying the data practices of a scientific community.
Dilight: providing flexible and knowledge rich access to support digital library learning.
Concept chaining utilizing meronyms in text characterization.
Question answering on lecture videos: a multifaceted approach.
Using web information for creating publication venue authority files.
Automatic Methods for Disambiguating Author Names in Bibliographic Data Repositories.
The landscape of information science: 1996-2008.
Negotiating identity in the math forum's online mentoring project.
Subject metadata support powered by Maui.
Many-to-many information connection connections in a distributed digital library portal.
FLUX-CIM: flexible unsupervised extraction of citation metadata.
Deduced social networks for an educational digital library.
In-depth utilization of Chinese ancient maps: a hybrid approach to digitizing map resources in CADAL.
Multi-Emotion Estimation in Narratives from Crowdsourced Annotations.
A Mathematical Information Retrieval System Based on RankBoost.
A mathematical framework for modeling and analyzing migration time.
Reducing computational effort for plagiarism detection by using citation characteristics to limit retrieval space.
SCENS: A System for the Mediated Sharing of Sensitive Data.
The feasibility of investing in manual correction of metadata for a large-scale digital library.
TagTick: A tool for annotation tagging over solr indexes.
Dynamic taxonomy composition via keyqueries.
An Ethnographic Study of Music Information Seeking: Implications for the Design of a Music Digital Library Sally Jo Cunningham.
Protein Association Discovery in Biomedical Literature.
Linking the Thesaurus for the Social Sciences to the Web of Linked Data.
Structural Analysis of Musical Signals for Indexing and Thumbnailing.
Designing a Language for Creating Conceptual Browsing Interfaces for Digital Libraries.
Implementing Digital Preservation Strategy: Developing content collection profiles at the British Library.
Utilizing digital humanities methods for quantifying Howell's State Trials.
Combining domain-specific heuristics for author name disambiguation.
Characterizing scholar popularity: A case study in the Computer Science research community.
Using digital library components for biodiversity systems.
Research networks in data repositories.
Quality assessment of collaborative content with minimal information.
Graded Access to Sensitive Materials at the Archive of the Indigenous Languages of Latin Americ.
Epimenides: An information system offering automated reasoning for the needs of digital preservation.
Improving the visibility of geospatial data on the Web.
LODE: Linking digital humanities content to the web of data.
Utility of an OAI Service Provider Search Portal.
CMedPort: A Cross-Regional Chinese Medical Portal.
Content Access Characterization in Digital Libraries.
Extraction of evolution descriptions from the web.
Bibliographic Attribute Extraction from Erroneous References Based on a Statistical Model.
Not all mementos are created equal: Measuring the impact of missing resources.
The Interactive Shared Educational Environment: User Interface, System Architecture and Field Study.
Extraction and analysis of referenced web links in large-scale scholarly articles.
Automatic Disambiguation of Latin Abbreviations in Early Modern Texts for Humanities Digital Libraries.
Articles, papers, chapters, theses - who wins the visibility wars?
On Cloud deployment of digital preservation environments.
From user needs to opportunities in personal information management: A case study on organisational strategies in cross-media information spaces.
Music Representation in a Digital Music Library.
FLOW: Co-Constructing Low Barrier Repository Infrastructure in Support of Heterogeneous Knowledge Collection(s).
Visualized Related Topics (VRT) system for health information retrieval.
Information behavior of small groups: implications for design of digital libraries.
Web-based citation parsing, correction and augmentation.
A preliminary analysis of FRBR's bibliographic relationships for path based associative rules.
Making Literature Review and Manuscript Writing Tasks Easier for Novice Researchers through Rec4LRW System.
EverLast: a distributed architecture for preserving the web.
Treating data like software: a case for production quality data.
Empirical analysis on chinese academic plagiarism.
Ranking authors in digital libraries.
A public education tool for tsunami disasters based on walking tours in TDL.
Down on the OCR farm: how we produced searchable PDFs for 7 million documents in a student computer lab.
Classification of user interest patterns using a virtual folksonomy.
The open parks network.
SimDL: a model ontology driven digital library for simulation systems.
Learning by building digital libraries.
Helping students with information fragmentation, assimilation and notetaking.
Extending digital repository architectures to support disk image preservation and access.
Browsing affordance designs for the human-centered computing education digital library.
Collection understanding.
A component repository for learning objects: a progress report.
OCLC digital archive demonstration.
A comprehensive comparison study of document clustering for a biomedical digital library MEDLINE.
Evaluating automatic melody segmentation aimed at music information retrieval.
See the world with themexplorer.
A cluster-based simulation of facet-based search.
Multimodal alignment of scholarly documents and their presentations.
Organizational Strategies for Cultural Heritage Preservation.
Building lite-weight EAD repositories.
The relation browser tool for faceted exploratory search.
Using collection descriptions to enhance an aggregation of harvested item-level metadata.
Grading Degradation in an Institutionally Managed Repository.
An initial evaluation of automated organization for digital library browsing.
Remote usability testing: a practice.
Feasibility of developing curriculum standards metadata.
Teaching boxes and web services: optimizing the digital library for earth system education for the classroom.
Standards or semantics for curriculum search?
Evaluating digital libraries with webmetrics.
Developing a digital learning environment: an evaluation of design and implementation processes.
Preparing resource discovery for digitized music: an analysis of an australian application.
Analytical usability evaluation for digital libraries: a case study.
A versatile facsimile and transcription service for manuscripts and rare old books at the Miguel de Cervantes digital library.
Taxonomy Induction and Taxonomy-based Recommendations for Online Courses.
The national SMETE digital library program (panel session).
Creating virtual collections in digital libraries: benefits and implementation issues.
Web2MARC: sharing and using STEM digital content in school libraries.
Building digital library collections with Greenstone.
Novel interface services for bioacoustic digital libraries.
That's news to me: the influence of perceived gratifications and personal experience on news sharing in social media.
Investigating keyphrase indexing with text denoising.
An OAI compliant content-based image search component.
Digital libraries on handhelds for autistic children.
Automatically Generating a Concept Hierarchy with Graphs.
A digital library architecture supporting massive small files and efficient replica maintenance.
Data, data use, and scientific inquiry: two case studies of data practices.
Cost-driven design for archival repositories.
Semantic alerting for digital libraries.
CORE: aggregation use cases for open access.
Collaborative digital library: enhancing digital collections to improve learning in educational programs.
Metadata for phonograph records: facilitating new forms of use and access to analog sound recordings.
Supporting analysis of future-related information in news archives and the web.
Improving navigation interaction in digital documents.
Using Co-authorship Networks for Author Name Disambiguation.
Children's interests and concerns when using the international children's digital library: a four-country case study.
An analysis of the bid behavior of the 2005 JCDL program committee.
Osprey: peer-to-peer enabled content distribution.
Computational linguistics for metadata building.
InPhO: a system for collaboratively populating and extending a dynamic ontology.
Comprehensive personalized information access in an educational digital library.
Toward an understanding of similarity judgments for music digital library evaluation.
FACET: thesaurus retrieval with semantic term expansion.
XML views for electronic editions.
IPKB: a digital library for invertebrate paleontology.
Semantic Bookworm: Mining Literary Resources Revisited.
Bi2SoN: a digital library for supporting biomedical research.
Interfaces for palmtop image search.
Flexible access to photo libraries via time, place, tags, and visual features.
Digital Data Curation Essentials for Data Scientists and Data Curators and Librarians.
The challenges in developing digital collections of phonograph records.
Educational application integration with digital repository.
Plato: a service oriented decision support system for preservation planning.
Bibliometric impact measures leveraging topic analysis.
The RMap Project: Capturing and Preserving Associations amongst Multi-Part Distributed Publications.
The apollo archive explorer.
ICTNET at Temporal Summarization Track TREC 2013.
Language Models for Searching in Web Corpora.
Pitt at TREC 2005: HARD and Enterprise.
HIT_LTRC at TREC 2010 Blog Track: Faceted Blog Distillation.
Patent Retrieval in Chemistry Based on Semantically Tagged Named Entities.
IIT at TREC-8: Improving Baseline Precision.
Information Filtering, Novelty Detection, and Named-Page Finding.
ICTNET at Web Track 2009 Ad-hoc Task.
Spam Filtering Using Character-Level Markov Models: Experiments for the TREC 2005 Spam Track.
Structuring and expanding queries in the probabilistic model.
THUIR at TREC 2009 Web Track: Finding Relevant and Diverse Results for Large Scale Web Search.
Question Answering Using XML-Tagged Documents.
Okapi/Keenbow at TREC-8.
PITT at TREC 2013 Contextual Suggestion Track.
Experiments with Query Expansion at TREC 2006 Legal Track.
Insun05QA on QA Track of TREC 2005.
TREC 2015 paper submission UWM-UO @ 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track: QE by Weighted Keywords using PRF.
Using Bag of Words (BOW) and Standard Deviations to Represent Expected Structures for Document Retrieval: A Way of Thinking that Leads to Method Choices.
ZZISTI at TREC2013 Temporal Summarization Track.
QACTIS-based Question Answering at TREC 2005.
University of Glasgow at TREC 2015: Experiments with Terrier in Contextual Suggestion, Temporal Summarisation and Dynamic Domain Tracks.
Atigeo at TREC 2012 Medical Records Track: ICD-9 Code Description Injection to Enhance Electronic Medical Record Search Accuracy.
Combining Text- and Link-based Retrieval Methods for Web IR.
The Hedge Algorithm for Metasearch at TREC 2007.
Universities of Avignon and Lyon III at TREC 2008: Enterprise Track.
Mercure at TREC 2003 Web track - Topic Distillation Task.
English-German Cross-Language Retrieval for the GIRT Collection - Exploiting a Multilingual Thesaurus.
Pairwise Document Classification for Relevance Feedback.
Overview of the TREC 2013 Crowdsourcing Track.
Using Multiple External Collections for Query Expansion.
Overview of the TREC 2008 Legal Track.
Training Context-Sensitive Neural Networks with Few Relevant Examples for the TREC-9 Routing.
TREC 11 Web and Interactive Tracks at CSIRO.
TREC-10 Experiments at University of Maryland CLIR and Video.
The Bias Problem and Language Models in Adaptive Filtering.
TREC 2007 Blog Track Experiments at Kobe University.
Overview of the TREC 2009 Legal Track.
Using Neural Embeddings for Diagnostic Inferencing in Clinical Question Answering.
BiTeM Group Report for TREC Medical Records Track 2011.
UMass Amherst and UT Austin @ the TREC 2009 Relevance Feedback Track.
Search for Medical Records: NICTA at TREC 2011 Medical Track.
The University of Michigan in Novelty 2004.
Overview of the TREC 2012 Crowdsourcing Track.
ICTNET at Session Track TREC 2011.
THUIR at TREC 2008: Relevance Feedback Track.
NovaSearch at TREC 2014 Microblog Track: Reranking with Wikipedia Page Views.
Video Retrieval with the Informedia Digital Video Library System.
Applying Learning to Rank Techniques to Contextual Suggestions.
Overview of the TREC 2007 Question Answering Track.
Applying Support Vector Machines to the TREC-2001 Batch Filtering and Routing Tasks.
In Enterprise Search: Methods to Identify Argumentative Discussions and to Find Topical Experts.
ICTNET at Web Track 2011 Ad-Hoc Track.
THUIR at TREC 2007: Enterprise Track.
Entity List Completion Using Set Expansion Techniques.
HIT-WI at TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track.
UMD and USC/ISI: TREC 2010 Web Track Experiments with Ivory.
The TREC-2002 Video Track Report.
Answering Multiple Questions on a Topic From Heterogeneous Resources.
Video Classification and Retrieval with the Informedia Digital Video Library System.
CSIR at TREC 2007 Expert Search Task.
DMIR on Microblog Track 2011.
MATRIX at the TREC 2005 Robust Track.
Two selfless contributions to web search evaluation.
UMass at TREC 2006: Enterprise Track.
TREC10 Web and Interactive Tracks at CSIRO.
Important Cognitive Components of Domain-Specific Search Knowledge.
UCD SIFT in the TREC 2010 Web Track.
Overview of TREC 2004.
TREC 11 Experiments at CAS-ICT: Filtering and Web.
University of Waterloo at TREC 2014 Contextual Suggestion: Experiments with suggestion clustering.
Laval University and Lakehead University Experiments at TREC 2015 Contextual Suggestion Track.
QACTIS Enhancements in TREC QA 2006.
Experiments for HARD and Enterprise Tracks.
Overview of the TREC 2004 Robust Track.
Extracting Answers from the Web Using Data Annotation and Knowledge Mining Techniques.
NTU at TREC 2006 Genomics Track.
Bootstrapping Knowledge Base Acceleration.
DIMACS at the TREC 2005 Genomics Track.
Overview of the TREC 2015 LiveQA Track.
U. Albany & USC at the TREC 2012 Session Track.
Part-of-Speech Sense Matrix Model Experiments in the TREC 2004 Robust Track at ICL, PKU.
Question Answering in Webclopedia.
Searching and Filtering Tweets: CSIRO at the TREC 2012 Microblog Track.
BiTeM site Report for TREC Chemistry 2010: Impact of Citations Feeback for Patent Prior Art Search and Chemical Compounds Expansion for Ad Hoc Retrieval.
Keep It Simple Sheffield - A KISS Approach to the Arabic Track.
QCRI at TREC 2014: Applying the KISS principle for the TTG task in the Microblog Track.
Comparing Explicit and Implicit Feedback Techniques for Web Retrieval: TREC-10 Interactive Track Report.
The TREC 2001 Interactive Track Report.
Backstop LLP and Cleary Gottlied Steen & Hamilton LLP at TREC Legal Track 2009.
University of Texas School of Information at TREC 2007.
CIRGIRDISCO at TREC 2013 Microblog Track.
Reducing Redundancy with Anchor Text and Spam Priors.
PKUICST at TREC 2013 Microblog Track.
Reflections on "Aboutness" TREC-9 Evaluation Experiments at Justsystem.
TREC 2003 Genomics Track Experiments at UTA: Query Expansion with Predefinded High Frequency Terms.
CLARIT TREC-8 Experiments in Searching Web Data.
UALR at TREC: Blog Track.
University of Strathclyde at Headline Ranking TREC BLOG 2010.
BUPT_WILDCAT at TREC 2011 Session Track.
TREC 2002 Cross-lingual Retrieval at BBN.
MultiText Legal Experiments at TREC 2007.
Rutgers Filtering Work at TREC 2002: Adaptive and Batch.
MultiText Legal Experiments at TREC 2008.
UMass at TREC ciQA 2006.
IRIT at TREC Microblog 2012: adhoc Task.
PSM: A New Re-Ranking Algorithm for Named-Page.
The University of Illinois' Graduate School of Library and Information Science at TREC 2014.
Cluster-Based Relevance Feedback: Legal Track 2011.
Crowdsourcing for Robustness in Web Search.
University of Glasgow at TREC 2006: Experiments in Terabyte and Enterprise Tracks with Terrier.
Evaluating Stream Filtering for Entity Profile Updates in TREC 2012, 2013, and 2014.
UCM at TREC 2012: Does Negation Influence The Retrieval of Medical Reports?
Experiments on the TREC-8 Filtering Track.
TREC 2007 Genomics Track Overview.
Interactive Okapi at Sheffield - TREC-8.
Patterns of Potential Answer Expressions as Clues to the Right Answers.
BiTeM Group Report for TREC Chemical IR Track 2011.
Domain-Specific Synonym Expansion and Validation for Biomedical Information Retrieval (MultiText Experiments for TREC 2004).
ECIR - A Lightweight Approach for Entity-Centric Information Retrieval.
UIC at TREC 2005: Robust Track.
Experiments with Language Models for Known-Item Finding of E-mail Messages.
Robust Pseudo Feedback Estimation and HMM Passage Extraction: UIUC at TREC 2006 Genomics Track.
Dartmouth College at TREC 2007 Legal Track.
Dublin City University at the TREC 2005 Terabyte Track.
Temporal Multi-Resolution Framework for Shot Boundary Detection and Keyframe Extraction.
University of Twente at the TREC 2008 Enterprise Track: Using the Global Web as an Expertise Evidence Source.
Exploration of Opinion-aware Approach to Contextual Suggestion.
PLIERS at TREC8.
MITRE's Qanda at TREC 14.
PRIS at TREC 2011 Legal Track Discovery Based on Relevant Feedback.
DUTIR at the Session Track in TREC 2011.
Microsoft Research at TREC 2010 Web Track.
Overview of the TREC-2013 Microblog Track.
HIT_LTRC at TREC 2011 Microblog Track.
TREC 2005 Genomics Track at I2R.
The University of Sheffield's TREC 2005 Q&A Experiments.
University of Essex at the TREC 2010 Session Track.
TREC 2003 QA at BBN: Answering Definitional Questions.
University of Alicante Experiments at TREC 2002.
UB at TREC 11: Batch and Adaptive Filtering.
SNUMedinfo at TREC CDS track 2014: Medical case-based retrieval task.
DCU at the TREC 2008 Blog Track.
TREC 2004 Web Track Experiments at CAS-ICT.
Question-Answering Using Semantic Relation Triples.
Juru at TREC 10 - Experiments with Index Pruning.
RMIT at TREC 2010 Blog Track: Faceted Blog Distillation Task.
Northeastern University in the TREC 2009 Web Track.
Exploiting Ontologies for Search Result Diversification.
TREC 2005 Enterprise Track Results from Drexel.
Overview of the TREC 2012 Medical Records Track.
Relevance Feedback by Exploring the Different Feedback Sources and Collection Structure.
Full-texts representation with Medical Subject Headings, and co-citations network rerank- ing strategies for TREC 2014 Clinical Decision Support Track.
University of Glasgow at TREC 2011: Experiments with Terrier in Crowdsourcing, Microblog, and Web Tracks.
Highly Scalable Discriminative Spam Filtering.
Experiments in Novelty Detection at Columbia University.
Overview of the TREC 2011 Session Track.
Initial Results with Structured Queries and Language Models on Half a Terabyte of Text.
Novelty Track at IRIT-SIG.
Using Hierarchical Clustering and Summarisation Approaches for Web Retrieval: Glasgow at the TREC 2002 Interactive Track.
Question/Answer Matching for Yahoo! Answers Using a Corpus-Based Extracted Ngram-based Mapping.
WSU-IR at TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track: Joint Weighting of Explicit and Latent Medical Query Concepts from Diverse Sources.
Dublin City University Experiments in Connectivity Analysis for TREC-9.
A Machine Learning Approach for QA and Novelty Tracks: NTT System Description.
Realtime Ad Hoc Search in Twitter: Know-Center at TREC Microblog Track 2011.
CSIR at TREC 2008 Expert Search Task: Modeling Expert Evidence in Expertise Retrieval.
One Search Engine or Two for Question-Answering.
Overview of TREC 2002.
University of Waterloo at TREC 2008 Blog Track.
Experiment Report of TREC 2005 Genomics Track ad hoc Retrieval Task.
Cohort Sherpherd II: Verifying Cohort Constraints from Hospital Visits.
Filters, Webs and Answers: The University of Iowa TREC-8 Results.
Question Answering: CNLP at the TREC-10 Question Answering Track.
The TREC Spoken Document Retrieval Track: A Success Story.
Using Interactions to Improve Translation Dictionaries: UNC, Yahoo! and ciQA.
CLARIT TREC-8 CLIR Experiments.
Approaches to High Accuracy Retrieval: Phrase-Based Search Experiments in the HARD Track.
A Related Entity based Approach for Knowledge Base Acceleration.
HARD Track Overview in TREC 2003: High Accuracy Retrieval from Documents.
University of Glasgow at TREC 2010: Experiments with Terrier in Blog and Web Tracks.
The University of Amsterdam (ILPS) at TREC 2015 Total Recall Track.
FDUMedSearch at TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track.
Overview of TREC 2003.
BJUT at TREC 2013 Temporal Summarization Track.
Distributed EDLSI, BM25, and Power Norm at TREC 2008.
Cengage Learning at the TREC 2010 Session Track.
IRIT at TREC KBA 2014.
PKUICST at TREC 2012 Microblog Track.
FEUP at TREC 2008 Blog Track: Using Temporal Evidence for Ranking and Feed Distillation.
Learning Domain-Specific Knowledge from Context--THUIR at TREC 2005 Genomics Track.
University of Padua at TREC 2014: Federated Web Search Track.
IRIT at TREC Temporal Summarization 2014.
Northeastern University in TREC 2009 Million Query Track.
DEMIR at TREC Medical 2011: Power of Term Phrases in Medical Text Retrieval.
TongKey at Entity Track TREC 2011: Related Entity Finding.
Video Indexing and Retrieval at UMD.
Incorporating Relevance and Pseudo-relevance Feedback in the Markov Random Field Model.
Formulating Simple Structured Queries Using Temporal and Distributional Cues in Patents.
CWI and TU Delft Notebook TREC 2013: Contextual Suggestion, Federated Web Search, KBA, and Web Tracks.
TREC-9 Cross-lingual Retrieval at BBN.
PRIS at TREC 2012 KBA Track.
Passage Retrieval with Vector Space and Query-Level Aspect Models.
Efficient semantic indexing via neural networks with dynamic supervised feedback.
Structural Term Extraction for Expansion of Template-Based Genomic Queries.
University of Delaware at TREC 2014.
PKUTM at TREC 2010 Blog Track.
TREC 2012 Microblog Track Experiments at Kobe University.
Investigation of Concept-based Proximity Matching - GRIUM@Clinical Decision Support Track 2015 Task 1a.
The Ephyra QA System at TREC 2006.
A Temporally-Enhanced PowerAnswer in TREC 2006.
ICTNET at Web Track 2013.
Entity Came to Rescue - Leveraging Entities to Minimize Risks in Web Search.
Hummingbird's Fulcrum SearchServer at TREC-9.
University of Waterloo at the TREC 2013 Temporal Summarization Track.
CBIA VT at TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track - Exploring Relevance Feedback and Query Expansion in Biomedical Information Retrieval.
Ranking Function Discovery by Genetic Programming for Robust Retrieval.
University of Strathclyde at TREC HARD.
BUPT at TREC 2006: Spam Track.
Combining Methods for the TREC 2003 Robust Track.
SNUMedinfo at TREC Web track 2014.
Spam Filtering Using Inexact String Matching in Explicit Feature Space with On-Line Linear Classifiers.
ISI at the TREC 2013 Federated task.
Revisiting Again Document Length Hypotheses TREC 2004 Genomics Track Experiments at Patolis.
UALR at TREC-ENT 2007.
PRIS at 2012 TREC Medical Track: Query Expansion, Retrieval and Ranking.
University of Pittsburgh at TREC 2014 Microblog Track.
Learning Task Experiments in the TREC 2011 Legal Track.
The PISAB Question Answering System.
TREC 2011 Microblog Track Experiments at Kobe University.
University of Surrey Participation in TREC8: Weirdness Indexing for Logical Document Extrapolation and Retrieval (WILDER).
The Question Answering System QALC at LIMSI, Experiments in Using Web and WordNet.
The Melbourne Team at the TREC 2010 Legal Track.
IRRA at TREC 2012: Divergence From Independence (DFI).
Imago: Open-Source Toolkit for 2D Chemical Structure Image Recognition.
University of Waterloo at TREC 2011: A Social Networking Approach to the Legal Learning Track.
National Taiwan University at Terabyte Track of TREC 2005.
TREC 2010 Web Track Notebook: Term Dependence, Spam Filtering and Quality Bias.
Related Entity Finding: University of Waterloo at TREC 2010 Entity Track.
Mining Specific and General Features in Both Positive and Negative Relevance Feedback.
Question Answering: CNLP at the TREC-9 Question Answering Track.
Filters and Answers: The University of Iowa TREC-9 Results.
Translation Term Weighting and Combining Translation Resources in Cross-Language Retrieval.
CRL's TREC-8 Systems Cross-Lingual IR, and Q&A.
CIIR Experiments for TREC Legal 2007.
PRIS at TREC 2011 Entity Track: Related Entity Finding and Entity List Completion.
QuALiM at TREC 2005: Web-Question Answering with FrameNet.
Siena's Twitter Information Retrieval System: The 2012 Microblog Track.
Overview of the TREC 2006 Enterprise Track.
Enterprise Search: Identifying Relevant Sentences and Using Them for Query Expansion.
University of Waterloo at TREC 2015 Microblog Track.
Question Answering: CNLP at the TREC 2002 Question Answering Track.
Finding "Abstract Fields" of Web Pages and Query Specific Retrieval - THUIR at TREC 2004 Web Track.
A User-in-the-Loop Process for Investigational Search: Foreseer in TREC 2013 Microblog Track.
University of Glasgow (UGLA-D) at TREC Microblog 2011: Temporal Pseudo-Relevance Feedback in Microblog Retrieval.
Boosting Venue Page Rankings for Contextual Retrieval-Georgetown at TREC 2013 Contextual Suggestion Track.
The University of Illinois' Graduate School of Library and Information Science at TREC 2012.
Concept-Centric Indexing and Retrieval on Medical Text.
GeAnn at the TREC 2011 Crowdsourcing Track.
TREC 2013 Microblog Track Experiments at Kobe University.
The Information Extraction Systems of PRIS at Temporal Summarization Track.
Optical Structure Recognition Application Entry in Image2Structure Task.
Opinions in Federated Search: University of Lugano at TREC 2014 Federated Web Search Track.
Task-Specific Query Expansion (MultiText Experiments for TREC 2003).
Factoid Question Answering over Unstructured and Structured Web Content.
Towards a Simple and Efficient Web Search Framework.
Example Based Text Matching Methodology for Routing Tasks.
University of Lugano at TREC 2009 Blog Track.
Seven Hypothesis about Spam Filtering.
Lazy Users and Automatic Video Retrieval Tools in (the) Lowlands.
Queensland University of Technology at TREC 2005.
Rutgers' TREC 2001 Interactive Track Experience.
TREC 2005 Enterprise Track Experiments at BUPT.
Pitt at TREC 2006: Identifying Experts via Email Discussions.
TREC 2004 Genomics Track Overview.
Overview of the TREC 2011 Legal Track.
UIC at TREC 2010 Faceted Blog Distillation.
Novel Approaches in Text Information Retrieval - Experiments in the Web Track of TREC 2004.
OSBF-Lua - A Text Classification Module for Lua: The Importance of the Training Method.
LSIS at TREC 2012 Medical Track - Experiments With Conceptualization, a DFR Model and a Semantic Measure.
A Hybrid Method for Opinion finding Task (KUNLP at TREC 2008 Blog Track).
The Integration of Lexical Knowledge and External Resources for Question Answering.
Challenges of Multi-Mode IR Software.
University of Twente at the TREC 2007 Enterprise Track: Modeling Relevance Propagation for the Expert Search Task.
Combining Resources to Find Answers to Biomedical Questions.
More Reflections on "Aboutness" TREC-2001 Evaluation Experiments at Justsystem.
Arabic Information Retrieval at UMass in TREC-10.
Fujitsu Laboratories TREC2001 Report.
Similarity Computation in Novelty Detection and Biomedical Text Categorization.
From TREC to DUC to TREC Again.
NTU at TREC 2007 Blog Track.
Applying Probabilistic Thematic Clustering for Classification in the TREC 2005 Genomics Track.
York University at TREC 2012: Medical Records Track.
WaterlooClarke: TREC 2015 Microblog Track.
University of Lugano at the TREC 2013 Contextual Suggestion Track.
York University at TREC 2006: Legal Track.
PRIS at 2012 Microblog Track.
PRIS at TREC 2012 Contextual Suggestion Track.
Topic Distillation with Knowledge Agents.
Fondazione Ugo Bordoni at TREC 2003: Robust and Web Track.
TNO and RUN at the TREC 2012 Contextual Suggestion Track: Recommending Personalized Touristic Sights Using Google Places.
The University of Iowa at TREC 2011: Microblogs, Medical Records and Crowdsourcing.
Exploring Document Content with XML to Answer Questions.
Web Based Pattern Mining and Matching Approach to Question Answering.
UM-D at TREC 2005: Genomics Track.
ECNU at 2015 CDS Track: Two Re-ranking Methods in Medical Information Retrieval.
Combining Linguistic Processing and Web Mining for Question Answering: ITC-irst at TREC 2004.
Bangor at TREC 2003: Q&A and Genomics Tracks.
York University at TREC 2007: Enterprise Document Search.
QCRI at TREC 2013 Microblog Track.
IIT at TREC-10.
Reconstruct Logical Hierarchical Sitemap for Related Entity Finding.
NLM at TREC 2012 Medical Records Track.
Biomedical Text Retrieval System at Korea University.
Language Modeling Approaches to Blog Postand Feed Finding.
Evaluating Learning-to-Rank Methods in the Web Track Adhoc Task.
Modeling Concept and Context to Improve Performance in eDiscovery.
Overview of the TREC 2014 Session Track.
Exploring the Query Expansion Methods for Concept Based Representation.
The HAIRCUT System at TREC-9.
THUIR at TREC 2008: Enterprise Track.
University of Washington (UW) at Legal TREC Interactive 2007.
TREC 2007 ciQA Task: University of Maryland.
Trec Novelty Track At IRIT-SIG.
The Alyssa System at TREC 2006: A Statistically-Inspired Question Answering System.
Question Answering Experiments and Resources.
USC/ISI at TREC 2011: Microblog Track.
Finding Relevant Passages in Scientific Articles: Fusion of Automatic Approaches vs. an Interactive Team Effort.
Enhance Genomic IR with Term Variation and Expansion: Experience of the IASL Group at Genomic Track 2005.
Some Similarity Computation Methods in Novelty Detection.
Experiments in TREC 2004 Novelty Track at CAS-ICT.
Evaluating the Effectiveness of Axiomatic Approaches in Web Track.
Question Answering Using the DLT System at TREC 2005.
Microsoft Research at TREC 2009: Web and Relevance Feedback Track.
TREC 2002 Web, Novelty and Filtering Track Experiments using PIRCS.
Solving the Enterprise TREC Task with Probabilistic Data Models.
The Siena College Medical Information Retrieval System (MIRS).
Combining Candidate and Document Models for Expert Search.
Overview of the TREC 2004 Web Track.
Question Answering Using a Large NLP System.
Heliod at TREC Legal 2011: Learning to Rank from Relevance Feedback for e-Discovery.
Author Model and Negative Feedback Methods on TREC 2011 Microblog Track.
ICTNET at Web Track 2012 adhoc Task.
York University at TREC 2005: SPAM Track.
Indri at TREC 2007: Million Query (1MQ) Track.
Sparse Matrix Factorization: Applications to Latent Semantic Indexing.
Concept Detection and Using Concept in adhoc of Microblog Search.
UCAS at TREC-2013 Microblog Track.
University of Glasgow at TREC 2009: Experiments with Terrier.
University of Waterloo: Logistic Regression and Reciprocal Rank Fusion at the Microblog Track.
The YorkQA Prototype Question Answering System.
DUTIR at TREC 2009: Chemical IR Track.
Contextual Information and Assessor Characteristics in Complex Question Answering.
TREC 2007 ciQA Track at RMIT and CSIRO.
AUEB at TREC 2015: Clinical Decision Support Track.
Melboune at the TREC 2011 Legal Track.
LIA at TREC 2012 Web Track: Unsupervised Search Concepts Identification from General Sources of Information.
The Use of External Knowledge of Factoid QA.
Exploration of Semantic-aware Approach for Contextual Suggestion Using Knowledge from The Open Web.
Finding, Weighting and Describing Venues: CSIRO at the 2012 TREC Contextual Suggestion Track.
DCU@TRECMed 2012: Using adhoc Baselines for Domain-Specific Retrieval.
The TREC 2006 Terabyte Track.
SeqCluSum: Combining Sequential Clustering and Contextual Importance Measuring to Summarize Developing Events over Time.
University of Lugano at TREC 2010.
DataparkSearch at TREC 2005.
Microblog Retrieval Using Topical Features and Query Expansion.
FEUP at TREC 2009 Blog Track: Temporal Evidence in the Faceted Blog Distillation Task.
TUW at the First Total Recall Track.
BJUT at TREC 2014 Microblog Track.
TREC12 Web and Interactive Tracks at CSIRO.
Overview of the TREC 2004 Terabyte Track.
Report on the TREC-9 Experiment: Link-based Retrieval and Distributed Collections.
HU DB at TREC 2014 Microblog Track.
TREC 2005 Genomics Track Experiments at DUTAI.
SAWUS Siena's Automatic Wikipedia Update System.
THUIR at TREC 2005 Terabyte Track.
The LIMSI SDR System for TREC-9.
York University at TREC 2005: HARD Track.
Opinion Retrieval Experiments Using Generative Models: Experiments for the TREC 2007 Blog Track.
University of Glasgow at Medical Records Track: Experiments with Terrier.
TUW @ TREC Clinical Decision Support Track.
The Hong Kong Polytechnic University at the TREC 2004 Robust Track.
Identifying Gene Function Descriptions by Probability-based Sentence Selection.
Auto-Relevancy Baseline: A Hybrid System Without Human Feedback.
FDU at TREC 2002: Filtering, Q&A, Web and Video Tasks.
DalTREC 2005 Spam Track: Spam Filtering Using N-gram-based Techniques.
Semantic Feature Extraction using Mpeg Macro-block Classification.
The TREC-2001 Cross-Language Information Retrieval Track: Searching Arabic Using English, French or Arabic Queries.
TREC 2002 QA at BBN: Answer Selection and Confidence Estimation.
BioText Team Report for the TREC 2003 Genomics Track.
THUIR at TREC 2008: Blog Track.
The JHU/APL HAIRCUT System at TREC-8.
Evolving XML and Dictionary Strategies for Question Answering and Novelty Tasks.
Webis at TREC 2013-Session and Web Track.
Experiments with the Negotiated Boolean Queries of the TREC 2009 Legal Track.
POSTECH at TREC 2009 Blog Track: Top Stories Identification.
Bi-directional Linkability From Wikipedia to Documents and Back Again: UMass at TREC 2012 Knowledge Base Acceleration Track.
ISCASIR at TREC 2015 Temporal Summarization Track.
Mining Specific and General Features in Both Positive and Negative Relevance Feedback: QUT E-Discovery Lab at the TREC 2010 Relevance Feedback Track.
Lymba's PowerAnswer 4 in TREC 2007.
Improving Passage Retrieval Using Interactive Elicition and Statistical Modeling.
LIA-iSmart at the TREC 2011 Entity Track: Entity List Completion Using Contextual Unsupervised Scores for Candidate Entities Ranking.
Differential Linguistics at NIST TREC.
DUTIR at TREC 2008 Blog Track.
Experience of Using SVM for the Triage Task in TREC 2004 Genomics Track.
Using Anchor Text, Spam Filtering and Wikipedia for Web Search and Entity Ranking.
Using Subjective Adjectives in Opinion Retrieval from Blogs.
Query Expansion Seen Through Return Order of Relevant Documents.
A Conceptual Indexing Approach for the TREC Robust Task.
Concordia University at the TREC 15 QA Track.
A Hybrid Approach for QA Track Definitional Questions.
Highly Efficient eDiscovery Using Adaptive Search Criteria and Successive Tagging.
Document and Query Expansion Models for Blog Distillation.
Question Answering with QACTIS at TREC 2004.
Crowdsourcing with a Crowd of One and Other TREC 2011 Crowdsourcing and Web Track Experiments.
Access to Legal Documents: Exact Match, Best Match, and Combinations.
LIA at TREC 2011 Web Track: Experiments on the Combination of Online Resources.
Using Stream Features for Instant Document Filtering.
Extending Relevance Model for Relevance Feedback.
FEUP at TREC 2010 Blog Track: Using h-index for blog ranking.
Mining Knowledge from Repeated Co-Occurrences: DIOGENE at TREC 2002.
Experiments at the University of Edinburgh for the TREC 2006 QA Track.
TREC 2004 Genomics Track Experiments at IUB.
ICTNET at Context Suggestion Track TREC 2013.
Million Query Track 2009 Overview.
The Hedge Algorithm for Metasearch at TREC 2006.
ISI Novelty Track System for TREC 2004.
Ad hoc, Cross-language and Spoken Document Information Retrieval at IBM.
InsunQA06 on QA Track of TREC 2006.
A Pattern Matching Approach to Streaming Slot Filling.
Overview of TREC 2005.
Retrieval of Biomedical Documents by Prioritizing Key Phrases.
Question Answering Approach Using a WordNet-based Answer Type Taxonomy.
SCU at TREC 2014 Knowledge Base Acceleration Track.
K2U at TREC 2014 KBA Track.
Expanding Queries Using Stems and Symbols.
The QMUL Team with Probabilistic SQL at Enterprise Track.
The THISL SDR System At TREC-8.
TREC-10 Web Track Experiments at MSRA.
PITT at TREC 2011 Session Track.
Using Exploration and Learning for Medical Records Search: An Experiment in Identifying Cohorts for Comparative Effectiveness Research.
LexiClone Inc. and NIST TREC.
Information Space Based on HTML Structure.
HIT at TREC 2012 Microblog Track.
WIDIT in TREC-2003 Web Track.
PRIS at TREC 2011 Microblog Track.
The HLTCOE Approach to the TREC 2012 KBA Track.
The Open University at TREC 2006 Enterprise Track Expert Search Task.
The University Carlos III of Madrid at TREC 2011 Crowdsourcing Track.
On Retrieving Legal Files: Shortening Documents and Weeding Out Garbage.
WaterlooClarke: TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track.
Incorporating Temporal Information in Microblog Retrieval.
University of Delaware at Diverstiy Task of Web Track 2010.
Towards a Sense Based Document Representation for Internet Information Retrieval.
Classifying Biomedical Articles by Making Localized Decisions.
Where to Stop Reading a Ranked List?
University of Lugano at TREC 2011 Microblog Track.
The Technion at TREC 2013 Web Track: Cluster-based Document Retrieval.
Overview of the TREC 2011 Chemical IR Track.
Overview of the TREC 2007 Blog Track.
Searching for geneRIFs: Concept-Based Query Expansion and Bayes Classification.
A Sys Called Qanda.
Correlating Topic Rankings and Person Rankings to Find Experts.
Overview of the TREC 2011 Web Track.
NudtMDP at TREC 2015 LiveQA Track.
Enterprise, QA, Robust and Terabyte Experiments with Hummingbird SearchServer at TREC 2005.
HARD Track Overview in TREC 2005 High Accuracy Retrieval from Documents.
IRIT at TREC 2014 Contextual Suggestion Track.
UCSC on REC 2006 Blog Opinion Mining.
UCD IIRG at TREC 2011 Medical Track.
Webis at the TREC 2011 Session Track.
UCSC at Relevance Feedback Track.
Testing an Entity Ranking Function for English Factoid QA.
Multilingual Question/Answering: the DIOGENE System.
Question Answering using the DLT System at TREC 2003.
Conceptual Language Models for Context-Aware Text Retrieval.
IBM Research and the University of Colorado - TREC 2003 Genomics Track.
Fasikom UI at TREC 2011 Entity List Completion Task.
External Query Expansion in the Blogosphere.
WHU at TREC Total Recall Track 2015.
Indri TREC Notebook 2006: Lessons Learned From Three Terabyte Tracks.
WIDIT in TREC 2004 Genomics, Hard, Robust and Web Tracks.
Rutgers' HARD and Web Interactive Track Experiments at TREC 2003.
University of Twente @ TREC 2009: Indexing Half a Million Web Pages.
Fuzzy Term Proximity With Boolean Queries at 2006 TREC Terabyte Task.
The Weaver System for Document Retrieval.
Fusion of Knowledge-Intensive and Statistical Approaches for Retrieving and Annotating Textual Genomics Documents.
MapReduce for Experimental Search.
Identifying Patients for Clinical Studies from Electronic Health Records: TREC 2012 Medical Records Track at OHSU.
TREC 14 Enterprise Track at CSIRO and ANU.
Aggressive Morphology and Lexical Relations for Query Expansion.
English-Chinese Cross-Language IR Using Bilingual Dictionaries.
UIC at TREC 208 Blog Track.
Novelty, Question Answering and Genomics: The University of Iowa Response.
ICTNET at Session Track TREC 2012.
Research on Expert Search at Enterprise Track of TREC 2006.
CLIP at TREC 2015: Microblog and LiveQA.
Overcoming Vocabulary Limitations in Twitter Microblogs.
ICTNET at Temporal Summarization Track TREC 2014.
Document Structure with IR Tools.
TREC 2004 HARD Track Experiments in Clustering.
DalTREC 2006 QA System Jellyfish: Regular Expressions Mark-and-Match Approach to Question Answering.
TREC 2014 Temporal Summarization Track Overview.
DUTIR at TREC 2008 Relevance Feedback Track.
UGent Participation in the Microblog Track 2012.
Evaluation of a Methodology for Modeling Term Relationship through Geometry: Experiments at TREC 2010 Relevance Feedback Track.
Feed Distillation Using AdaBoost and Topic Maps.
TREC 2003 Question Answering Track at CAS-ICT.
Query Expansion for Microblog Retrieval: 2013.
Incremental Retrieval of Documents Relevant to a Topic.
University of Ottawa at TREC 2010 Web Track: Ranking Web Documents Using Meta-Data.
AT&T at TREC-8.
WaterlooClarke: TREC 2015 LiveQA Track.
Questioning Answering By Pattern Matching, Web-Proofing, Semantic Form Proofing.
Query Expansion and Message-Passing Algorithms for TREC Microblog Track.
Concept Recognition and the TREC Genomics Tasks.
Social Network Structure Behind the Mailing Lists: ICT-IIIS at TREC 2006 Expert Finding Track.
CMU OAQA at TREC 2015 LiveQA: Discovering the Right Answer with Clues.
TREC 2005 Robust Track Experiments Using PIRCS.
Multiple Ranking Strategies for Opinion Retrieval in Blogs - The University of Amsterdam at the 2006 TREC Blog Track.
Reconstructing DIOGENE: ITC-irst at TREC 2006.
Phrases, Boosting, and Query Expansion Using External Knowledge Resources for Genomic Information Retrieval.
Further Analysis of Whether Batch and User Evaluations Give the Same Results with a Question-Answering Task.
TREC 11 Experiments at NII: The Effects of Virtual Relevant Documents in Batch Filtering.
MITRE's Qanda at TREC-12.
Question Answering Using the DLT System at TREC 2006.
MSR-Asia at TREC-10 Video Track: Shot Boundary Detection Task.
SIRA: TREC Session Track 2014.
Thresholding Strategies for Text Classifiers: TREC 2005 Biomedical Triage Task Experiments.
JHU/APL at TREC 2005: QA Retrieval and Robust Tracks.
Partioning a Graph of Sequences, Structures and Abstracts for Information Retrieval.
Chemical Structure Reconstruction with chemoCR.
TREC Microblog 2012 Track: Real-Time Ranking Algorithm for Microblog Ranking Systems.
Simple May Be Best - A Simple and Effective Method for Federated Web Search via Search Engine Impact Factor Estimation.
A Nearest Neighbor Approach to Contextual Suggestion.
Deep Context with a Sense-of-Self.
UCAS at TREC-2014 Microblog Track.
The Role and Meaning of Predicative and Non-Predicative Definitions in the Search for Information.
University of Glasgow at TREC 2004: Experiments in Web, Robust, and Terabyte Tracks with Terrier.
University of Lethbridge's Participation in TREC 2004 QA Track.
Augmenting and Limiting Search Queries.
PARADISE Based Search Engine at TREC 2009 Web Track.
NUSIS at TREC 2011 Microblog Track: Refining Query Results with Hashtags.
Webis at the TREC 2012 Session Track.
Meiji University HARD and Robust Track Experiments.
Synonym-Based Expansion and Boosting-Based Re-Ranking: A Two-phase Approach for Genomic Information Retrieval.
TREC 2015 Temporal Summarization Track Overview.
A Maximum Likelihood Ratio Information Retrieval Model.
Yandex at TREC 2011 Microblog Track.
Laval University and Lakehead University at TREC Dynamic Domain 2015: Combination of Techniques for Subtopics Coverage.
Question Answering with Lydia (TREC 2005 QA Track).
IR-Specific Searches at TREC 2007: Genomics & Blog Experiments.
Skierarchy: Extending the Power of Crowdsourcing Using a Hierarchy of Domain Experts, Crowd and Machine Learning.
DUTH at TREC 2013 Contextual Suggestion Track.
Microsoft Cambridge at TREC 2002: Filtering Track.
NLPR at TREC 2004: Robust Experiments.
Index Pruning and Result Reranking: Effects on Ad-Hoc Retrieval and Named Page Finding.
Evaluating a Novel Kind of Retrieval Models Based on Relevance Decision Making in a Relevance Feedback Environment.
Distributed Non-Parametric Representations for Vital Filtering: UW at TREC KBA 2014.
Northeastern University Runs at the TREC13 Crowdsourcing Track.
Overview of the TREC 2014 Contextual Suggestion Track.
Exploiting SNOMED CT Concepts & Relationships for Clinical Information Retrieval: Australian e-Health Research Centre and Queensland University of Technology at the TREC 2012 Medical Track.
Retrieving Medical Records with "sennamed": NEC Labs America at TREC 2012 Medical Record Track.
York University at TREC 2006: Genomics Track.
Experiments on Related Entity Finding Track at TREC 2009.
A Study of Pattern-Based Suptopic Discovery and Integration in the Web Track.
PRIS at TREC 2013 Microblog Track.
NLPR in TREC 2007 Blog Track.
IT-Discovery at TREC 2010 Legal.
Microblog Track 2011 of FDU.
BJUT at TREC 2014 Temporal Summarization Track.
Approaches to Robust and Web Retrieval.
Retrieval and Feedback Models for Blog Distillation.
TREC-8 Experiments at SUNY Buffalo.
Passage Scoring for Question Answering via Bayesian Inference on Lexical Relations.
WIDIT in TREC 2006 Blog Track.
Novel Results and Some Answers - The University of Iowa TREC 11 Results.
Lucene and Juru at TREC 2007: 1-Million Queries Track.
CRM114 versus Mr. X: CRM114 Notes for the TREC 2005 Spam Track.
Lucene for n-grams using the CLUEWeb Collection.
UMass at TREC 2008 Blog Distillation Task.
HLTCOE at TREC 2013: Temporal Summarization.
Using Clustering and Blade Clusters in the Terabyte Task.
Delft University at the TREC 2009 Entity Track: Ranking Wikipedia Entities.
Finiding Gene Function using LitMiner.
Ranking Biomedical Passages for Relevance and Diversity: University of Wisconsin, Madison at TREC Genomics 2006.
A Comparison of Techniques for Classification and Ad Hoc Retrieval of Biomedical Documents.
BJUT at TREC 2014 Contextual Suggestion Track: Hybrid Recommendation Based on Open-web Information.
Estimating Semantic Similarity between Expanded Query and Tweet Content for Microblog Retrieval.
York University at TREC 2005: Genomics Track.
Report on the TREC 2003 Experiment: Genomic and Web Searches.
Machine Learning Approach for Homepage Finding Task.
Experiments in Terabyte Searching, Genomic Retrieval and Novelty Detection for TREC 2004.
Michigan State University at the 2007 TREC ciQA Task.
Fondazione Ugo Bordoni at TREC 2004.
Contextual Suggestion from Wikitravel: Exploiting Community-Based Suggestions.
WIM at TREC 2007.
Tequesta: The University of Amsterdam's Textual Question Answering System.
TREC Genomics Track at UIC.
Employing Two Question Answering Systems in TREC 2005.
The TREC 2005 Terabyte Track.
PKUICST at TREC 2015 Microblog Track: Query-biased Adaptive Filtering in Real-time Microblog Stream.
Experiments with the Negotiated Boolean Queries of the TREC 2006 Legal Discovery Track.
TREC 2006 Genomics Track Overview.
RUC at TREC 2014: Select Resources Using Topic Models.
BJUT at TREC 2013 Microblog Track.
Question Answering with SEMEX at TREC 2005.
Vocabulary-Driven Passage Retrieval for Question-Answering in Genomics.
TREC12 HARD Track at ISCAS.
Concept Based Tie-breaking and Maximal Marginal Relevance Retrieval in Microblog Retrieval.
IO-Top-k at TREC 2006: Terabyte Track.
Interactive Retrieval Using Weights.
BUPT at TREC 2006: Enterprise Track.
TREC 2007 Spam Track Overview.
DLDE at web track: ad-hoc task.
Pliers at Trec 2002.
Indian Statistical Institute, Kolkata at TREC 2010: Legal Interactive.
IRIT at TREC Temporal Summarization 2015.
CBNU at TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track.
Topical Diversity and Relevance Feedback.
Dublin City University Video Track Experiments for TREC 2002.
NLPR at TREC 2003: Novelty and Robust.
EQUIVIO at TREC 2009 Legal Interactive.
TREC 2013 Temporal Summarization.
QU at TREC-2013: Expansion Experiments for Microblog Ad hoc Search.
Meiji University Web and Novelty Track Experiments at TREC 2003.
Identifying Relevant Full-Text Articles for GO Annotation Without MeSH Terms.
UTDallas at TREC 2008 Blog Track.
Machine Learning for Information Retrieval: TREC 2009 Web, Relevance Feedback and Legal Tracks.
CLARIT Experiments in Batch Filtering: Term Selection and Threshold Optimization in IR and SVM Filters.
ADAPT.DCU at TREC LiveQA: A Sentence Retrieval based Approach to Live Question Answering.
LexiClone Lexical Cloning Systems.
Result Diversity and Entity Ranking Experiments: Anchors, Links, Text and Wikipedia.
Task Descriptions: Web Track 2003.
Overview of the TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track.
Microsoft Research Asia at the Web Track of TREC 2009.
TREC 2006 at Maryland: Blog, Enterprise, Legal and QA Tracks.
Related Entity Finding Based on Co-Occurance.
Window-based Enterprise Expert Search.
Fusing manual and machine feedback in biomedical domain.
The TREC 2002 Filtering Track Report.
Query Expansion for Microblog Retrieval.
I2R at TREC 2006 Genomics Track.
Building on Redundancy: Factoid Question Answering, Robust Retrieval and the "Other".
The University College London at TREC 2008 Enterprise Track.
TREC 2001 Cross-lingual Retrieval at BBN.
Query-expansion Approaches for Microblog Retrieval.
Language Modeling Approaches for Enterprise Tasks.
CIRGIRDISCO at TREC 2013 Contextual Suggestion Track: Using the Wikipedia Graph Structure for Item-to-Item Recommendation.
Latent Semantic Indexing with selective Query Expansion.
TREC 2009 at the University of Buffalo: Interactive Legal E-Discovery With Enron Emails.
RMIT University at TREC 2005: Terabyte and Robust Track.
York University at TREC 2008: Blog Track.
Hummingbird SearchServer at TREC 2001.
Using Profile Matching and Text Categorization for Answer Extraction in TREC Genomics.
TREC-8 Ad-Hoc, Query and Filtering Track Experiments using PIRCS.
A Language Modeling Approach to Passage Question Answering.
Collection and Document Langauge Models for Resrouce Selection.
FDU at TREC-9: CLIR, Filtering and QA Tasks.
FDUQA on TREC 2007 QA Track.
Experiments in Novelty, Genes and Questions at the University of Iowa.
TUW @ TREC Clinical Decision Support Track 2015.
Using IR-n for Information Retrieval of Genomics Track.
Towards a Multi-Stream Question Answering-As-XML-Retrieval Strategy.
Learning to Combine Collection-centric and Document-centric Models for Resource Selection.
The Lowlands' TREC Experiments 2005.
Team COMMIT at TREC 2011.
A Simple Context Dependent Suggestion System.
Report on the TREC-8 Experiment: Searching on the Web and in Distributed Collections.
York University at TREC 2009: Relevance Feedback Track.
DUTIR at TREC 2011 Chemistry Track.
SiteQ: Engineering High Performance QA System Using Lexico-Semantic Pattern Matching and Shallow NLP.
University of Glasgow at TREC 2012: Experiments with Terrier in Medical Records, Microblog, and Web Tracks.
Bangor at TREC 2004: Question Answering Track.
CLIPS at TREC 11: Experiments in Filtering.
Two-Step Feature Selection and Neural Network Classification for the TREC-8 Routing.
LIMSI @ 2014 Clinical Decision Support Track.
Judging Expertise--WIM at Enterprise.
Team Association Analysis for Named Entity Filtering.
Peking University at the TREC 2005 Question and Answering Track.
Weighted PageRank: Cluster-Related Weights.
The University of Illinois' Graduate School of Library and Information Science at TREC 2013.
University of Glasgow (UoG_TwTeam) at TREC Microblog 2013.
Automatic Shot Boundary Detection and Classification of Indoor and Outdoor Scenes.
Rutgers at the TREC 2011 Session Track.
UIC at TREC 2007 Blog Track.
AnswerFinder at TREC 2005.
Question Answering Using the DLT System at TREC 2002.
IIT TREC 2005: Genomics Track.
Building an Arabic Stemmer for Information Retrieval.
Building an Entity-Centric Stream Filtering Test Collection for TREC 2012.
Distributed Multisearch and Resource Selection for the TREC Million Query Track.
The LIMSI SDR System for TREC-8.
Overview of the TREC-2002 Web Track.
ICTNET at Microblog Track TREC 2011.
A Study of Term Proximity and Document Weighting Normalization in Pseudo Relevance Feedback--UIUC at TREC 2009 Million Query Track.
Overview of the TREC 2002 Question Answering Track.
University of Lethbridge's Participation in TREC 2007 QA Track.
Columbia University in the Novelty Track at TREC 2004.
The Splog Detection Task and A Solution Based on Temporal and Link Properties.
THUIR at TREC 2004: Genomics Track.
DUTIR at TREC 2006: Genomics and Enterprise Tracks.
The University of Washington's UWclmaQA System.
CLIR Experiments at Maryland for TREC 2002: Evidence Combination for Arabic-English Retrieval.
CLIR using a Probabilistic Translation Model based on Web Documents.
Twease at TREC 2006: Breaking and Fixing BM25 Scoring With Query Expansion, A Biologically Inspired Double Mutant Recovery Experiment.
Pitt@TREC08: An Initial Study of Collaborative Information Behavior in E-Discovery.
UDEL/SMU at TREC 2009 Entity Track.
Overview of the TREC 2012 Web Track.
Syntactic Clues and Lexical Resources in Question-Answering.
Overview of the TREC 2009 Web Track.
Question Answering with QED at TREC 2005.
Re-ranking via User Feedback: Georgetown University at TREC 2015 DD Track.
Spoken Document Retrieval for TREC-8 at Cambridge University.
UWM-HBUT at TREC 2014 Microblog Track: Using Query Expansion (QE) and Event Identification Algorithm (EIA) to improve microblog retrieval effectiveness.
Experiments in Questions and Relationships at the University of Iowa.
The University of Sheffield TREC 2002 Q&A System.
DIMACS at the TREC 2004 Genomics Track.
UCD SIFT in the TREC 2011 Web Track.
Using Wikipedia at the TREC QA Track.
Minimal Test Collections for Relevance Feedback.
ICTNET at Web Track 2012 Diversity Task.
ICTNET at Web Track 2010 Spam Task.
York University at TREC 2013: Contextual Suggestion Track.
DutchHatTrick: Semantic Query Modeling, ConText, Section Detection, and Match Score Maximization.
UAlbany's ILQUA at TREC 2007.
UNT 2005 TREC QA Participation: Using Lemur as IR Search Engine.
TREC-9 Cross Language, Web and Question-Answering Track Experiments using PIRCS.
EMSE at TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track.
UMass at TREC 2004: Novelty and HARD.
Entity-based Stochastic Analysis of Search Results for Query Expansion and Results Re-Ranking.
Research on Enterprise Track of TREC 2007.
The Robert Gordon University at the Opinion Retrieval Task of the 2007 TREC Blog Track.
Juru at TREC 2004: Experiments with Prediction of Query Difficulty.
Query Transformations for Result Merging.
CNIPA, FUB and University of Rome "Tor Vergata" at TREC 2008 Legal Track.
Query-Structure Based Web Page Indexing.
Overview of the TREC 2012 Contextual Suggestion Track.
Melbourne Language Group Microblog Track Report.
University of Glasgow at TREC 2007: Experiments in Blog and Enterprise Tracks with Terrier.
JHU/APL at TREC 2004: Robust and Terabyte Tracks.
Using Hybrid Methods for Relevance Assessment in TREC Crowd '12.
ICTNET at Web Track 2009 Diversity Track.
Semantic Extensions of the Ephyra QA System for TREC 2007.
Exploiting Social #-Tagging Behavior in Twitter for Information Filtering and Recommendation.
MonetDB/X100 at the 2006 TREC Terabyte Track.
Overview of the TREC 2006 Question Answering Track 99.
BIT and Purdue at TREC-KBA-CCR Track 2014.
Use of Time-Aware Language Model in Entity Driven Filtering System.
THUIR at TREC 2005: Enterprise Track.
TREC 2005 Spam Track Overview.
Modelling Psychological Needs for User-dependent Contextual Suggestion.
The Eurospider Retrieval System and the TREC-8 Cross-Language Track.
Collection Selection Based on Historical Performance for Efficient Processing.
LSIS/LIA at TREC 2012 Knowledge Base Acceleration.
The Information Extraction systems of BUPT_PRIS at TREC2014 Temporal Summarization Track.
Question Answering with LCC's CHAUCER at TREC 2006.
Centrality based Document Ranking.
Drexel at TREC 2014 Federated Web Search Track.
Rutgers Interactive Track at TREC 2002.
An Axiomatic Approach to IR--UIUC TREC 2005 Robust Track Experiments.
Mining Tasks from the Web Anchor Text Graph: MSR Notebook Paper for the TREC 2015 Tasks Track.
Opinion Retrieval Experiments Using Generative Models: Experiments for the TREC 2006 Blog Track.
Ranking Answers and Web Passages for Non-factoid Question Answering: Emory University at TREC LiveQA.
Support for Question-Answering in Interactive Information Retrieval: Rutgers' TREC-9 Interactive Track Experience.
Using a Bayesian Model to Combine LDA Features with Crowdsourced Responses.
ICTNET at Microblog Track in TREC 2014.
Using Role Determination and Expert Mining in the Enterprise Environment.
The Robert Gordon University.
IIT Kharagpur at TREC 2008 Blog Track.
Melbourne University at the 2006 Terabyte Track.
DUTIR at TREC 2007 Blog Track.
QU at TREC-2014: Online Clustering with Temporal and Topical Expansion for Tweet Timeline Generation.
FDUQA on TREC 2004 QA Track.
Exploiting Domain Thesaurus for Medical Record Retrieval.
Searching for Entities When Retrieval Meets Extraction.
The TREC-8 Filtering Track Final Report.
QUALIFIER In TREC-12 QA Main Task.
TREC 2004 Genomics Track Experiments at UTA: The Effects of Primary Keys, Bigram Phrases and Query Expansion on Retrieval Performance.
Overview of the TREC 2015 Contextual Suggestion Track.
An Exploration of New Ranking Strategies for Medical Record Tracks.
York University at TREC 2012: CrowdSourcing Track.
TREC-8 Automatic Ad-Hoc Experiments at Fondazione Ugo Bordoni.
Expanding Queries Using Multiple Resources.
JHU/APL at TREC 2002: Experiments in Filtering and Arabic Retrieval.
ITC-irst at TREC 2003: the DIOGENE QA System.
H5 at TREC 2008 Legal Interactive: User Modeling, Assessment & Measurement.
Ensemble Clustering for Result Diversification.
The University of Illinois' Graduate School of Library and Information Science at TREC 2011.
Parsimonious User and Group Profiling in Venue Recommendation.
University of Delaware at TREC 2015: Combining Opinion Profile Modeling with Complex Context Filtering for Contextual Suggestion.
Overview of the TREC 2004 Novelty Track.
Real Time Filtering of Tweets Using Wikipedia Concepts and Google Tri-gram Semantic Relatedness.
KLE at TREC 2008 Blog Track: Blog Post and Feed Retrieval.
CSAIL at TREC 2007 Question Answering.
Clinical Decision Support with the SPUD Language Model.
Looking at Limits and Tradeoffs: Sabir Research at TREC 2005.
Report on the TREC 2004 Experiment: Genomics Track.
Report on the TREC 2006 Genomics Experiment.
Cengage Learning at TREC 2011 Medical Track.
AnswerFinder at TREC 2004.
Phrasal Queries with LingPipe and Lucene: Ad Hoc Genomics Text Retrieval.
Experiments with the Negotiated Boolean Queries of the TREC 2007 Legal Discovery Track.
JAVELIN I and II Systems at TREC 2005.
ECNU at TREC 2015: LiveQA Track.
UMBC at TREC 12.
Combining Multiple Resources, Evidences and Criteria for Genomic Information Retrieval.
Application of Data Fusion in the Web Track.
How to Make Manual Conjunctive Normal Form Queries Work in Patents Search.
LIST at TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track: Question Analysis and Unsupervised Result Fusion.
The University of Amsterdam at the TREC 2003 Question Answering Track.
IBM's Statistical Question Answering System-TREC 11.
Overview of the TREC 2009 Blog Track.
Implicit Feedback and Document Filtering for Retrieval Over Query Sessions.
Bootstrapping Language Associated with Biomedical Entities.
The TREC-9 Interactive Track Report.
FDU at TREC-10: Filtering, QA, Web and Video Tasks.
A ProtoType Question Answering System Using Syntactic and Semantic Information for Answer Retrieval.
ICTNET at Web Track 2010 Ad-hoc Task.
THUIR at TREC 2003: Novelty, Robust and Web.
Relevance Propagation for Topic Distillation UIUC TREC 2003 Web Track Experiments.
University of Sheffield TREC-8 Q&A System.
Overview of the TREC 2005 Enterprise Track.
Overview of the TREC 2011 Entity Track.
ICTNET at Entity Track TREC 2010.
UIUC in HARD 2004--Passage Retrieval Using HMMs.
Relaxed Online SVMs in the TREC Spam Filtering Track.
Search for Clinical Records: RMIT at Medical TREC.
On Duplicate Results in a Search Session.
YFilter at TREC-9.
UCD IIRG at TREC 2012 Medical Track.
TREC Novelty Track at IRIT-SIG.
e-Discovery Team at TREC 2015 Total Recall Track.
Data-Intensive Question Answering.
UMass at TREC 2003: HARD and QA.
A Multi-Strategy and Multi-Source Approach to Question Answering.
Applying the Annotation View on Messages for Discussion Search.
RMIT University at TREC 2008: Enterprise Track.
Overview of the TREC 2013 Session Track.
Overview of the TREC 2009 Chemical IR Track.
Feature Generation, Feature Selection, Classifiers, and Conceptual Drift for Biomedical Document Triage.
TREC Genomics 2004.
BJUT at TREC 2015 Contextual Suggestion Track.
IIT TREC 2006: Genomics Track.
Use of Patterns for Detection of Likely Answer Strings: A Systematic Approach.
Simple Language Models for Spam Detection.
NICTA and UBC at the TREC 2012 Medical Track.
Finding Related Entities by Retrieving Relations: UIUC at TREC 2009 Entity Track.
Strategies for Effective Chemical Information Retrieval.
RMIT University at TREC 2008: Legal Track.
The University of Amsterdam at the TREC 2011 Session Track.
CWI at TREC 2011: Session, Web, and Medical.
University of Glasgow at the Web Track of TREC 2002.
Topic-Specific Optimization and Structuring.
FUB, IASI-CNR, UNIVAQ at TREC 2011 Microblog Track.
CARROTT 11 and the TREC 11 Web Track.
Lessons Learned From Indexing Close Word Pairs.
PRIS at TREC 2010 Blog Track: Faceted Blog Distillaton.
PKU_ICST at TREC 2011 Microblog Track.
University of Waterloo at TREC 2010: Legal Interactive.
Knowledge-Based Access to the Bio-Medical Literature, Ontologically-Grounded Experiments for the TREC 2003 Genomics Track.
TREC 2005 Genomics Track Experiments at UTA.
Top Stories Identification From Blog to News in TREC 2010 Blog Track.
Melbourne University 2004: Terabyte and Web Tracks.
University of Glasgow (qirdcsuog) at TREC Crowdsourcing 2011: TurkRank-Network-based Worker Ranking in Crowdsourcing.
Concordia University at the TREC 2007 QA Track.
Multiple-Engine Question Answering in TextMap.
Combining Structural Information and the Use of Priors in Mixed Named-Page and Homepage Finding.
Selecting Versus Describing: A Preliminary Analysis of the Efficacy of Categories in Exploring the Web.
San Francisco State University at TREC 2014: Clinical Decision Support Track and Microblog Track.
BJUT at TREC 2015 Microblog Track: Real-Time Filtering Using Knowledge Base.
Leverage Web-based Answer Retrieval and Hierarchical Answer Selection to Improve the Performance of Live Question Answering.
HARD Track Overview in TREC 2004 - High Accuracy Retrieval from Documents.
Sheffield University and the TREC 2004 Genomics Track: Query Expansion Using Synonymous Terms.
Integrating Web-based and Corpus-based Techniques for Question Answering.
LIA-iSmart at TREC 2010: An Unsupervised Web-Based Approach for Filtering Answers.
University of Waterloo at TREC 2011 Microblog Track.
Rutgers Information Interaction Lab at TREC 2005: Trying HARD.
ICTNET at Federated Web Search Track 2013.
MeSH Based Feedback, Concept Recognition and Stacked Classification for Curation Tasks.
A Constrained Approach to Manual Total Recall.
FDU at TREC 2007: Opinion Retrieval of Blog Track.
IRIT at TREC 2012 Contextual Suggestion Track.
QU at TREC-2015: Building Real-Time Systems for Tweet Filtering and Question Answering.
DUTH Does Probabilities of Relevance at the Legal Track.
Exploring Traits of Adjectives to Predict Polarity Opinion in Blogs and Semantic Filters in Genomics.
ILQUA at TREC 2006.
NovaSearch at TREC 2014 Clinical Decision Support Track.
Report on the TREC 2003 Experiment: Genomic Track.
THUIR at TREC 2003: HARD Experiments.
Approach of Information Retrieval with Reference Corpus to Novelty Detection.
Using Meda-data to Search for Clinical Records: RMIT at TREC 2012 Medical Track.
A Semantic Approach to Question Answering Systems.
UMass Genomics 2006: Query-Biased Pseudo Relevance Feedback.
Rutgers at the TREC 2012 Session Track.
A Hierarchical Bayesian Model of Crowdsourced Relevance Coding.
WaterlooClarke: TREC 2015 Contextual Suggestion Track.
The BlogVox Opinion Retrieval System.
Intellexer Question Answering.
TREC 2006 Question Answering Experiments at Tokyo Institute of Technology.
A Journey in Entity Related Retrieval for TREC 2009.
Oracle at TREC 10: Filtering and Question-Answering.
University of Florida Knowledge Base Acceleration.
The Impact of Positive, Negative and Topical Relevance Feedback.
Experiments in Named Page Finding and Arabic Retrieval with Hummingbird SearchServerTM at TREC 2002.
Research on Expert Search at Enterprise Track of TREC 2005.
Concept Recognition, Information Retrieval, and Machine Learning in Genomics Question-Answering.
BUPT_PRIS at TREC 2014 Knowledge Base Acceleration Track.
The OHSU Biomedical Question Answering System Framework.
Amberfish at the TREC 2004 Terabyte Track.
NovaSearch at TREC 2013 Federated Web Search Track: Experiments with rank fusion.
Three Questions About Clinical Information Retrieval.
Dublin City University at the TREC 2006 Terabyte Track.
TREC Chemical IR Track 2009: A Distributed Dimensional Indexing Model for Chemical Patent Search.
TREC 2007 Question Answering Experiments at Tokyo Institute of Technology.
IRIT at TREC 2011: Evaluation of Query Expansion Techniques for Medical Record Retrieval.
Universite de Montreal at TREC 2013: Experiments with Quantum Language Models in the Web Track.
AnswerFinder in TREC 2003.
Question Answering by Diggery at TREC 2006.
Recognizing Gene and Protein Function in MEDLINE Abstracts.
RMIT University at TREC 2010: Session Track.
BioText Team Report for the TREC 2006 Genomics Track.
Overview of the TREC 2004 Question Answering Track.
Auto-Relevancy and Responsiveness Baseline II Improving Concept Search to Establish a Subset with Maximized Recall for Automated First Pass and Early Assessment Using Latent Semantic Indexing [LSI], Bigrams and WordNet 3.0 Seeding.
Finding Patient Visits in EMR Using LUXID.
Query Refinement: Negation Detection and Proximity Learning Georgetown at TREC 2014 Clinical Decision Support Track.
UB at TREC Genomics 2006: Using Passage Retrieval and Pre-Retrieval Query Expansion for Genomics IR.
IBM's PIQUANT II in TREC 2005.
Heuristic Ranking and Diversification of Web Documents.
BioKI, A General Literature Navigation System at TREC Genomics 2006.
CAS-ICT at TREC 2005 Robust Track: Using Query Expansion and RankFusion to Improve Effectiveness and Robustness of Ad Hoc Information Retrieval.
York University at TREC 2009: Chemical Track.
TREC 2002 Web Track "Automated Word Sense Disambiguation for Internet Information Retrieval".
Language Models for Expert Finding--UIUC TREC 2006 Enterprise Track Experiments.
RMIT at the TREC 2015 LiveQA Track.
TREC Feature Extraction by Active Learning.
BUPT_WILDCAT at TREC Crowdsourcing Track: Crowdsourcing for Relevance Evaluation.
Time-Sensitive Weighting for Microblog Retrieval.
IRIT, GeoComp, and LIUPPA at the TREC 2013 Contextual Suggestion Track.
IITD-IBMIRL System for Question Answering Using Pattern Matching, Semantic Type and Semantic Category Recognition.
Experiments with the Negotiated Boolean Queries of the TREC 2008 Legal Track.
Robust, Web and Terabyte Retrieval with Hummingbird SearchServer at TREC 2004.
IXE at the TREC 2005 Terabyte Task.
Siena's Twitter Information Retrieval System: The 2014 Microblog Track.
Query Modification through External Sources to Support Clinical Decisions.
UB at TREC 12: HARD and Genomics Tracks.
TREC 2002 Interactive Track Report.
ICTNET at Federated Web Search Track 2014.
Integrating Features, Models, and Semantics for TREC Video Retrieval.
BUPT_PRIS at TREC 2012 Crowdsourcing Track 1.
CINDOR Conceptual Interlingua Document Retrieval: TREC-8 Evaluation.
HARD Experiment at Maryland: From Need Negotiation to Automated HARD Process.
TREC 2004 Robust Track Experiments Using PIRCS.
Managing the Quality of Large-Scale Crowdsourcing.
FDUQA on TREC 2006 QA Track.
A Menagerie of Tracks at Maryland: HARD, Enterprise, QA, and Genomics, Oh My!
Information Extraction Supported Question Answering.
Experiments with Web QA System and TREC 2004 Questions.
Report on the TREC 2003 Experiments Using Web Topic-Centric Link Analysis.
PRIS at TREC 2010: Related Entity Finding Task of Entity Track.
Web-Based Pseudo Relevance Feedback for Microblog Retrieval.
Fujitsu Laboratories TREC8 Report - Ad hoc, Small Web, and Large Web Track.
NLPR at TREC 2005: HARD Experiments.
RGU-ISTI-Essex at TREC 2011 Session Track.
UNT TRECvid: A Brighton Image Searcher Application.
Siena College's Institute of Artificial Intelligence TREC 2015 Contextual Suggestion Track.
Persuasive, Authorative and Topical Answers for Complex Question Answering.
MetaMap is a Superior Baseline to a Standard Document Retrieval Engine for the Task of Finding Patient Cohorts in Clinical Free Text.
Interactive Search Refinement Techniques for HARD Tasks.
CL Research Experiments in TREC-10 Question Answering.
High Selectivity and Accuracy with READWARE's Automated System of Knowledge Organization.
DalTREC 2005 QA System Jellyfish: Mark-and-Match Approach to Question Answering.
Overview of TREC 2007.
The TREC-8 Query Track.
University of Glasgow at TREC 2013: Experiments with Terrier in Contextual Suggestion, Temporal Summarisation and Web Tracks.
UIC at TREC 2004: Robust Track.
University of Iowa at TREC 2008 Legal and Relevance FeedbackTracks.
NovaSearch at TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track.
Korea University Question Answering System at TREC 2004.
PRIS at TREC 2011 Medical Record Track.
CWI at the TREC 2002 Video Track.
York University at TREC 2004: HARD and Genomics Tracks.
ICTNET at Microblog Track TREC 2012.
Logistic Regression Merging of Amberfish and Lucene Multisearch Results.
Identifying Relationships Between Entities in Text for Complex Interactive Question Answering Task.
Overview of the TREC 2003 Question Answering Track.
Blog Mining Through Opinionated Words.
UMass at TREC WEB 2014: Entity Query Feature Expansion using Knowledge Base Links.
The University of Amsterdam at the TREC 2007 QA Track.
Progress in General-Purpose IR Software.
National University of Singapore at the TREC 13 Question Answering Main Task.
Question Answering, Relevance Feedback and Summarisation: TREC-9 Interactive Track Report.
DUTIR at TREC 2011 Microblog Track.
RMIT University at TREC 2004.
THUIR at TREC 2004: QA.
Interactive Construction of Query Language Models - UIUC TREC 2005 HARD Track Experiments.
Blind Relevance Feedback with Wikipedia: Enterprise Track.
Relevance Feedback
Spoken Document Retrieval for TREC-9 at Cambridge University.
Applying Latent Semantic Indexing on the TREC 2010 Legal Dataset.
NovaSearch at TREC 2013 Microblog Track: Experiments with reranking using Wikipedia.
Tianwang at TREC 2006 QA Track.
UCLA at TREC 2014 Clinical Decision Support Track: Exploring Language Models, Query Expansion, and Boosting.
Robust, Web and Genomic Retrieval with Hummingbird SearchServer at TREC 2003.
IIIT Hyderabad at Million Query Track TREC 2009.
Query Expansion Using SNOMED-CT and Weighing Schemes.
Case Western Reserve University at the TREC 2006 Enterprise Track.
An Opinion-aware Approach to Contextual Suggestion.
Query Expansion for Noisy Legal Documents.
DUTIR at TREC 2007 Genomics Track.
UMass at TREC 2007 Blog Distillation Task.
The NexTrieve Search System in TREC 2001.
IRRA at TREC 2010: Index Term Weighting by Divergence From Independence Model.
BEST of KAUST at TREC 2011: Building Effective Search in Twitter.
Sheffield Interactive Experiment at TREC-9.
WaterlooClarke: TREC 2015 Temporal Summarization Track.
IIT at TREC 2003, Task Classification and Document Structrure for Known-Item Search.
Experiments in TREC 2007 Blog Opinion Task at CAS-ICT.
CINDOR TREC-9 English-Chinese Evaluation.
UB at TREC 2010 Legal Interactive.
Incremental Learning for Profile Training in Adaptive Document Filtering.
Concept Extraction and Synonymy Management for Biomedical Information Retrieval.
Simple Rank-Based Filtering for Microblog Retrieval: Implications for Evaluation and Test Collections.
More Statistical Power Needed: The OHSU TREC 2002 Interactive Track Experiments.
Overview of the TREC 2009 Entity Track.
A Multiple-Stage Framework for Related Entity Finding: FDWIM at TREC 2010 Entity Track.
Combining Thesauri-Based Methods for Biomedical Retrieval.
TREC 2008 at the University at Buffalo: Legal and Blog Track.
Optimization in CLARIT TREC-8 Adaptive Filtering.
IRIT at TREC Microblog 2015.
The University of Amsterdam at TREC 2012.
University of Glasgow at the Web Track: Dynamic Application of Hyperlink Analysis using the Query Scope.
Active Feedback - UIUC TREC-2003 HARD Experiments.
UCAS at TREC 2012 Microblog Track.
TREC 2005 Question Answering Experiments at Tokyo Institute of Technology.
Rutgers' HARD Track Experiences at TREC 2004.
The University of Sheffield's TREC 2004 QA Experiments.
VT at TREC-2003: The Web Track Report.
A Knowledge-Based Approach to Medical Records Retrieval.
Knowledge Transfer and Opinion Detection in the TREC 2006 Blog Track.
Clairvoyance Corporation Experiments in the TREC 2003 High Accuracy Retrieval from Douments (HARD) Track.
PRIS at TREC2013 Knowledge Base Acceleration Track.
Question Answering Using the DLT System at TREC 2004.
IRIT at TREC Microblog Track 2013.
IBM SpamGuru on the TREC 2005 Spam Track.
The Robert Gordon University's HARD Track Experiments at TREC 2004.
Northeastern University Runs at the TREC12 Crowdsourcing Track.
IRIT at TREC 2002: Filtering Track.
SVM Approach to GeneRIF Annotation.
BRAT: A Random Walk Through the Semantic Spaces of the Blogosphere.
York University at TREC 2011: Medical Records Track.
Empirical Ontologies for Cohort Identification.
IRIT at TREC Microblog 2011.
ICTNET at Web Track TREC2014.
Frequent Itemset Mining for Query Expansion in Microblog adhoc Search.
User Modeling for Contextual Suggestion.
RMIT University at TREC 2009: Web Track.
Concept based Information Retrieval for Clinical Case Summaries.
Improving the Robustness of Language Models - UIUC TREC 2003 Robust and Genomics Experiments.
UIC at TREC 2006 Blog Track.
BJUT at TREC 2015 Microblog Track: Real-Time Filtering Using Non-negative Matrix Factorization.
Extraction of Document Structure for Genomics Documents.
Berkeley's TREC 8 Interactive Track Entry: Cheshire II and Zprise.
ILQUA--An IE-Driven Question Answering System.
Contextual Suggestion.
IRIS at TREC-8.
ICTNET at Web Track 2010 Diversity Task.
Cross Language Information Retrieval for Biomedical Literature.
Observations of Searchers: OHSU TREC 2001 Interactive Track.
Stuctured Queries for Legal Search.
NiCT at TREC 2009: Employing Three Models for Entity Ranking Track.
CMU Spoken Document Retrieval in Trec-8: Analysis of the role of Term Frequency TF.
Purdue at TREC 2010 Entity Track: A Probabilistic Framework for Matching Types Between Candidate and Target Entities.
CNDS Expert Finding System for TREC 2005.
TREC 2014 Web Track Overview.
Concept Based Document Retrieval for Genomics Literature.
Ricoh Research at TREC 2006: Enterprise Track.
Juru at TREC 2005: Query Prediction in the Terabyte and the Robust Tracks.
ECNU at TREC 2015: Microblog Track.
York University at TREC 2007: Genomics Track.
CLARIT TREC-8 Manual Ad-Hoc Experiments.
TALP-UPC at TREC 2005: Experiments Using a Voting Scheme Among Three Heterogeneous QA Systems.
TREC 2005 Genomics Track Overview.
Oc at TREC 2003.
LIMSI @ 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track.
UTD at TREC 2014: Query Expansion for Clinical Decision Support.
L3S Research Center at TREC 2006 Enterprise Track.
The Open University at TREC 2007 Enterprise Track.
BioText Team Experiments for the TREC 2004 Genomics Track.
Combining Lexicon Expansion, Information Retrieval, and Cluster-based Ranking for Biomedical Question Answering.
Microblog Search and Filtering with Time Sensitive Feedback and Thresholding bsed on BM25.
QCRI @ TREC 2011: Microblog Track.
WIDIT in TREC 2005 HARD, Robust, and SPAM Tracks.
Qanda and the Catalyst Architecture.
Ranking Web Pages Using Collective Knowledge.
RMIT at the Crowdsourcing Track of TREC 2011.
Overview of the TREC 2013 Contextual Suggestion Track.
TREC 2002 Video Track Experiments at MediaTeam Oulu and VTT.
PRIS Kidult Anti-SPAM Solution at the TREC 2005 Spam Track: Improving the Performance of Naive Bayes for Spam Detection.
TREC 2007 Legal Track Interactive Task: A Report from the LIU Team.
IBM's PIQUANT in TREC2003.
BIT at TREC 2009 Faceted Blog Distillation Task.
Indri at TREC 2004: Terabyte Track.
Filtering Entity Centric Documents using Numerics and Temporals features within RF Classifier.
IIT at TREC 2002 Linear Combinations Based on Document Structure and Varied Stemming for Arabic Retrieval.
NTT DATA: Overview of system approach at TREC-8 ad-hoc and question answering.
MMCI at the TREC 2010 Web Track.
BIT and MSRA at TREC KBA CCR Track 2013.
Question Answering with QED and Wee at TREC 2004.
Tampere University of Technology at TREC 2001.
ISTI@TREC Microblog Track 2011: Exploring the Use of Hashtag Segmentation and Text Quality Ranking.
Tie-breaker: A New Perspective of Ranking and Evaluation for Microblog Retrieval.
Event Oriented Query Expansion for News Event Queries.
The University of Amsterdam at TREC 2002.
BUPT_PRIS at TREC 2012 Session Track.
Microsoft Cambridge at TREC 13: Web and Hard Tracks.
AEHRC & QUT at TREC 2011 Medical Track: A Concept-Based Information Retrieval Approach.
IBM Research TREC 2002 Video Retrieval System.
Description of NTU System at TREC-10 QA Track.
University of Essex at the TREC 2011 Session Track.
UMass at TREC 2002: Cross Language and Novelty Tracks.
Language Models for Enterprise Search: Query Expansion and Combination of Evidence.
The Pronto QA System at TREC 2007: Harvesting Hyponyms, Using Nominalisation Patterns, and Computing Answer Cardinality.
TREC-9 CLIR Experiments at MSRCN.
ICTNET at Context Suggestion Track TREC 2014.
From Blogs to News: Identifying Hot Topics in the Blogosphere.
Question-Answering via Enhanced Understanding of Questions.
DalTREC 2004: Question Answering Using Regular Expression Rewriting.
JHU/APL at TREC 2001: Experiments in Filtering and in Arabic, Video, and Web Retrieval.
Identifying Relevant Full-Text Articles for Database Curation.
UIUC/MUSC at TREC 2005 Genomics Track.
CMIC@TREC 2009: Relevance Feedback Track.
Measuring Robustness with First Relevant Score in the TREC 2012 Microblog Track.
Evaluation of Stemming, Query Expansion and Manual Indexing Approaches for the Genomic Task.
Million Query Track 2007 Overview.
Cohort Shepherd: Discoving Cohort Traits from Hospital Visits.
The Alyssa System at TREC QA 2007: Do We Need Blog06?
CRP Henri Tudor at TREC 2014: Combining Search Results for Clinical Decision Support.
Burst Detection in Social Media Streams for Tracking Interest Profiles in Real Time.
TREC2001 Question-Answer, Web and Cross Language Experiments using PIRCS.
A Study of Adaptive Relevance Feedback - UIUC TREC 2008 Relevance Feedback Experiments.
IRIT at TREC 2002: Web Track.
Better Contextual Suggestions in ClueWeb12 Using Domain Knowledge Inferred from The Open Web.
FUB, IASI-CNR and University of Tor Vergata at TREC 2007 Blog Track.
Incorporating Non-Relevance Information in the Estimation of Query Models.
Performance of MolRec at TREC 2011 Overview and Analysis of Results.
TREC-8 Experiments at Maryland: CLIR, QA and Routing.
MSRC at TREC 2011 Crowdsourcing Track.
ICT Experiments in TREC 11 QA Main Task.
Yonsei/ETRI at TREC-10: Utilizing Web Document Properties.
RMIT University at the TREC 2007 Enterprise Track.
University of Lugano at TREC 2008 Blog Track.
The University of Sheffield's TREC 2006 Q&A Experiments.
Microsoft Cambridge at TREC 14: Enterprise Track.
Finding An Answer Based on the Recognition of the Question Focus.
BJUT at TREC 2015 Temporal Summarization Track.
Overview of the TREC 2012 Session Track.
Word Importance Discrimination Using Context Information.
IRRA at TREC 2009: Index Term Weighting Based on Divergence From Independence Model.
An Ensemble Approach for Expanding Queries.
The University of Amsterdam at TREC 2010: Session, Entity and Relevance Feedback.
Polarity Classification of Blog TREC 2008 Data with a Geodesic Kernel.
University of Alicante at TREC-10.
UB at TREC 13: Genomics Track.
Use of Metadata for Question Answering and Novelty Tasks.
Recommind at TREC 2011 Legal Track.
Building a Foundation System for Producing Short Answers to Factual Questions.
Information Retrieval Framework for Technology Survey in Biomedical and Chemistry Literature.
ICTNET at Session Track TREC 2013.
Entity-Based Relevance Feedback for Genomic List Answer Retrieval.
QALC - the Question-Answering program of the Language and Cognition group at LIMSI-CNRS.
A Connectivity Analysis Approach to Increasing Precision in Retrieval From Hyperlinked Documents.
Retrieval Performance and Visual Dispersion of Query Sets.
Mirex and Taily at TREC 2013.
Experiments in TREC 2003 Genomics Track at NTT.
Does Category A Anchor Text Improve Category B Results?
Using Syntactic and Semantic Relation Analysis in Question Answering.
ICTNET at Entity ELC TREC 2011.
TREC GENOMICS Track Overview.
ZL Technologies at TREC 2009 Legal Interactive: Comparing Exclusionary and Investigative Approaches for Electronic Discovery Using the TREC Enron Corpus.
Question Answering Considering Semantic Categories and Co-Occurrence Density.
PKUICST at TREC 2014 Microblog Track: Feature Extraction for Effective Microblog Search and Adaptive Clustering Algorithms for TTG.
PRIS in TREC 2008 Blog Track.
QA UdG-UPC System at TREC-12.
Overview of the TREC-8 Web Track.
Evaluation of Query Formulations in the Negotiated Query Refinement Process of Legal e-Discovery: UMKC at TREC 2007 Legal Track.
From the Texts to the Contexts They Contain: A Chain of Linguistic Treatments.
Overview of the TREC 2003 Web Track.
Examining Overfitting in Relevance Feedback: Sabir Research at TREC 2007.
RMIT at TREC 2011 Microblog Track.
University of Lugano at TREC 2015: Contextual Suggestion and Temporal Summarization Tracks.
Question Answering by Searching Large Corpora With Linguistic Methods.
TREC Blog and TREC Chem: A View from the Corn Fields.
Edinburgh-Stanford TREC-2003 Genomics Track.
Webis at the TREC 2010 Sessions Track.
RMIT University at TREC 2006: Terabyte Track.
FUB, IASI-CNR and University of Tor Vergata at TREC 2008 Blog Track.
Knowledge-Intensive and Statistical Approaches to the Retrieval and Annotation of Genomics MEDLINE Citations.
BIT at TREC 2010 Blog Track: Faceted Blog Distillation.
A Domain Independent Approach to Clinical Decision Support.
Exploring the Legal Discovery and Enterprise Tracks at the University of Iowa.
Genomic Information Retrieval Through Selective Extraction and Tagging by the ASU-BioAL Group.
Natural Language Information Retrieval: TREC-8 Report.
Passage Retrieval by Shrinkage of Language Models.
Coupling Named Entity Recognition, Vector-Space Model and Knowledge Bases for TREC 11 Question Answering Track.
BUPT at TREC 2009: Entity Track.
University of North Carolina's HARD Track Experiments at TREC 2004.
York University at TREC 2006: Enterprise Email Discussion Search.
Drexel at TREC 2007: Question Answering.
A Novel Framework for Related Entities Finding: ICTNET at TREC 2009 Entity Track.
Of Ivory and Smurfs: Loxodontan MapReduce Experiments for Web Search.
University of Glasgow at the Robust Track- A Query-based Model Selection Approach for the Poorly-Performing Queries.
Combining First and Second Order Features in the TREC 2003 Robust Track.
Overview of the TREC-2012 Microblog Track.
TREC 2003 Robust, HARD and QA Track Experiments using PIRCS.
ICTNET at Microblog Track in TREC 2013.
Can We Get A Better Retrieval Function From Machine?
Overview of the TREC 2005 Question Answering Track.
The RMIT/CSIRO Ad Hoc, Q&A, Web, Interactive, and Speech Experiments at TREC 8.
LIT at TREC 2002: Web Track.
The GUC Goes to TREC 2004: Using Whole or Partial Documents for Retrieval and Classification in the Genomics Track.
NUDTSNA at TREC 2015 Microblog Track: A Live Retrieval System Framework for Social Network based on Semantic Expansion and Quality Model.
PRIS at 2009 Relevance Feedback Track: Experiments in Language Model for Relevance Feedback.
SOPHIA in Enterprise Track.
The System RELIEFS: A New Approach for Information Filtering.
SVM-Based Spam Filter with Active and Online Learning.
University of Padua at TREC 2009: Relevance Feedback Track.
Exploiting incoming and outgoing citations for improving Information Retrieval in the TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track.
Using Coreference in Question Answering.
TREC Dynamic Domain: Polar Science.
TREC 2006 Q&A Factoid: TI Experience.
TREC-10 Experiments at KAIST: Batch Filtering and Question Answering.
Overview of the TREC 2005 Robust Retrieval Track.
Filtering Documents over Time on Evolving Topics - The University of Amsterdam at TREC 2013 KBA CCR.
IRIT at TREC Knowledge Base Acceleration 2013: Cumulative Citation Recommendation Task.
University of Padua at TREC 2013: Federated Web Search Track.
Efficiency vs. Effectiveness in Terabyte-Scale Information Retrieval.
UNT at TREC 2004: Question Answering Combining Multiple Evidences.
IIT at TREC 2004 Standard Retrieval Models Over Partitioned Indices for the Terabyte Track.
UMass Robust 2005: Using Mixtures of Relevance Models for Query Expansion.
Exploring Tweets Normalization and Query Time Sensitivity for Twitter Search.
MG4J at TREC 2006.
AnswerFinder at TREC 2006.
FSC at TREC.
Overview of the TREC 2006.
Overview of the TREC 2006 Blog Track.
The University of Amsterdam (ILPS.UvA) at TREC 2015 Temporal Summarization Track.
FDUQA on TREC2003 QA task.
HLTCOE at TREC 2014: Microblog and Clinical Decision Support.
WISTUD at TREC 2011: Microblog Track: Exploiting Background Knowledge from DBpedia and News Articles for Search on Twitter.
UMass Complex Interactive Question Answering (ciQA) 2007: Human Performance as Question Answerers.
Effective Smoothing for a Terabyte of Text.
Prior Art Search in Chemistry Patents Based On Semantic Concepts and Co-Citation Analysis.
Xerox TREC-8 Question Answering Track Report.
Report on the TREC 2005 Experiment: Genomics Track.
Information Needs and Automatic Queries.
TREC 2006 Spam Track Overview.
LAMDA at TREC CDS track 2015 - Clinical Decision Support Track.
Combining Vector-Space and Word-Based Aspect Models for Passage Retrieval.
Microsoft Cambridge at TREC-12: HARD track.
(Not Too) Personalized Learning to Rank for Contextual Suggestion.
Three Non-Bayesian Methods of Spam Filtration: CRM114 at TREC 2007.
Evaluating Stream Filtering for Entity Profile Updates for TREC 2013.
A Semantic Platform for Information Retrieval from E-Health Records.
Exegy at TREC 2007 Million Query Track.
The University of Sheffield's TREC 2003 Q&A Experiments.
WIDIT in TREC 2008 Blog Track: Leveraging Multiple Sources of Opinion Evidence.
IBM's PIQUANT II in TREC 2004.
A Hidden Markov Model for the TREC Novelty Task.
Diversifying Search Results with Popular Subtopics.
Overview of the TREC 2007 Legal Track.
The Thisl SDR System at TREC-9.
Query and Document Models for Enterprise Search.
ICTNET at Web Track 2011 Diversity Track.
Query Reformulation for Clinical Decision Support Search.
Juru at TREC 2006: TAAT versus DAAT in the Terabyte Track.
THU TREC 2002: Novelty Track Experiments.
FDUQA on TREC 2005 QA Track.
UCD SIFT in the TREC 2009 Web Track.
Parsimonious Language Models for a Terabyte of Text.
An Exploraton of Ranking-Based Strategy for Contextual Suggestion.
Entity Retrieval with Hierarchical Relevance Model, Exploiting the Structure of Tables and Learning Homepage Classifiers.
Report on the TREC-10 Experiment: Distributed Collections and Entrypage Searching.
Research on Enterprise Track of TREC 2008.
LiveTweet: Microblog Retrieval Based on Interestingness and an Adaptation of the Vector Space Model.
Dublin City University Video Track Experiments for TREC 2001.
Melbourne University 2005: Enterprise and Terabyte Tasks.
A Concept-Based Framework for Passage Retrieval at Genomics.
Partitioning the Gov2 Corpus by Internet Domain Name: A Result-set Merging Experiment.
UMass at TREC 2013 Knowledge Base Acceleration Track: Bi-directional Entity Linking and Time-aware Evaluation.
GUCAS at TREC 2011 Microblog Track.
TREC 2005 Genomics Track A Concept-Based Approach to Text Categorization.
TREC-10 Experiments at CAS-ICT: Filtering, Web and QA.
TREC 2010 Blog Track: Top Stories Identification.
WaterlooClarke: TREC 2015 Total Recall Track.
Meiji University Web, Novelty and Genomic Track Experiments.
Overview of the TREC 2015 Tasks Track.
Biomedical Document Triage: Automatic Classification Exploiting Category Specific Knowledge.
CAS-ICT at TREC 2005 SPAM Track: Using Non-Textual Information to Improve Spam Filtering Performance.
QUT_Para at TREC 2012 Web Track: Word Associations for Retrieving Web Documents.
Language Models for Genomics Information Retrieval: UIUC at TREC 2007 Genomics Track.
DUTH at TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track.
WIM at TREC 2005.
WHU at TREC KBA Vital Filtering Track 2014.
Structuring and Expanding Queries in the Probabilistic Model.
TREC 2007 Enterprise Track at CSIRO.
UniNE at TREC 2008: Fact and Opinion Retrieval in the Blogsphere.
Hrbust in TREC 2013: Crowdsourcing Track.
Facet Classification of Blogs: Know-Center at the TREC 2009 Blog Distillation Task.
Using Normal PC to Index and Retrieval Terabyte Document - THUIR at TREC 2004 Terabyte Track.
The "La Sapienza" Question Answering System at TREC 2006.
RMIT University at TREC 2008: Relevance Feedback Track.
PiQASso: Pisa Question Answering System.
TREC-9 CLIR at CUHK: Disambiguation by Similarity Values Between Adjacent Words.
Overview of the TREC 2014 Federated Web Search Track.
Do Batch and User Evaluations Give the Same Results? An Analysis from the TREC-8 Interactive Track.
External Knowledge Sources for Question Answering.
Peking University at the TREC 2006 Terabyte Track.
Clearwell Systems at TREC 2009 Legal Interactive.
ICTNET at Blog Track TREC 2009.
University of Glasgow at TREC 2008: Experiments in Blog, Enterprise, and Relevance Feedback Tracks with Terrier.
Oracle at Trec8: A Lexical Approach.
Overview of the TREC 2013 Federated Web Search Track.
Learning Task Experiments in the TREC 2010 Legal Track.
Identifying Patients for Clinical Studies from Electronic Health Records: TREC Medical Records Track at OHSU.
Web Document Retrieval Using Sentence-Query Similarity.
UIC at TREC 2002: Web Track.
Learning from Medical Summaries: The University of Michigan at TREC 2015 Clinical Decision Support Track.
Complex Interactive Question Answering Enhanced with Wikipedia.
Pitt at TREC 2013: Different Effects of Click-through and Past Queries on Whole-session Search Performance.
Homepage Finding and Topic Distillation Using a Common Retrieval Strategy.
TREC 2013 Web Track Overview.
ACSys TREC-8 Experiments.
Another Sys Called Qanda.
The Mirror DBMS at TREC-9.
MITRE's Qanda at TREC 15.
Topic Categorization for Relevancy and Opinion Detection.
CWI at TREC 2012, KBA Track and Session Track.
ASU at TREC 2006 Genomics Track.
Improved Feature Selection and Redundance Computing - THUIR at TREC 2004 Novelty Track.
ISTI@TREC Microblog Track 2012: Real-Time Filtering Through Supervised Learning.
Fuzzy Proximity Ranking with Boolean Queries.
IIT TREC-9 - Entity Based Feedback with Fusion.
IIT TREC 2007 Genomics Track: Using Concept-Based Semantics in Context for Genomics Literature Passage Retrieval.
Overview of the TREC 2010 Entity Track.
TREC 2006 Legal Track Overview.
Axiomatic Approaches to Information Retrieval--University of Delaware at TREC 2009 Million Query and Web Tracks.
MG4J at TREC 2005.
Experiments on Genomics Ad Hoc Retrieval.
Combining Language Model with Sentiment Analysis for Opinion Retrieval of Blog-Post.
FUB at TREC-10 Web Track: A Probabilistic Framework for Topic Relevance Term Weighting.
10 Weeks to TREC: STIRS Siena's Twitter Information Retrieval System.
Microsoft Research at TREC 2011 Web Track.
University of Wolverhampton at the TREC 2011 Microblog Track.
WIDIT in TREC 2007 Blog Track: Combining Lexicon-Based Methods to Detect Opinionated Blogs.
University of Indonesia at TREC 2011 Microblog Task.
Towards Practical PPM Spam Filtering: Experiments for the TREC 2006 Spam Track.
Indri at TREC 2005: Terabyte Track.
Video Searching and Browsing Using Viewfinder.
Report on the TREC 2006 Experiment: Genomics Track.
The Mirror DBMS at TREC-8.
FUB at TREC 2008 Relevance Feedback Track: Extending Rocchio with Distributional Term Analysis.
TREC-8 Interactive Track Report.
Methods for Accurate Retrieval of MEDLINE Citations in Functional Genomics.
TNO-UT at TREC-9: How Different are Web Documents?
Online Topic Modeling for Real-Time Twitter Search.
Retrieving Web Pages Using Content, Links, URLs and Anchors.
A Non-Functional Prototype at TREC 2003.
Cross-Language Information Retrieval (CLIR) Track Overview.
Siena's Clinical Decision Assistant.
Overview of the TREC 2007 Enterprise Track.
NTT Question Answering System in TREC 2001.
York University at TREC 2005: Terabyte Track.
University of Amsterdam at the TREC 2013 Contextual Suggestion Track: Learning User Preferences from Wikitravel Categories.
When Less is More: Relevance Feedback Falls Short and Term Expansion Succeeds at HARD 2005.
University of Glasgow at TREC 2014: Experiments with Terrier in Contextual Suggestion, Temporal Summarisation and Web Tracks.
University of Glasgow at TREC 2005: Experiments in Terabyte and Enterprise Tracks with Terrier.
DUTIR at TREC 2007 Enterprise Track.
WHU at Blog Track 2007.
A Time-Aware Language Model for Microblog Retrieval.
Experiments with Document and Query Representations for a Terabyte of Text.
Medical-Miner at TREC 2011 Medical Records Track.
Experiments with ClueWeb09: Relevance Feedback and Web Tracks.
Venue Recommendation and Web Search Based on Anchor Text.
IBM in TREC 2006 Enterprise Track.
CWI and TU Delft at the TREC 2015 Temporal Summarization Track.
Entity Profile Based Approach in Automatic Knowledge Finding.
Exploiting Neural Embeddings for Social Media Data Analysis.
Information Retrieval and Information Extraction in TREC Genomics 2007.
Ask Me Tomorrow: The NRC and University of Ottawa Question Answering System.
Using Semantic Relations with World Knowledge for Question Answering.
RMIT at TREC 2011 Session Track.
Passage Relevancy Through Semantic Relatedness.
Report on the TREC 11 Experiment: Arabic, Named Page and Topic Distillation Searches.
ICTNET at Blog Track TREC 2010.
Endicott College at 2014 TREC Session Track.
Overview of the TREC 2003 Novelty Track.
ISCAS at TREC 2004: HARD Track.
A Hybrid Approach to Clinical Question Answering.
Juru at TREC 2003 - Topic Distillation using Query-Sensitive Tuning and Cohesiveness Filtering.
MITRE's Qanda at TREC-11.
The QUANTUM Question Answering System at TREC 11.
Webis at TREC 2015: Tasks and Total Recall Tracks.
Combination of Evidence for Effective Web Search.
Ad Hoc and Diversity Retrieval at the University of Delaware.
Moving More Quickly toward Full Term Relations in Information Space.
Webis at TREC 2014: Web, Session, and Contextual Suggestion Tracks.
A TREC Along the Spam Track with SpamBayes.
A Study of Faceted Blog Distillation--PRIS at TREC 2009 Blog Track.
Image-to-Structure Task by ChemReader.
Classifier Stacking and Voting for Text Filtering.
Overview of the TREC 2003 Robust Retrieval Track.
UIC at TREC-2003: Robust Track.
Contextual Suggestion using tag-description similarity.
SJTU at TREC 2004: Web Track Experiments.
Tianwang Search Engine at TREC 2005: Terabyte Track.
ICTNET at Session Track TREC2014.
Succinct Data Structures in Information Retrieval: Theory and Practice.
Using term informativeness for named entity detection.
Learning sufficient queries for entity filtering.
The interactive PRP for diversifying document rankings.
Entity query feature expansion using knowledge base links.
Topic hierarchy generation via linear discriminant projection.
Principled dictionary pruning for low-memory corpus compression.
An analysis of the coupling between training set and neighborhood sizes for the
Cluster-Based Language Models for Distributed Retrieval.
Federated text retrieval from uncooperative overlapped collections.
Measuring assessor accuracy: a comparison of nist assessors and user study participants.
A faceted interface for multimedia search.
The User View of File Management: Recommendations for a User Interface Based in an Analysis of UNIX File System Use.
A New Approach to Text Searching.
Improving hierarchical text classification using unlabeled data.
Looking ahead: query preview in exploratory search.
SearchResultFinder: federated search made easy.
Broken plural detection for arabic information retrieval.
Combining document representations for known-item search.
A maximal figure-of-merit learning approach to text categorization.
PENG: integrated search of distributed news archives.
Active learning to maximize accuracy vs. effort in interactive information retrieval.
An Analysis of Vector Space Models Based on Computational Geometry.
Do users rate or review?: boost phrase-level sentiment labeling with review-level sentiment classification.
Learning to rank for freshness and relevance.
Integrating Query, Thesaurus, and Documents Through a Common Visual Representation.
Formal multiple-bernoulli models for language modeling.
A compositional context sensitive multi-document summarizer: exploring the factors that influence summarization.
Profile-based event tracking.
Evaluation of the real and perceived value of automatic and interactive query expansion.
Clustering of search results using temporal attributes.
The good and the bad system: does the test collection predict users' effectiveness?
Dynamic Query Modeling for Related Content Finding.
Learning the click-through rate for rare/new ads from similar ads.
Semantic term matching in axiomatic approaches to information retrieval.
IDF revisited: a simple new derivation within the Robertson-Sprck Jones probabilistic model.
Language-model-based pro/con classification of political text.
Efficient bayesian hierarchical user modeling for recommendation system.
Combining coregularization and consensus-based self-training for multilingual text categorization.
The NRRC reliable information access (RIA) workshop.
Empirical Investigations on Query Modification Using Abductive Explanations.
Finding relevant documents using top ranking sentences: an evaluation of two alternative schemes.
Predictive parallelization: taming tail latencies in web search.
The Converse Natural Language Data Management System: Current Status and Plans.
Answering natural language queries over linked data graphs: a distributional semantics approach.
Varying approaches to topical web query classification.
To hint or not: exploring the effectiveness of search hints for complex informational tasks.
Improving e-discovery using information retrieval.
Analysis of structural relationships for hierarchical cluster labeling.
Web question answering: is more always better?.
ChatNoir: a search engine for the ClueWeb09 corpus.
Bridging temporal context gaps using time-aware re-contextualization.
How many results per page?: A Study of SERP Size, Search Behavior and User Experience.
A Probabilistic Relational Model for the Integration of IR and Databases.
Cache-conscious runtime optimization for ranking ensembles.
Textual Context Analysis for Information Retrieval.
A Test Collection for Matching Patients to Clinical Trials.
Enhanced results for web search.
Reputation analysis with a ranked sentiment-lexicon.
Interesting nuggets and their impact on definitional question answering.
ALF: a client side logger and server for capturing user interactions in web applications.
Identifying comparative sentences in text documents.
Learning for Efficient Supervised Query Expansion via Two-stage Feature Selection.
Word Sense Disambiguation Using Machine-Readable Dictionaries.
TFMAP: optimizing MAP for top-n context-aware recommendation.
Emotion tagging for comments of online news by meta classification with heterogeneous information sources.
Improving text classification accuracy using topic modeling over an additional corpus.
ReCoM: reinforcement clustering of multi-type interrelated data objects.
A New Approach to Unsupervised Text Summarization.
Exploiting User and Business Attributes for Personalized Business Recommendation.
A scalable assistant librarian: hierarchical subject classification of books.
Hill climbing algorithms for content-based retrieval of similar configurations.
ExWrap: semi-automatic wrapper generation by example.
On predicting religion labels in microblogging networks.
Personalize web search results with user's location.
Modeling expert finding as an absorbing random walk.
Question-answering by predictive annotation.
Predicting Query Times.
Real-time automatic tag recommendation.
The role of network distance in linkedin people search.
ICA and SOM in text document analysis.
A comparison of general vs personalised affective models for the prediction of topical relevance.
UQV100: A Test Collection with Query Variability.
Information retrieval for e-discovery.
Finding Topic Words for Hierarchical Summarization.
Competence-based song recommendation.
Why spectral retrieval works.
Probability Kinematics in Information Retrieval.
Analysis of anchor text for web search.
A Language for Queries on Structure and Contents of Textual.
A Study of the Overlap Among Document Representations.
Integrated Information Retrieval in a Knowledge Worker Support System.
Query based event extraction along a timeline.
Generic soft pattern models for definitional question answering.
Comparing client and server dwell time estimates for click-level satisfaction prediction.
Exploiting ontologies for automatic image annotation.
On the importance of preserving the part-order in shape retrieval.
Bead: Explorations in Information Visualization.
Panel: Building and Using Test Collections.
Evaluation by Highly Relevant Documents.
Achieving high accuracy retrieval using intra-document term ranking.
Natural language and the information layer.
Group matrix factorization for scalable topic modeling.
Implementation of relevance feedback for content-based music retrieval based on user prefences.
Merging retrieval results in hierarchical peer-to-peer networks.
Effect of varying number of documents in blind feedback: analysis of the 2003 NRRC RIA workshop "bf_numdocs" experiment suite.
Hidden Markov models for automatic annotation and content-based retrieval of images and video.
Music modeling with random fields.
Using clustering to enhance text classification.
A tool for comparative IR evaluation on component level.
Contextual video advertising system using scene information inferred from video scripts.
Effects of task and domain on searcher attention.
Document clustering with universum.
On the information difference between standard retrieval models.
Personalizing information retrieval for multi-session tasks: the roles of task stage and task type.
Using small XML elements to support relevance.
Interactive Internet search: keyword, directory and query reformulation mechanisms compared.
On theme location discovery for travelogue services.
NeuroIR 2015: Neuro-Physiological Methods in IR Research.
An information-theoretic account of static index pruning.
Unconscious Physiological Effects of Search Latency on Users and Their Click Behaviour.
A platform for Okapi-based contextual information retrieval.
Theoretical benchmarks of XML retrieval.
Quantative analysis of the impact of judging inconsistency on the performance of relevance feedback.
Adapted B-CUBED Metrics to Unbalanced Datasets.
Generation of user profiles for information filtering - research agenda.
Type less, find more: fast autocompletion search with a succinct index.
The utility of linguistic rules in opinion mining.
Learning to personalize trending image search suggestion.
Panel: Hypertext: "Growing Up?".
Acquisition of instance attributes via labeled and related instances.
Predicting quality flaws in user-generated content: the case of wikipedia.
Converting on-line bilingual dictionaries from human-readable to machine-readable form.
On the Applicability of Delicious for Temporal Search on Web Archives.
Updating collection representations for federated search.
Exploring term temporality for pseudo-relevance feedback.
Towards an adaptive and task-specific ranking mechanism in Web searching.
Automatic Information Extraction from Web Pages.
Document Contents Representation Model of Sentence Retrieval System SCAT-IR.
Ranking with multiple hyperplanes.
Dynamic visualization of music classification systems.
A Simple Enhancement for Ad-hoc Information Retrieval via Topic Modelling.
Applying ranking SVM in query relaxation.
QuickScorer: A Fast Algorithm to Rank Documents with Additive Ensembles of Regression Trees.
Conceptual Representation for Knowledge Bases and "Intelligent" Information Retrieval Systems.
Multidimensional relevance modeling via psychometrics and crowdsourcing.
Refining search results with facet landscapes.
An adaptive evidence weighting method for medical record search.
Learning to Extract Local Events from the Web.
TIRS: A Topological Information Retrieval System Satisfying the Requirements of the Waller-Kraft Wish List.
CollabSum: exploiting multiple document clustering for collaborative single document summarizations.
The New English Oxford English Dictionary and its Potential Users: Some Preliminary Comments.
The Relational Data File and the Decision Problem for Classes of Proper Formulas.
Context aware query classification using dynamic query window and relationship net.
RDF Xpress: a flexible expressive RDF search engine.
Authorship attribution with thousands of candidate authors.
User-centered interface design for cross-language information retrieval.
From federated to aggregated search.
The bag-of-repeats representation of documents.
On multiword entity ranking in peer-to-peer search.
A framework for manipulating and searching multiple retrieval types.
Is relevance hard work?: evaluating the effort of making relevant assessments.
Boosting multi-kernel locality-sensitive hashing for scalable image retrieval.
Caching search engine results over incremental indices.
Personalized document re-ranking based on Bayesian probabilistic matrix factorization.
Automatic image annotation by using concept-sensitive salient objects for image content representation.
Information Retrieval using a Singular Value Decomposition Model of Latent Semantic Structure.
Elements of the Randomized Combinatorial File Structure.
The patent retrieval task in the fourth NTCIR workshop.
Sub-document Timestamping of Web Documents.
Question Answering with Knowledge Base, Web and Beyond.
Answering complex questions with random walk models.
A Self-Organizing Semantic Map for Information Retrieval.
Performance in FERRET: A Conceptual Information Retrieval System.
On-line spam filter fusion.
Subtopic Structuring for Full-Length Document Access.
Multi-labelled classification using maximum entropy method.
The power of naive query segmentation.
Fundamental Properties of Aboutness (poster abstract).
Predicting eBay listing conversion.
Interleaved Evaluation for Retrospective Summarization and Prospective Notification on Document Streams.
A reranking model for genomics aspect search.
Cluster links prediction for literature based discovery using latent structure and semantic features.
Data Compression Techniques for Economic Processing of Large Commercial Files.
Amilcare: adaptive information extraction for document annotation.
New Techniques for Open-Vocabulary Spoken Document Retrieval.
Random walks on the click graph.
IMRank: influence maximization via finding self-consistent ranking.
Improved query performance prediction using standard deviation.
Learning to rank audience for behavioral targeting.
Specifying Queries as Relational Expressions.
EAIMS: Emergency Analysis Identification and Management System.
Visual summarization of web pages.
Automatic generation of overview timelines.
A Common Architecture for Different Text Processing Techniques in an Information Retrieval Environment.
Improving biomedical document retrieval using domain knowledge.
Promoting User Engagement and Learning in Amorphous Search Tasks.
Word sense disambiguation in information retrieval revisited.
Sumblr: continuous summarization of evolving tweet streams.
Topic Quality Metrics Based on Distributed Word Representations.
Analysis of a low-dimensional linear model under recommendation attacks.
Utility-based information distillation over temporally sequenced documents.
Strict and vague interpretation of XML-retrieval queries.
Searching databases for sematically-related schemas.
On the Construction of Effective Vocabularies for Information Retrieval.
Search Result Prefetching Using Cursor Movement.
When Watson Went to Work: Leveraging Cognitive Computing in the Real World.
An Evaluation of Phrasal and Clustered Representations on a Text Categorization Task.
Estimating Effective Display Size in Online Retrieval Systems.
Understanding re-finding behavior in naturalistic email interaction logs.
Assessing the effectiveness of pen-based input queries.
Coefficients for Combining Concept Classes in a Collection.
Understanding and using contextual information in recommender systems.
Combining error-correcting output codes and model-refinement for text categorization.
Detecting quilted web pages at scale.
A study of learning a merge model for multilingual information retrieval.
Evaluating a Content Based Image Retrieval System.
Retrieval evaluation with incomplete information.
On the Effectiveness of Contextualisation Techniques in Spoken Query Spoken Content Retrieval.
Effectiveness of a Graphical Display of Retrieval Results.
Semi-supervised spam filtering: does it work?
A Comparison of Cache Blocking Methods for Fast Execution of Ensemble-based Score Computation.
Cognitive Activity during Web Search.
A bipartite graph based social network splicing method for person name disambiguation.
Crosslingual location search.
ScentBar: A Query Suggestion Interface Visualizing the Amount of Missed Relevant Information for Intrinsically Diverse Search.
User-Oriented Document Clustering: A Framework for Learning in Information Retrieval.
Multi-Faceted Recall of Continuous Active Learning for Technology-Assisted Review.
Is Sven Seven?: A Search Intent Module for Children.
The impact of corpus size on question answering performance.
Identifying similar people in professional social networks with discriminative probabilistic models.
VisualSum: an interactive multi-document summarizationsystem using visualization.
A collective topic model for milestone paper discovery.
Evaluating the impact of selection noise in community-based web search.
Using PageRank to infer user preferences.
Necessary and frequent terms in queries.
Noun sense induction using web search results.
On automatically tagging web documents from examples.
Document classification by topic labeling.
Generalizing PageRank: damping functions for link-based ranking algorithms.
Effects of expertise differences in synchronous social Q&A.
Cost-Aware Result Caching for Meta-Search Engines.
Evaluating different methods of estimating retrieval quality for resource selection.
Relevance Feedback Retrieval of Time Series Data.
Matching resumes and jobs based on relevance models.
Configurable indexing and ranking for XML information retrieval.
Building bridges for web query classification.
The influence of basic tokenization on biomedical document retrieval.
Web retrieval: the role of users.
Social tag prediction.
Sentiment analysis of user comments for one-class collaborative filtering over ted talks.
P-Trees: Storage Efficient Multiway Trees.
Document layout and color driven image retrieval.
A query and patient understanding framework for medical records search.
Challenges and Opportunities in Online Evaluation of Search Engines.
Influential nodes selection: a data reconstruction perspective.
Gibberish, Assistant, or Master?: Using Tweets Linking to News for Extractive Single-Document Summarization.
Dynamically Integrating Item Exposure with Rating Prediction in Collaborative Filtering.
Information-behaviour modeling with external cues.
Opinion Spammer Detection in Web Forum.
Just-for-me: an adaptive personalization system for location-aware social music recommendation.
A utility theoretic approach to determining optimal wait times in distributed information retrieval.
Evaluating a Probabilistic Model for Cross-Lingual Information Retrieval.
Estimation of statistical translation models based on mutual information for ad hoc information retrieval.
Random walk term weighting for information retrieval.
A flexible extension of XPath to improve XML querying.
Modeling concept dynamics for large scale music search.
Relevance reedback with a small number of relevance judgements: incremental relevance feedback vs. document clustering.
Learning to Rank Personalized Search Results in Professional Networks.
A Theory of Term Weighting Based on Exploratory Data Analysis.
Image based gisting in CLIR.
Rpref: a generalization of Bpref towards graded relevance judgments.
PAAP: prefetch-aware admission policies for query results cache in web search engines.
Understanding Temporal Query Intent.
One-Time Complete Indexing of Text: Theory and Practice.
Collaborative Ranking with Social Relationships for Top-N Recommendations.
Building a Self-Learning Search Engine: From Research to Business.
A scalability analysis of classifiers in text categorization.
VenueMusic: A Venue-Aware Music Recommender System.
Context- and Content-aware Embeddings for Query Rewriting in Sponsored Search.
Evaluation of Evaluation in Information Retrieval.
Learning by Example: Training Users with High-quality Query Suggestions.
A dual index model for contextual information retrieval.
Scalable Semantic Matching of Queries to Ads in Sponsored Search Advertising.
Learning to rank social update streams.
Learning search tasks in queries and web pages via graph regularization.
Language intent models for inferring user browsing behavior.
Statistical feature extraction for cross-language web content quality assessment.
A New Method of Weighting Query Terms for Ad-Hoc Retrieval.
Context-aware web search abandonment prediction.
Building a filtering test collection for TREC 2002.
Multimedia information retrieval from recorded presentations.
A 2-poisson model for probabilistic coreference of named entities for improved text retrieval.
EvaluatIR: an online tool for evaluating and comparing IR systems.
When more is less: the paradox of choice in search engine use.
Generic similarity search engine demonstrated by an image retrieval application.
wikiSearch: enabling interactivity in search.
A unified inverted index for an efficient image and text retrieval.
Topic prerogative feature selection using multiple query examples for automatic video retrieval.
Two-stage query segmentation for information retrieval.
Robust sparse rank learning for non-smooth ranking measures.
Learning in a pairwise term-term proximity framework for information retrieval.
Leveraging sources of collective wisdom on the web for discovering technology synergies.
Visualizing the problems with the INEX topics.
Comparing both relevance and robustness in selection of web ranking functions.
Personalizing information retrieval using task features, topic knowledge, and task product.
Query term ranking based on search results overlap.
Examination and enhancement of a ring-structured graphical search interface based on usability testing.
Combining Semantic and Syntactic Document Classifiers to Improve First Story Detection.
Fast document-at-a-time query processing using two-tier indexes.
Document Classification, Indexing and Abstracting May be Inherently Difficult Problems.
ProbFuse: a probabilistic approach to data fusion.
Match the news: a firefox extension for real-time news recommendation.
News to go: hierarchical text summarization for mobile devices.
Text genre classification with genre-revealing and subject-revealing features.
The boomerang effect: retrieving scientific documents via the network of references and citations.
Image Organization and Retrieval with Automatically Constructed Feature Vectors.
Positional relevance model for pseudo-relevance feedback.
On the relationship between effectiveness and accessibility.
Hierarchical approach to term suggestion device.
Choices and constraints: research goals and approaches in information retrieval (part 2).
An Approach to Research in File Organization.
An IR-based evaluation framework for web search query segmentation.
Vertical selection in the presence of unlabeled verticals.
End User Behavior on an Online Information Retrieval System: A Computer Monitoring Study.
Distributional Clustering of Words for Text Classification.
Collaborative Information Seeking: Art and Science of Achieving 1+1>2 in IR.
Less is more: probabilistic models for retrieving fewer relevant documents.
SPIN: searching personal information networks.
X-Site: a workplace search tool for software engineers.
Document features predicting assessor disagreement.
Do thumbnail previews help users make better relevance decisions about web search results?.
On per-topic variance in IR evaluation.
An Information Retrieval System Based on Artificial Intelligence Techniques.
Short text classification using very few words.
Novelty and redundancy detection in adaptive filtering.
The Efficiency of Inverted Index and Cluster Searches.
Modeling dual role preferences for trust-aware recommendation.
Using the cross-entropy method to re-rank search results.
Which Information Sources are More Effective and Reliable in Video Search.
Exploiting XML structure to improve information retrieval in peer-to-peer systems.
The role of knowledge in conceptual retrieval: a study in the domain of clinical medicine.
Live visual relevance feedback for query formulation.
Re-ranking approach to classification in large-scale power-law distributed category systems.
Ice-tea: an interactive cross-language search engine with translation enhancement.
Knowledge-intensive conceptual retrieval and passage extraction of biomedical literature.
Influence of Vertical Result in Web Search Examination.
SCAN: Designing and Evaluating User Interfaces to Support Retrieval From Speech Archives.
An Experimental Framework for Email Categorization and Management.
From one tree to a forest: a unified solution for structured web data extraction.
Automatic Identification and Contextual Reformulation of Implicit System-Related Queries.
Bridging the digital divide: understanding information access practices in an indian village community.
DOM based content extraction via text density.
A candidate filtering mechanism for fast top-k query processing on modern cpus.
Time-based relevance models.
Si-Fi: interactive similar item finder.
Load-sensitive CPU Power Management for Web Search Engines.
A bayesian logistic regression model for active relevance feedback.
RecSys for distributed events: investigating the influence of recommendations on visitor plans.
Probability ranking principle via optimal expected rank.
Evaluating medical information retrieval.
Querying Office Systems About Document Roles.
Faster temporal range queries over versioned text.
A tag-based personalized item recommendation system using tensor modeling and topic model approaches.
Sample selection for dictionary-based corpus compression.
Online Query Refinement on Information Retrieval Systems: A Process Model of Searcher/System Interactions.
On measuring social friend interest similarities in recommender systems.
The On-Line Interface of Library Management and Document Retrieval Systems.
The Newspaper Image Database: Empirical Supported Analysis of Users' Typology and Word Association Clusters.
Associative tag recommendation exploiting multiple textual features.
Guide focused crawler efficiently and effectively using on-line topical importance estimation.
On statistical analysis and optimization of information retrieval effectiveness metrics.
Faster upper bounding of intersection sizes.
Feature Selection for Polyphonic Music Retrieval.
Predicting lifespans of popular tweets in microblog.
Kinship contextualization: utilizing the preceding and following structural elements.
Learning similarity functions for topic detection in online reputation monitoring.
Partitioned Posting Files: A Parallel Inverted File Structure for Information Retrieval.
Guessing Morphology from Terms and Corpora.
Detecting synonyms in social tagging systems to improve content retrieval.
Cumulative citation recommendation: classification vs. ranking.
IFind: A Web Image Search Engine.
A subjunctive exploratory search interface to support media studies researchers.
An Approach to Image Retrieval from Large Image Databases.
A study of topic similarity measures.
Leveraging Context-Free Grammar for Efficient Inverted Index Compression.
Ranking tags in resource collections.
Context-based question-answering evaluation.
Twitter Sentiment Analysis with Deep Convolutional Neural Networks.
Sensor-aided mobile information management and retrieval.
Parallel Text Retrieval on a High Performance Super Computer Using the Vector Space Model.
From Design to Analysis: Conducting Controlled Laboratory Experiments with Users.
Improving collection selection with overlap awareness in P2P search engines.
Relevance judgments between TREC and Non-TREC assessors.
Finding and filtering information for children.
A General Linear Mixed Models Approach to Study System Component Effects.
On the Cost of Phrase-Based Ranking.
Visual concept-based selection of query expansions for spoken content retrieval.
Network Information Retrieval (Workshop Abstract).
Using Structural Representations of Anomalous States of Knowledge for Choosing Document Retrieval Strategies.
A two-stage model for blog feed search.
Faster and smaller inverted indices with treaps.
Tuning before feedback: combining ranking discovery and blind feedback for robust retrieval.
Interacting with Financial Data using Natural Language.
Spectral geometry for simultaneously clustering and ranking query search results.
Souvenir: flexible note-taking tool to pinpoint and share media highlights.
Learning Maximal Marginal Relevance Model via Directly Optimizing Diversity Evaluation Measures.
Towards Vandalism Detection in Knowledge Bases: Corpus Construction and Analysis.
New assessment criteria for query suggestion.
Adaptive diversification of recommendation results via latent factor portfolio.
Topical link analysis for web search.
Modeling Document Novelty with Neural Tensor Network for Search Result Diversification.
Quantum haystacks.
Signed Link Analysis in Social Media Networks.
Our House, in the Middle of Our Tweets.
Summarization System by Identifying Influential Blogs.
Visual Analysis of Weblog Content.
A Tale of Cities: Urban Biases in Volunteered Geographic Information.
How to Overcome Tiredness: Estimating Topic-Mood Associations.
Looking at the Blogosphere Topology through Different Lenses.
Automatic Estimation of Bloggers' Gender.
Searching Twitter: Separating the Tweet from the Chaff.
Expressing Social Relationships on the Blog through Links and Comments.
Tags are not metadata, but "just more content" - to some people.
SocioBiblog: Enabling Communication on Bibliography with Semantic Blogging.
Moving from Static to Dynamic Modeling of Expertise for Question Routing in CQA Sites.
Investigations in Collaborative Multi-Party Discourse.
Modeling Youth Civic Engagement in a New World of Networked Publics.
StepGreen.org: Increasing Energy Saving Behaviors via Social Networks.
Who Should I Follow? Recommending People in Directed Social Networks.
On the Evolution of Wikipedia.
Managing Bad News in Social Media: A Case Study on Domino's Pizza Crisis.
Brexit? Analyzing Opinion on the UK-EU Referendum within Twitter.
Fusion Approach to Finding opinions in Blogosphere.
Goodreads Versus Amazon: The Effect of Decoupling Book Reviewing And Book Selling.
Political Polarization on Twitter.
Event Detection and Visualization for Social Text Streams.
TwitterViz: A Robotics System for Remote Data Visualization.
Is Twitter a Good Place for Asking Questions? A Characterization Study.
Assessing the Structural Correlates between Friendship Networks and Conversational Agency in Facebook Groups.
Get Back! You Don't Know Me Like That: The Social Mediation of Fact Checking Interventions in Twitter Conversations.
Selecting Quality Twitter Content for Events.
Beyond Trending Topics: Real-World Event Identification on Twitter.
An Image Is Worth More than a Thousand Favorites: Surfacing the Hidden Beauty of Flickr Pictures.
Social Media Participation in an Activist Movement for Racial Equality.
Automatic Versus Human Navigation in Information Networks.
Rating Friends Without Making Enemies.
Efficient Clustering of Short Messages into General Domains.
Socio-Legal Analysis of Criminal Sentences: A Preliminary Study.
Learning the Relationships between Drug, Symptom, and Medical Condition Mentions in Social Media.
The Wisdom of Bookies? Sentiment Analysis Versus. the NFL Point Spread.
Exploring Social-Historical Ties on Location-Based Social Networks.
Transient News Crowds in Social Media.
A Comparison of Information Seeking Using Search Engines and Social Networks.
TweetMotif: Exploratory Search and Topic Summarization for Twitter.
Are You Charlie or Ahmed? Cultural Pluralism in Charlie Hebdo Response on Twitter.
Identifying Platform Effects in Social Media Data.
It Is Not Only About Grievances: Emotional Dynamics in Social Media During the Brazilian Protests.
Hierarchical Bayesian Models for Latent Attribute Detection in Social Media.
Blissfully Happy or "Ready toFight": Varying Interpretations of Emoji.
On Modeling Brand Preferences in Item Adoptions.
Great Question! Question Quality in Community Q&A.
Answering Complex Queries in an Online Community Network.
Understanding Actionable Knowledge in Social Media: BBC Question Time and Twitter, a Case Study.
Two Paths of Glory - Structural Positions and Trajectories of Websites within Their Topical Territory.
Structural Dynamics of Knowledge Networks.
Improving Text Clustering with Social Tagging.
Using Co-Following for Personalized Out-of-Context Twitter Friend Recommendation.
Finding Sensitive Accounts on Twitter: An Automated Approach Based on Follower Anonymity.
Exploring Personal Attributes from Unprotected Interactions.
Making Use of Derived Personality: The Case of Social Media Ad Targeting.
An Empirical Study of Geographic User Activity Patterns in Foursquare.
A Ranking Based Model for Automatic Image Annotation in a Social Network.
Leveraging Browsing Patterns for Topic Discovery and Photostream Recommendation.
Characterizing Microblogs with Topic Models.
Voices of Vlogging.
Modeling Response Time in Digital Human Communication.
Lightweight Contextual Ranking of City Pictures: Urban Sociology to the Rescue.
What Makes a Blog a Blog? Exploring User Conceptualizations of an Old "New" Online Medium.
Have You Heard?: How Gossip Flows Through Workplace Email.
Where Is the Soho of Rome? Measures and Algorithms for Finding Similar Neighborhoods in Cities.
Of Pins and Tweets: Investigating How Users Behave Across Image- and Text-Based Social Networks.
Trust Propagation with Mixed-Effects Models.
Targeted Interest-Driven Advertising in Cities Using Twitter.
User Acceptance of Micro-Blogging in the Enterprise.
Crossing Media Streams with Sentiment: Domain Adaptation in Blogs, Reviews and Twitter.
Recommending Fresh URLs Using Twitter Lists.
Psychological Effects of Urban Crime Gleaned from Social Media.
Values in Words: Using Language to Evaluate and Understand Personal Values.
Detecting Comments on News Articles in Microblogs.
On the k-Anonymization of Time-Varying and Multi-Layer Social Graphs.
The Quality of Online Answers to Parents Who Suspect That Their Child Has an Autism Spectrum Disorder.
Analyzing and Detecting Opinion Spam on a Large-scale Dataset via Temporal and Spatial Patterns.
Using Organizational Social Networks to Predict Employee Engagement.
Local Knowledge Matters for Crowdsourcing Systems: Experience from Transferring an American Site to China.
Widespread Worry and the Stock Market.
On the Interplay between Social and Topical Structure.
Definition and Multi-Dimensional Comparative Analysis of Ad Hoc Communities in Twitter.
Space Collapse: Reinforcing, Reconfiguring and Enhancing Chinese Social Practices through WeChat.
Detecting Friendship Within Dynamic Online Interaction Networks.
Participation Barriers to Youth Civic Engagement in Social Media.
Coordination and Efficiency in Decentralized Collaboration.
Why do People Retweet? Anti-Homophily Wins the Day!
The Road to Popularity: The Dilution of Growing Audience on Twitter.
Mathematical Models of Fads Explain the Temporal Dynamics of Internet Memes.
Faceplant: Impression (Mis)management in Facebook Status Updates.
On Analyzing Hashtags in Twitter.
Creating Conversations: An Automated Dialog System.
That's What Friends Are For: Inferring Location in Online Social Media Platforms Based on Social Relationships.
Impact and Diffusion of Sentiment in Political Communication - An Empirical Analysis of Political Weblogs.
Reliability of Data Collection Methods in Social Media Research.
To Be a Star Is Not Only Metaphoric: From Popularity to Social Linkage.
The Many Shades of Anonymity: Characterizing Anonymous Social Media Content.
Exploiting User Interest on Social Media for Aggregating Diverse Data and Predicting Interest.
Identifying Representative Textual Sources in Blog Networks.
Deciphering the 2016 U.S. Presidential Campaign in the Twitter Sphere: A Comparison of the Trumpists and Clintonists.
The Lifecyle of a Youtube Video: Phases, Content and Popularity.
Towards Lifestyle Understanding: Predicting Home and Vacation Locations from User's Online Photo Collections.
Determining the Presence of Political Parties in Social Circles.
Stuff IBMers Say: Microblogs as an Expression of Organizational Culture.
What's in a Name? Understanding the Interplay between Titles, Content, and Communities in Social Media.
Analyzing Social Event Participants for a Single Organizer.
Mining Pro-ISIS Radicalisation Signals from Social Media Users.
Analyzing the Targets of Hate in Online Social Media.
Multilayer Brokerage in Geo-Social Networks.
Modeling Public Mood and Emotion: Twitter Sentiment and Socio-Economic Phenomena.
EigenTransitions with Hypothesis Testing: The Anatomy of Urban Mobility.
Gender Asymmetries in Reality and Fiction: The Bechdel Test of Social Media.
Big Questions for Social Media Big Data: Representativeness, Validity and Other Methodological Pitfalls.
Who Are Like-Minded: Mining User Interest Similarity in Online Social Networks.
I Don't Have a Photograph, But You Can Have My Footprints - Revealing the Demographics of Location Data.
Measuring the Efficiency of Charitable Giving with Content Analysis and Crowdsourcing.
You Are Known by How You Vlog: Personality Impressions and Nonverbal Behavior in YouTube.
Enhancing Technical Q&A Forums with CiteHistory.
Predicting Group Success in Meetup.
Artist Popularity: Do Web and Social Music Services Agree?
Predictability of Popularity: Gaps between Prediction and Understanding.
Calling All Facebook Friends: Exploring Requests for Help on Facebook.
Ladies First: Analyzing Gender Roles and Behaviors in Pinterest.
Magnet News: You Choose the Polarity of What You Read.
Breaking the News: First Impressions Matter on Online News.
Characterizing Social Relations Via NLP-Based Sentiment Analysis.
On the Correlation between Topic and User Behaviour in Online Communities.
Using Group Membership Markers for Group Identification.
Crowds, Gigs, and Super Sellers: A Measurement Study of a Supply-Driven Crowdsourcing Marketplace.
Modeling User Attitude toward Controversial Topics in Online Social Media.
Detecting Chinese Wish Messages in Social Media: An Empirical Study.
Content Based Recommendation and Summarization in the Blogosphere.
Community Structure and Information Flow in Usenet: Improving Analysis with a Thread Ownership Model.
Collecting and Sharing Observations with Semantic Support.
Gesundheit! Modeling Contagion through Facebook News Feed.
Optimal Heterophily for Word-of-Mouth Diffusion.
User Evaluation of a System for Classifying and Displaying Political Viewpoints of Weblogs.
What Are They Blogging About? Personality, Topic and Motivation in Blogs.
Motivational, Structural and Tenure Factors that Impact Online Community Photo Sharing.
Finding Opinionated Blogs Using Statistical Classifiers and Lexical Features.
Network Analysis of an Emergent Massively Collaborative Creation Community: How Can People Create Videos Collaboratively without Collaboration?
Blogging Together: An Examination of Group Blogs.
An Examination of Language Use in Online Dating Profiles.
Connecting Corresponding Identities across Communities.
Characterization of FriendFeed - A Web-based Social Aggregation Service.
Seeking and Offering Expertise Across Categories: A Sustainable Mechanism Works for Baidu Knows.
Targeting Sentiment Expressions through Supervised Ranking of Linguistic Configurations.
Connecting Users with Similar Interests across Multiple Web Services.
Traveling Path Recommendation Using Temporal Transit Patterns.
Community Cores: Removing Size Bias from Community Detection.
Topic Modeling in Twitter: Aggregating Tweets by Conversations.
What Were the Tweets About? Topical Associations between Public Events and Twitter Feeds.
Using Tags and Clustering to Identify Topic-Relevant Blogs.
How You Met Me.
Event mining from the Blogosphere using topic words.
Understanding Sentiment of People from News Articles: Temporal Sentiment Analysis of Social Events.
Narrowing the Social Gap among People Involved in Global Dialog: Automatic Emotion Detection in Blog Posts.
Tweeting the Mind and Instagramming the Heart: Exploring Differentiated Content Sharing on Social Media.
The Dark Side of Micro-Task Marketplaces: Characterizing Fiverr and Automatically Detecting Crowdturfing.
On the Structure, Properties and Utility of Internal Corporate Blogs.
Using Twitter During an Academic Conference: The #iswc2009 Use-Case.
QA with Attitude: Exploiting Opinion Type Analysis for Improving Question Answering in On-line Discussions and the News.
Escaping Information Poverty through Internet Newsgroups.
Analyzing Temporal Collocations in Weblogs.
Using Blog Properties to Improve Retrieval.
Preface.
Using Ontologies to Strengthen Folksonomies and Enrich Information Retrieval in Weblogs: Theoretical background and corporate use-case.
On Estimating The Geographic Distribution of Social Media.
Finding Gold in Intranet Data: A Comparison of Mined and Surveyed Social Networks.
An Activity-based Perspective of Collaborative Tagging.
Observations on Failure in Blogs.
Finding patterns in blog shapes and blog evolution.
Location3: How Users Share and Respond to Location-Based Data on Social.
Analyzing Trends in the Blogosphere Using Human-Centered Analysis and Visualization Tools.
Classifying Political Orientation on Twitter: It's Not Easy!
Diffusion of Recommendation through a Trust Network.
Structural Link Analysis from User Profiles and Friends Networks: A Feature Construction Approach.
Connecting Mutually Influencing Bloggers.
A Penny for Your Tweets: Campaign Contributions and Capitol Hill Microblogs.
Prominence Ranking in Graphs with Community Structure.
User Behaviors in Newsworthy Rumors: A Case Study of Twitter.
Understanding Anti-Vaccination Attitudes in Social Media.
Social Lens: Personalization Around User Defined Collections for Filtering Enterprise Message Streams.
How to Ask for a Favor: A Case Study on the Success of Altruistic Requests.
Modeling Diffusion in Social Networks Using Network Properties.
An Overview of SMOB 2: Open, Semantic and Distributed Microblogging.
Users Joining Multiple Sites: Distributions and Patterns.
Comparing Events Coverage in Online News and Social Media: The Case of Climate Change.
CrowdE: Filtering Tweets for Direct Customer Engagements.
Visualizing Topic Models.
Areca: Online Comparison of Research Results.
Event Detection in Twitter.
Fusing Audio, Textual, and Visual Features for Sentiment Analysis of News Videos.
User Interest and Interaction Structure in Online Forums.
If Likes Were Votes: An Empirical Study on the 2011 Italian Administrative Elections.
Extracting Meta Statements from the Blogosphere.
Understanding Communities via Hashtag Engagement: A Clustering Based Approach.
Creating Stories: Social Curation of Twitter Messages.
Taxonomy-Based Discovery and Annotation of Functional Areas in the City.
Relevance Modeling for Microblog Summarization.
Leveraging Product Adopter Information from Online Reviews for Product Recommendation.
Degeneracy-Based Real-Time Sub-Event Detection in Twitter Stream.
Social Media Is NOT that Bad! The Lexical Quality of Social Media.
Trading Strategies to Exploit Blog and News Sentiment.
Counting on Friends: Cues to Perceived Trustworthiness in Facebook Profiles.
The Social World of Twitter: Topics, Geography, and Emotions.
Don't Be Spoiled by Your Friends: Spoiler Detection in TV Program Tweets.
Two Tales of the World: Comparison of Widely Used World News Datasets GDELT and EventRegistry.
Changing Names in Online News Comments at the New York Times.
Impact of Entity Disambiguation Errors on Social Network Properties.
Analysis and Prediction of Question Topic Popularity in Community Q&A Sites: A Case Study of Quora.
Social Cues and Interest in Reading Political News Stories.
Time-Aware Latent Concept Expansion for Microblog Search.
Epidemic Intelligence for the Crowd, by the Crowd.
Predicting the Speed, Scale, and Range of Information Diffusion in Twitter.
Does Bad News Go Away Faster?
Understanding the Roles and Uses of Web Tutorials.
Evolution of Experts in Question Answering Communities.
Defense Mechanism or Socialization Tactic? Improving Wikipedia's Notifications to Rejected Contributors.
The News Cycle's Influence on Social Media Activity.
Newsworthiness and Network Gatekeeping on Twitter: The Role of Social Deviance.
Finding Influential Authors in Brand-Page Communities.
Scalable Event-Based Clustering of Social Media Via Record Linkage Techniques.
Inferring Sentiment from Web Images with Joint Inference on Visual and Social Cues: A Regulated Matrix Factorization Approach.
Emoticon Style: Interpreting Differences in Emoticons Across Cultures.
A Web-Based System from Data Collection and Community Building.
Emoticons and Phrases: Status Symbols in Social Media.
Link and Triadic Closure Delay: Temporal Metrics for Social Network Dynamics.
A Comparative Study of Demographic Attribute Inference in Twitter.
Can the Ambiance of a Place be Determined by the User Profiles of the People Who Visit It?
Computational Predictors in Online Social Deliberations.
Understanding Public Emotional Reactions on Twitter.
What Kobe Bryant and Britney Spears Have in Common: Mining Wikipedia for Characteristics of Notable Individuals.
How Content, Community, and Engagement Affect the Life Cycles of Online Photo Sharing Groups.
Investigating the Observability of Complex Contagion in Empirical Social Networks.
Emotions, Demographics and Sociability in Twitter Interactions.
Properties, Prediction, and Prevalence of Useful User-Generated Comments for Descriptive Annotation of Social Media Objects.
ePluribus: Ethnicity on Social Networks.
To Buy or to Read: How a Platform Shapes Reviewing Behavior.
Global Dynamics of Online Group Conversations.
Visualizing the "Pulse" of World Cities on Twitter.
Co-Participation Networks Using Comment Information.
Quantifying Political Polarity Based on Bipartite Opinion Networks.
A Bayesian Graphical Model to Discover Latent Events from Twitter.
Mental Health Discourse on reddit: Self-Disclosure, Social Support, and Anonymity.
A Qualitative Examination of Topical Tweet and Retweet Practices.
Para 'Normal' Activity: On the Distribution of Average Ratings.
Grief-Stricken in a Crowd: The Language of Bereavement and Distress in Social Media.
Tweeting from the Town Square: Measuring Geographic Local Networks.
Audience and the Use of Minority Languages on Twitter.
Measuring Post Traumatic Stress Disorder in Twitter.
Memes Online: Extracted, Subtracted, Injected, and Recollected.
What's in a Like? Motivations for Pressing the Like Button.
Sharing the Loves: Understanding the How and Why of Online Content Curation.
Algorithmically Bypassing Censorship on Sina Weibo with Nondeterministic Homophone Substitutions.
Cross-Community Influence in Discussion Fora.
Tweet Acts: A Speech Act Classifier for Twitter.
Is the Sample Good Enough? Comparing Data from Twitter's Streaming API with Twitter's Firehose.
Hierarchical Estimation Framework of Multi-Label Classifying: A Case of Tweets Classifying into Real Life Aspects.
Factors Affecting End-User Satisfaction on Facebook.
Language Matters In Twitter: A Large Scale Study.
The Emergence of Conventions in Online Social Networks.
Towards an Open-Domain Framework for Distilling the Outcomes of Personal Experiences from Social Media Timelines.
Uncovering User Interaction Dynamics in Online Social Networks.
Using Twitter to Detect and Tag Important Events in Sports Media.
How to Become Famous in the Microblog World.
Bad Apples Spoil the Fun: Quantifying Cheating in Online Gaming.
More Voices Than Ever? Quantifying Media Bias in Networks.
Will Check-in for Badges: Understanding Bias and Misbehavior on Location-Based Social Networks.
Discovering Dedicators with Topic-Based Semantic Social Networks.
Understanding Loneliness in Social Awareness Streams: Expressions and Responses.
Misalignment Between Supply and Demand of Quality Content in Peer Production Communities.
Weblog Analysis for Predicting Correlations in Stock Price Evolutions.
A Study of "Churn" in Tweets and Real-Time Search Queries.
Distinguishing between Topical and Non-Topical Information Diffusion Mechanisms in Social Media.
#bias: Measuring the Tweeting Behavior of Propagandists.
On Unravelling Opinions of Issue Specific-Silent Users in Social Media.
Project Recommendation Using Heterogeneous Traits in Crowdfunding.
A Supervised Approach to Predict Company Acquisition with Factual and Topic Features Using Profiles and News Articles on TechCrunch.
Delta TFIDF: An Improved Feature Space for Sentiment Analysis.
Information Extraction as Link Prediction: Using Curated Citation Networks to Improve Gene Detection.
Analysis of Social Influence in Online Book Reviews.
A Comparative Analysis of Trust-Enhanced Recommenders for Controversial Items.
A Categorical Model for Discovering Latent Structure in Social Annotations.
Salsa: Leveraging Email to Create a Social Network for the Enterprise.
The Use of Weblogs in Spanish Mainstream Media.
Attentio Brand Maps.
Sidelines: An Algorithm for Increasing Diversity in News and Opinion Aggregators.
Does Showing Off Help to Make Friends? Experimenting a Sociological Game on Self-Exhibition and Social Networks.
Responses to Remixing on a Social Media Sharing Website.
Study of Static Classification of Social Spam Profiles in MySpace.
Understanding Musical Diversity via Online Social Media.
CrowdLens: Experimenting with Crowd-Powered Recommendation and Explanation.
Trends in Social Media: Persistence and Decay.
Identifying Users Across Social Tagging Systems.
T-Gram: A Time-Aware Language Model to Predict Human Mobility.
Analyzing Political Trends in the Blogosphere.
A Sentiment-Aware Approach to Community Formation in Social Media.
More of a Receiver Than a Giver: Why Do People Unfollow in Twitter?
Tracking Sentiment and Topic Dynamics from Social Media.
A Data-Driven Study of View Duration on YouTube.
WhichStreams: A Dynamic Approach for Focused Data Capture from Large Social Media.
The Where and When of Finding New Friends: Analysis of a Location-based Social Discovery Network.
Media Landscape in Twitter: A World of New Conventions and Political Diversity.
Mixed Membership Models for Exploring User Roles in Online Fora.
Encouraging Reading of Diverse Political Viewpoints with a Browser Widget.
Keynote Addresses.
Effective Question Recommendation Based on Multiple Features for Question Answering Communities.
Toward Social Causality: An Analysis of Interpersonal Relationships in Online Blogs and Forums.
Twitter Geolocation and Regional Classification via Sparse Coding.
The Effect of Mobile Platforms on Twitter Content Generation.
SearchBuddies: Bringing Search Engines into the Conversation.
On the Study of Diurnal Urban Routines on Twitter.
Structure and Reciprocity in Technology-Centered Q&A Communities.
Crowdphysics: Planned and Opportunistic Crowdsourcing for Physical Tasks.
An Analysis of Exercising Behavior in Online Populations.
Intertemporal Topic Correlations in Online Media: A Comparative Study on Weblogs and News Websites.
Of Men, Women, and Computers: Data-Driven Gender Modeling for Improved User Interfaces.
Pinning Alone? A Study of the Role of Social Ties on Pinterest.
How Does Social Capital Affect Retweets?
Where Is This Tweet From? Inferring Home Locations of Twitter Users.
Enhancing Event Descriptions through Twitter Mining.
Tweetin' in the Rain: Exploring Societal-Scale Effects of Weather on Mood.
Tag Recommendation by Link Prediction Based on Supervised Machine Learning.
Experiments on Motivational Feedback for Crowdsourced Workers.
Tracking the Yak: An Empirical Study of Yik Yak.
Expertise in Social Networks: How Do Experts Differ from Other Users?
Efficient Filtering on Hidden Document Streams.
Modeling Group Dynamics in Virtual Worlds.
Not All Moods Are Created Equal! Exploring Human Emotional States in Social Media.
The Tweets They Are a-Changin: Evolution of Twitter Users and Behavior.
Visualization Tool for Collective Awareness in a Platform of Citizen Proposals.
Social Intellisense: A Task-Embedded Interface to Folksonomies.
Supervised Topic Segmentation of Email Conversations.
A Model of Collaboration-based Reputation for the Social Web.
Feature Sentiment Diversification of User Generated Reviews: The FREuD Approach.
Automatic Group-Interactive Radio Using Social-Networks of Musicians.
Dude, srsly?: The Surprisingly Formal Nature of Twitter's Language.
Content Analytics System for Social Customer Relationship Management.
A Machine Learning Approach to Twitter User Classification.
On the Geo-Indicativeness of Non-Georeferenced Text.
Latent Set Models for Two-Mode Network Data.
Discussion Graphs: Putting Social Media Analysis in Context.
Automatic Summarization of Events from Social Media.
Exploring Millions of Footprints in Location Sharing Services.
CrisisLex: A Lexicon for Collecting and Filtering Microblogged Communications in Crises.
Distributional Footprints of Deceptive Product Reviews.
What MMO Communities Don't Do: A Longitudinal Study of Guilds and Character Leveling, Or Not.
Science, AskScience, and BadScience: On the Coexistence of Highly Related Communities.
Our Grief is Unspeakable: Automatically Measuring the Community Impact of a Tragedy.
Coping With Noise in a Real-World Weblog Crawler and Retrieval System.
Local Networks, Local Topics: Structural and Semantic Proximity in Blogspace.
A Platform for Visually Exploring the Development of Wikipedia Articles.
Getting Acquainted with Groups and Individuals: Information Seeking, Social Uncertainty and Social Network Sites.
Cross Social Media Recommendation.
Motivational Determinants of Participation Trajectories in Wikipedia.
Sequential Voting Promotes Collective Discovery in Social Recommendation Systems.
Mapping the Political Twitterverse: Candidates and Their Followers in the Midterms.
WeDo: End-To-End Computer Supported Collective Action.
Microblogging Inside and Outside the Workplace.
Shirtless and Dangerous: Quantifying Linguistic Signals of Gender Bias in an Online Fiction Writing Community.
Reviving Dormant Ties in an Online Social Network Experiment.
Pub Crawling at Scale: Tapping Untappd to Explore Social Drinking.
Friendship Paradox Redux: Your Friends Are More Interesting Than You.
Measuring and Summarizing Movement in Microblog Postings.
Topical Engagement on Twitter: Using Consistency of Activity as a Means of User Segmentation.
Predicting User Replying Behavior on a Large Online Dating Site.
Audience-Aware Credibility: From Understanding Audience to Establishing Credible Blogs.
CENI: A Hybrid Framework for Efficiently Inferring Information Networks.
Competition and Success in the Meme Pool: A Case Study on Quickmeme.com.
Facebook Use and Social Capital - A Longitudinal Study.
Self-Characterized Illness Phase and Information Needs of Participants in an Online Cancer Forum.
Leveraging Noisy Lists for Social Feed Ranking.
An Evaluation of the Role of Sentiment in Second Screen Microblog Search Tasks.
Identifying Purchase Intent from Social Posts.
Online Social Capital: Mood, Topical and Psycholinguistic Analysis.
A Stratified Learning Approach for Predicting the Popularity of Twitter Idioms.
Glaucus: Exploiting the Wisdom of Crowds for Location-Based Queries in Mobile Environments.
People Are Strange When You're a Stranger: Impact and Influence of Bots on Social Networks.
Power of Earned Advertising on Social Network Services: A Case Study of Friend Tagging on Facebook.
Conversing in Reflective Glory: A Systematic Study Using National Football League Games.
Modeling Personality Influences on YouTube Usage.
Sentiment Prediction Using Collaborative Filtering.
Workshops.
Modelling Action Cascades in Social Networks.
Why Won't Aliens Talk to Us? Content and Community Dynamics in Online Citizen Science.
Docs.com: Social File Sharing in Facebook.
Learning the Nature of Information in Social Networks.
Future Link Prediction in the Blogosphere for Recommendation.
Network Weirdness: Exploring the Origins of Network Paradoxes.
Trust, Reputation and the Small Firm: Building Online Brand Reputation for SMEs.
The Value of Completing Crowdfunding Projects.
Seven Months with the Devils: A Long-Term Study of Content Polluters on Twitter.
Coding Together at Scale: GitHub as a Collaborative Social Network.
Signals of Expertise in Public and Enterprise Social Q&A.
Aligning Popularity and Quality in Online Cultural Markets.
War Versus Inspirational in Forrest Gump: Cultural Effects in Tagging Communities.
Perception Differences between the Depressed and Non-Depressed Users in Twitter.
Evaluating Real-Time Search over Tweets.
Emotional Divergence Influences Information Spreading in Twitter.
Measuring User Influence in Twitter: The Million Follower Fallacy.
Where Would You Go this Weekend? Time-Dependent Prediction of User Activity Using Social Network Data.
What's Worthy of Comment? Content and Comment Volume in Political Blogs.
Booming Up the Long Tails: Discovering Potentially Contributive Users in Community-Based Question Answering Services.
Patterns in Interactive Tagging Networks.
Antisocial Behavior in Online Discussion Communities.
Cultural Dimensions in Twitter: Time, Individualism and Power.
A Usability Study of an Access Control System for Group Blogs.
Generate Adjective Sentiment Dictionary for Social Media Sentiment Analysis Using Constrained Nonnegative Matrix Factorization.
New Metrics for Newsblog Credibility.
Social Networks and Reading Bahavior in Blogosphere.
Following Conversational Traces: Creating a corpus with the ICWSM dataset.
Towards Supporting Search over Trending Events with Social Media.
The Emotional and Chromatic Layers of Urban Smells.
Differential Adaptive Diffusion: Understanding Diversity and Learning whom to Trust in Viral Marketing.
Aikuchi: Marking-based Social Navigation System.
Social Browsing on Flickr.
Traffic Characteristics and Communication Patterns in Blogosphere.
Technology-Mediated Citizen Science Participation: A Motivational Model.
Personal Network Aggregation System for Real-time Communication Support.
Groups and Group-Instantiations in Mobile Communities - Detection, Modeling and Applications.
The Perceived Credibility of Online Encyclopedias Among Children.
Two Studies Investigating Gender Differences in Response to Facebook Status Updates.
Automatic Identification and Presentation of Twitter Content for Planned Events.
Temporal Correlation between Social Tags and Emerging Long-Term Trend Detection.
Large-Scale Sentiment Analysis for News and Blogs.
BLOGRANK: Ranking on the blogosphere.
A Crowd-Powered Socially Embedded Search Engine.
When a Movement Becomes a Party: Computational Assessment of New Forms of Political Organization in Social Media.
Modeling Polarizing Topics: When Do Different Political Communities Respond Differently to the Same News?
Exploring Feature Definition and Selection for Sentiment Classifiers.
VADER: A Parsimonious Rule-Based Model for Sentiment Analysis of Social Media Text.
Like Partying? Your Face Says It All. Predicting the Ambiance of Places with Profile Pictures.
Natural Language Processing to the Rescue? Extracting "Situational Awareness" Tweets During Mass Emergency.
Mood and Weather: Feeling the Heat?
Event-Based Clustering for Reducing Labeling Costs of Event-related Microposts.
Preface.
Understanding the Demographics of Twitter Users.
Analysis of Elderly Persons' Social Network: Need for an Appropriate Online Platform.
Modeling Bursty Temporal Pattern of Rumors.
Families on Facebook.
Taking It All In? Visual Attention in Microblog Consumption.
#Bigbirds Never Die: Understanding Social Dynamics of Emergent Hashtags.
Inferring Gender from the Content of Tweets: A Region Specific Example.
Dancing with the Stars,  NBA Games, Politics: An Exploration of Twitter Users' Response to Events.
Freshman or Fresher? Quantifying the Geographic Variation of Language in Online Social Media.
Why Do You Write This? Prediction of Influencers from Word Use.
Can Twitter Replace Newswire for Breaking News?
Self-Presentation of Personality During Online Profile Creation.
Navigation Patterns from and to Social Media.
A Social Identity Approach to Identify Familiar Strangers in a Social Network.
Accessing Social Support and Overcoming Judgment on Social Media among Parents of Children with Special Needs.
Tracking the Trackers: A Large-Scale Analysis of Embedded Web Trackers.
Don't Disturb My Circles! Boundary Preservation Is at the Center of Location-Sharing Concerns.
Distinguishing Knowledge vs Social Capital in Social Media with Roles and Context.
Gephi: An Open Source Software for Exploring and Manipulating Networks.
You Are Where You Edit: Locating Wikipedia Contributors through Edit Histories.
CourseRank: A Closed-Community Social System through the Magnifying Glass.
Characterizing the Portuguese Blogosphere.
Trust Incident Account Model: Preliminary Indicators for Trust Rhetoric and Trust or Distrust in Blogs.
A Utility for Estimating the Relative Contributions of Wiki Authors.
Adaptive Weblog Post Filtering Based on User Browsing History.
Visualizing Cross-Lingual/Cross-Cultural Differences in Concerns in Multilingual Blogs.
Power Imbalance and Rating Systems.
School Bullying in Twitter and Weibo: A Comparative Study.
Scalable Urban Data Collection from the Web.
Building Trust with Corporate Blogs.
Geographic Dissection of the Twitter Network.
Monitoring RSS Feeds Based on User Browsing Pattern.
Unearthing People from the SaND: Relationship Discovery with Social Media in the Enterprise.
Taggin' Tallinn. Piloting Meaning-Building with Locative Content.
Automatic Moderation of Comments in a Large On-line Journalistic Environment.
Analyzing the Political Sentiment of Tweets in Farsi.
Towards Spam Detection at Ping Servers.
The Boardscape: Creating a Super Social Network of Message Boards.
Large-Scale Sentiment Analysis for News and Blogs (system demonstration).
The OASYS 2.0 Opinion Analysis System.
SEEFT: Planned Social Event Discovery and Attribute Extraction by Fusing Twitter and Web Content.
Fitter with Twitter: Understanding Personal Health and Fitness Activity in Social Media.
Trust Amongst Rogues? A Hypergraph Approach for Comparing Clandestine Trust Networks in MMOGs.
CREDBANK: A Large-Scale Social Media Corpus With Associated Credibility Annotations.
An Ethnomethodologically-Informed Approach to Interface Design for Social Interactions around Video Online.
TripEneer: User-Based Travel Plan Recommendation Application.
Sentiment Analysis: Adjectives and Adverbs are Better than Adjectives Alone.
Visual Analysis of Weblog Content.
Geolocation Prediction in Twitter Using Social Networks: A Critical Analysis and Review of Current Practice.
YouRank: Let User Engagement Rank Microblog Search Results.
Feeds That Matter: A Study of Bloglines Subscriptions.
LeadLag LDA: Estimating Topic Specific Leads and Lags of Information Outlets.
Sentiment Mining and Indexing in Opinmind.
New Insights and Methods For Predicting Face-To-Face Contacts.
It's a Man's Wikipedia? Assessing Gender Inequality in an Online Encyclopedia.
Modeling Trust and Influence in the Blogosphere Using Link Polarity.
Who Will Respond to Your Requests for Instant Trouble-Shooting?
Visualizing User-Defined, Discriminative Geo-Temporal Twitter Activity.
The Status Gradient of Trends in Social Media.
Network Sampling Designs for Relational Classification.
MoodViews: Tracking and Searching Mood-Annotated Blog Posts.
The Pulse of News in Social Media: Forecasting Popularity.
Scalable Social Analytics for Live Viral Event Prediction.
Who Acquires Friends Through Social Media and Why? "Rich Get Richer" Versus "Seek and Ye Shall Find".
Towards Analyzing Micro-Blogs for Detection and Classification of Real-Time Intentions.
Around the Water Cooler: Shared Discussion Topics and Contact Closeness in Social Search.
On the Behaviour of Deviant Communities in Online Social Networks.
DUKE: A Solution for Discovering Neighborhood Patterns in Ego Networks.
An Assessment of Intrinsic and Extrinsic Motivation on Task Performance in Crowdsourcing Markets.
Penny for Your Thoughts: Searching for the 50 Cent Party on Sina Weibo.
Exploiting Burstiness in Reviews for Review Spammer Detection.
Event Detection via Communication Pattern Analysis.
What's in Your Tweets? I Know Who You Supported in the UK 2010 General Election.
Why We Filter Our Photos and How It Impacts Engagement.
Privacy Considerations for Public Storytelling.
Networks of Gratitude: Structures of Thanks and User Expectations in Workplace Appreciation Systems.
Interactive Visual Graph Analytics on the Web.
Predicting the Audience Size of a Tweet.
Factors Affecting Response Quantity, Quality, and Speed for Questions Asked Via Social Network Status Messages.
Combating Threats to Collective Attention in Social Media: An Evaluation.
Predicting User Engagement on Twitter with Real-World Events.
Rumor Cascades.
Ephemeral Photowork: Understanding the Mobile Social Photography Ecosystem.
Happy, Nervous or Surprised? Classification of Human Affective States in Social Media.
The Directed Closure Process in Hybrid Social-Information Networks, with an Analysis of Link Formation on Twitter.
Contextualized Sarcasm Detection on Twitter.
Transductive Learning for Real-Time Twitter Search.
Who Did What: Editor Role Identification in Wikipedia.
Comparing Information Diffusion Structure in Weblogs and Microblogs.
Filtering Noisy Web Data by Identifying and Leveraging Users' Contributions.
Social Dynamics of Digg.
Empirical Analysis of User Participation in Online Communities: the Case of Wikipedia.
Working with Friends: Unveiling Working Affinity Features from Facebook Data.
Insights into Internet Memes.
Exploring Text Virality in Social Networks.
When the Wikipedians Talk: Network and Tree Structure of Wikipedia Discussion Pages.
TweetTracker: An Analysis Tool for Humanitarian and Disaster Relief.
Activity Lifespan: An Analysis of User Survival Patterns in Online Knowledge Sharing Communities.
Measure Social Metrics with Sodatech: a Monitoring and Analysis Platform of Big Data.
Do Topic-Dependent Models Improve Microblog Sentiment Estimation?
Your Brain on Facebook: Neuropsychological Associations with Social Versus other Media.
Anonymity in Social Media: Effects of Content Controversiality and Social Endorsement on Sharing Behavior.
Sentiment Flow Through Hyperlink Networks.
Reconstruction of Threaded Conversations in Online Discussion Forums.
Critical Mass of What? Exploring Community Growth in WikiProjects.
The Secret Life of Online Moms: Anonymity and Disinhibition on YouBeMom.com.
A Comparison of Generated Wikipedia Profiles Using Social Labeling and Automatic Keyword Extraction.
Keep Your Friends Close and Your Facebook Friends Closer: A Multiplex Network Approach to the Analysis of Offline and Online Social Ties.
What Do Retweets Indicate? Results from User Survey and Meta-Review of Research.
#greysanatomy vs. #yankees: Demographics and Hashtag Use on Twitter.
Don't Let Me Be #Misunderstood: Linguistically Motivated Algorithm for Predicting the Popularity of Textual Memes.
#PrayForDad: Learning the Semantics Behind Why Social Media Users Disclose Health Information.
Personalizing Forum Search using Multidimensional Random Walks.
Socio-Spatial Properties of Online Location-Based Social Networks.
Monetary Value of Customer Networks in Mobile Social Networking Services.
Privacy in Interaction: Exploring Disclosure and Social Capital in Facebook.
MODEC - Modeling and Detecting Evolutions of Communities.
Virality and Susceptibility in Information Diffusions.
The International Affiliation Network of YouTube Trends.
The Anatomy of Large Facebook Cascades.
Event Diffusion Patterns in Social Media.
You Too?! Mixed-Initiative LDA Story Matching to Help Teens in Distress.
On the Impact of Social Cost in Opinion Dynamics.
Creating and Sharing Records of Multiplayer Online Game Play: Practices and Attitudes.
Modeling Destructive Group Dynamics in On-Line Gaming Communities.
Facebook and Privacy: The Balancing Act of Personality, Gender, and Relationship Currency.
Network Analysis of Recurring YouTube Spam Campaigns.
Crowdturfers, Campaigns, and Social Media: Tracking and Revealing Crowdsourced Manipulation of Social Media.
Automatic Detection and Categorization of Election-Related Tweets.
#Unconfirmed: Classifying Rumor Stance in Crisis-Related Social Media Messages.
Information Contagion: An Empirical Study of the Spread of News on Digg and Twitter Social Networks.
Task Specialization in Social Production Communities: The Case of Geographic Volunteer Work.
Social Network Sites: Indispensable or Optional Social Tools?
Finding Users we Trust: Scaling up Verified Twitter Users Using their Communication Patterns.
Theme-Relevant Truth Discovery on Twitter: An Estimation Theoretic Approach.
User Effort and Network Structure Mediate Access to Information in Networks.
Linguistic Bias in Collaboratively Produced Biographies: Crowdsourcing Social Stereotypes?
On Understanding the Divergence of Online Social Group Discussion.
Identifying Rhetorical Questions in Social Media.
Blind Men and the Elephant: Detecting Evolving Groups in Social News.
Where Businesses Thrive: Predicting the Impact of the Olympic Games on Local Retailers through Location-based Services Data.
Sentiment-Based Topic Suggestion for Micro-Reviews.
Covering the Egonet: A Crowdsourcing Approach to Social Circle Discovery on Twitter.
The Call of the Crowd: Event Participation in Location-Based Social Services.
Tracking Visual Memes in Rich-Media Social Communities.
Write Like I Write: Herding in the Language of Online Reviews.
Understanding Cognitive Styles from User-Generated Social Media Content.
Identifying Microblogs for Targeted Contextual Advertising.
On the Users' Efficiency in the Twitter Information Network.
Facebook, Twitter and Google Plus for Breaking News: Is There a Winner?
TweetGrep: Weakly Supervised Joint Retrieval and Sentiment Analysis of Topical Tweets.
Star Quality: Aggregating Reviews to Rank Products and Merchants.
Predicting Depression via Social Media.
Opinion Fraud Detection in Online Reviews by Network Effects.
Devils, Angels, and Robots: Tempting Destructive Users in Social Media.
Agenda Diversity in Social Media Discourse: A Study of the 2012 Korean General Election.
TweetTrader.net: Leveraging Crowd Wisdom in a Stock Microblogging Forum.
Search in Social Tagging Systems Using Ontological User Profiles.
Diversity of User Activity and Content Quality in Online Communities.
Personal Information Management vs. Resource Sharing: Towards a Model of Information Behavior in Social Tagging Systems.
Compositionality Principle in Recognition of Fine-Grained Emotions from Text.
Information Cascades in the Blogosphere: A Look Behind the Curtain.
Event Detection and Tracking in Social Streams.
Stochastic Models of User-Contributory Web Sites.
Leaders and Negotiators: An Influence-based Metric for Rank.
JAM: Joint Action Matrix Factorization for Summarizing a Temporal Heterogeneous Social Network.
Open Domain Collaborative Storytelling with Say Anything.
Predicting Outcome for Collaborative Featured Article Nomination in Wikipedia.
Stylometric Analysis of Bloggers' Age and Gender.
Detecting Topic Drift with Compound Topic Models.
Regression-Based Summarization of Email Conversations.
The Distribution of Online Reputation: Audience and Influence of Musicians on MySpace.
Predicting the Polarity Strength of Adjectives Using WordNet.
Detection of Promoted Social Media Campaigns.
Editorial Algorithms: Using Social Media to Discover and Report Local News.
EmotionWatch: Visualizing Fine-Grained Emotions in Event-Related Tweets.
High Correlation between Incoming and Outgoing Activity: A Distinctive Property of Online Social Networks?
User-Created Groups in Health Forums: What Makes Them Special?
Sequential Influence Models in Social Networks.
Divided They Tweet: The Network Structure of Political Microbloggers and Discussion Topics.
Predicting Speech Acts in MOOC Forum Posts.
Characterizing Geographic Variation in Well-Being Using Tweets.
iFeel 2.0: A Multilingual Benchmarking System for Sentence-Level Sentiment Analysis.
From Tweets to Polls: Linking Text Sentiment to Public Opinion Time Series.
Towards Discovery of Influence and Personality Traits through Social Link Prediction.
Sensing Real-World Events Using Arabic Twitter Posts.
Automatic Summarization of Real World Events Using Twitter.
Just a Click Away: Social Search and Metadata in Predicting File Discovery.
Frankenplace: An Application for Similarity-Based Place Search.
Touch Screens for Touchy Issues: Analysis of Accessing Sensitive Information from Mobile Devices.
Predicting Elections with Twitter: What 140 Characters Reveal about Political Sentiment.
Find Me the Right Content! Diversity-Based Sampling of Social Media Spaces for Topic-Centric Search.
Evolutionary Clustering and Analysis of User Behaviour in Online Forums.
ICWSM - A Great Catchy Name: Semi-Supervised Recognition of Sarcastic Sentences in Online Product Reviews.
Social Influence, Popularity and Interestingness of Online Contents.
Event Summarization Using Tweets.
Detecting and Tracking Political Abuse in Social Media.
Journalists and Twitter: A Multidimensional Quantitative Description of Usage Patterns.
What We Instagram: A First Analysis of Instagram Photo Content and User Types.
Linguistic Reflections of Student Engagement in Massive Open Online Courses.
Precise Localization of Homes and Activities: Detecting Drinking-While-Tweeting Patterns in Communities.
Characterizing Deleted Tweets and Their Authors.
Participation Maximization Based on Social Influence in Online Discussion Forums.
Fetishizing Food in Digital Age: #foodporn Around the World.
Friends, Strangers, and the Value of Ego Networks for Recommendation.
What Yelp Fake Review Filter Might Be Doing?
Visualization Techniques for the Analysis of Twitter Users' Behavior.
Conversational Shadows: Describing Live Media Events Using Short Messages.
A Semi-Automatic Method for Efficient Detection of Stories on Social Media.
Culture Matters: A Survey Study of Social Q&A Behavior.
OMG, I Have to Tweet that! A Study of Factors that Influence Tweet Rates.
Voting Behaviour and Power in Online Democracy: A Study of LiquidFeedback in Germany's Pirate Party.
Identifying and Analyzing Moral Evaluation Frames in Climate Change Blog Discourse.
Wedding Dresses and Wanted Criminals: Pinterest.com as an Infrastructure for Repository Building.
SentiWorld: Understanding Emotions between Countries Based on Tweets.
Limits of Electoral Predictions Using Twitter.
Grassroots Professional Development: How Teachers Use Twitter.
De-Layering Social Networks by Shared Tastes of Friendships.
Analyzing Personality through Social Media Profile Picture Choice.
Narcotweets: Social Media in Wartime.
Tweet Enrichment for Effective Dimensions Classification in Online Reputation Management.
The YouTube Social Network.
Predicting Successful Memes Using Network and Community Structure.
Making Project Team Recommendations from Online Information Sources.
Tutorials.
RevRank: A Fully Unsupervised Algorithm for Selecting the Most Helpful Book Reviews.
Using Transactional Information to Predict Link Strength in Online Social Networks.
Considering the Sources: Comparing Linking Patterns in Usenet and Blogs.
Is Your Profile Picture Worth 1000 Words? Photo Characteristics Associated with Personality Impression Agreement.
Analyzing and Predicting Community Preference of Socially Generated Metadata: A Case Study on Comments in the Digg Community.
Information Diffusion in Computer Science Citation Networks.
MakeMyPage: Social Media Meets Automatic Content Generation.
Large Scale Book Annotation with Social Tags.
Spectrum: Retrieving Different Points of View from the Blogosphere.
4chan and /b/: An Analysis of Anonymity and Ephemerality in a Large Online Community.
Organizations Are Users Too: Characterizing and Detecting the Presence of Organizations on Twitter.
Characterizing Information Diets of Social Media Users.
The Good, the Bad, and the Angry: Analyzing Crowdsourced Impressions of Vloggers.
Towards Predicting the Best Answers in Community-based Question-Answering Services.
Culture, Networks, Twitter and foursquare: Testing a Model of Cultural Conversion with Social Media Data.
Coping with the Document Frequency Bias in Sentiment Classification.
Why Do You Spread This Message? Understanding Users Sentiment in Social Media Campaigns.
Describing the Web in less than 140 Characters.
Large-Scale Community Detection on YouTube for Topic Discovery and Exploration.
How Viral Are Viral Videos?
Extracting Diurnal Patterns of Real World Activity from Social Media.
Modeling Blog Dynamics.
From Generating to Mining: Automatically Scripting Conversations Using Existing Online Sources.
From Episodes to Sagas: Understanding the News by Identifying Temporally Related Story Sequences.
I Think You Know Who I Am: Bloggers' Perceived Identifiability.
Emotionality in Text as Predictor of Behavior.
Blogs as Predictors of Movie Success.
How To Tell Head From Tail in User-Generated Content Corpora.
Comparing Overall and Targeted Sentiments in Social Media during Crises.
Message Impartiality in Social Media Discussions.
Social Networks and Social Information Filtering on Digg.
Diversity Measurement of Recommender Systems under Different User Choice Models.
From Foursquare to My Square: Learning Check-in Behavior from Multiple Sources.
A Data-Driven Analysis to Question Epidemic Models for Citation Cascades on the Blogosphere.
Hyphe, a Curation-Oriented Approach to Web Crawling for the Social Sciences.
Facebook, Youth and Privacy in Networked Publics.
Characterizing Silent Users in Social Media Communities.
Memory-Efficient Fast Shortest Path Estimation in Large Social Networks.
Identifying Facets in Query-Biased Sets of Blog Posts.
Personalized Tag Recommendations via Tagging and Content-based Similarity Metrics.
Where Online Friends Meet: Social Communities in Location-Based Networks.
Identifying more bloggers: Towards large scale personality classification of personal weblogs.
Evaluating Public Response to the Boston Marathon Bombing and Other Acts of Terrorism through Twitter.
Personality Impressions Based on Facebook Profiles.
Tour de Blog.
Hiding in Plain Sight: A Tale of Trust and Mistrust inside a Community of Citizen Reporters.
Viral Actions: Predicting Video View Counts Using Synchronous Sharing Behaviors.
You Are What Apps You Use: Demographic Prediction Based on User's Apps.
The Livehoods Project: Utilizing Social Media to Understand the Dynamics of a City.
All Blogs Are Not Made Equal: Exploring Genre Differences in Sentiment Tagging of Blogs.
Using Network Structure to Identify Groups in Virtual Worlds.
Discovering Weblog Communities: A content- and topology-based approach.
Watching the Blogosphere: Knowledge Sharing in the Web 2.0.
Self-Censorship on Facebook.
Sociological Typology of Personal Blogs.
No Blog is an Island - Analyzing Connections Across Information Networks.
Extraction of Folksonomies from Noisy Texts.
A Bootstrapping Approach to Identifying Relevant Tweets for Social TV.
Catching the Long-Tail: Extracting Local News Events from Twitter.
You Are What You Tweet: Analyzing Twitter for Public Health.
Photo Tagging Over Time: A Longitudinal Study of the Role of Attention, Network Density, and Motivations.
Add-A-Tag: Learning Adaptive User Profiles from Bookmark Collections.
What's in a @name? How Name Value Biases Judgment of Microblog Authors.
Generating Domain-Specific Clues Using News Corpus for Sentiment Classification.
Summarizing User-Contributed Comments.
Exemplar-Based Topic Detection in Twitter Streams.
The Party Is Over Here: Structure and Content in the 2010 Election.
Classifying the Political Leaning of News Articles and Users from User Votes.
Timing Tweets to Increase Effectiveness of Information Campaigns.
TagAssist: Automatic Tag Suggestion for Blog Posts.
Temporal Opinion Spam Detection by Multivariate Indicative Signals.
Opinion Retrieval in Twitter.
Twitris v3: From Citizen Sensing to Analysis, Coordination and Action.
So.cl: An Interest Network for Informal Learning.
Dynamic Data Capture from Social Media Streams: A Contextual Bandit Approach.
Summarizing Newspaper Comments.
Methods to Determine Node Centrality and Clustering in Graphs with Uncertain Structure.
Composing Traveling Paths from Location-Based Services.
The Length of Bridge Ties: Structural and Geographic Properties of Online Social Interactions.
When Politicians Talk: Assessing Online Conversational Practices of Political Parties on Twitter.
Do You Feel What I Feel? Social Aspects of Emotions in Twitter Conversations.
Who Does What on the Web: A Large-Scale Study of Browsing Behavior.
Why You Are More Engaged: Factors Influencing Twitter Engagement in Occupy Wall Street.
How Incredibly Awesome! - Click Here to Read More.
Governance in Social Media: A Case Study of the Wikipedia Promotion Process.
Automatically Identifying Groups Based on Content and Collective Behavioral Patterns of Group Members.
Smelly Maps: The Digital Life of Urban Smellscapes.
RT to Win! Predicting Message Propagation in Twitter.
Unexpected Relevance: An Empirical Study of Serendipity in Retweets.
Mining User Home Location and Gender from Flickr Tags.
The ISOcat Registry Reloaded.
Crowdsourcing Taxonomies.
Collecting Links between Entities Ranked by Human Association Strengths.
A Semantic Web Middleware for Virtual Data Integration on the Web.
Generating Possible Interpretations for Statistics from Linked Open Data.
Utilizing Semantics in the Production of iTV Shows.
From Web 1.0 to Social Semantic Web: Lessons Learnt from a Migration to a Medical Semantic Wiki.
Learning to Classify Spatiotextual Entities in Maps.
No Size Fits All - Running the Star Schema Benchmark with SPARQL and RDF Aggregate Views.
Automatic Configuration Selection Using Ontology Matching Task Profiling.
Storing and Provisioning Linked Data as a Service.
Designing an Integrated Semantic Framework for Structured Opinion Summarization.
Modelling Structured Domains Using Description Graphs and Logic Programming.
Seeding Structured Data by Default via Open Source Library Systems.
A Scalable Adaptive Method for Complex Reasoning Over Semantic Data Streams.
Creating Digital Resources from Legacy Documents: An Experience Report from the Biosystematics Domain.
VocBench: A Web Application for Collaborative Development of Multilingual Thesauri.
Semi-supervised Instance Matching Using Boosted Classifiers.
Distributed Knowledge Representation on the Social Semantic Desktop: Named Graphs, Views and Roles in NRL.
A Reasoning-Based Support Tool for Ontology Mapping Evaluation.
Top-k Linked Data Query Processing.
SPARQLeR: Extended Sparql for Semantic Association Discovery.
Web Service Contracting: Specification and Reasoning with SCIFF.
SALT - Semantically Annotated LaTeX for Scientific Publications.
Semantic Network Analysis of Ontologies.
A Novel Combination of Answer Set Programming with Description Logics for the Semantic Web.
A Context-Based Semantics for SPARQL Property Paths Over the Web.
Exploiting Disagreement Through Open-Ended Tasks for Capturing Interpretation Spaces.
An Entity Name System (ENS) for the Semantic Web.
Software Architectures for Scalable Ontology Networks.
Graph Summaries for Subgraph Frequency Estimation.
A Unified Approach for Aligning Taxonomies and Debugging Taxonomies and Their Alignments.
A Multilingual/Multimedia Lexicon Model for Ontologies.
Identifying Diachronic Topic-Based Research Communities by Clustering Shared Research Trajectories.
Pay-as-you-go Approximate Join Top-k Processing for the Web of Data.
Castor: A Constraint-Based SPARQL Engine with Active Filter Processing.
CyCLaDEs: A Decentralized Cache for Triple Pattern Fragments.
Distributed Keyword Search over RDF via MapReduce.
A Semantic Approach for Process Annotation and Similarity Analysis.
Using BMEcat Catalogs as a Lever for Product Master Data on the Semantic Web.
SPARQL Query Verbalization for Explaining Semantic Search Engine Queries.
Towards a Complete OWL Ontology Benchmark.
Towards Linguistically Grounded Ontologies.
Guided Composition of Tasks with Logical Information Systems - Application to Data Analysis Workflows in Bioinformatics.
Safe and Economic Re-Use of Ontologies: A Logic-Based Methodology and Tool Support.
MatWare : Constructing and Exploiting Domain Specific Warehouses by Aggregating Semantic Data.
Visual Ontology Cleaning: Cognitive Principles and Applicability.
A Linked Data Reasoner in the Cloud.
Towards a Semantic Infrastructure for User Generated Mobile Services.
Two-Phase Web Service Discovery Based on Rich Functional Descriptions.
Detecting SPARQL Query Templates for Data Prefetching.
RELFIN - Topic Discovery for Ontology Enhancement and Annotation.
The Sile Model - A Semantic File System Infrastructure for the Desktop.
Semantic Multimedia Information Retrieval Based on Contextual Descriptions.
Community-Driven Ontology Matching.
Dealing with Inconsistencies in DL-Lite Ontologies.
A Framework for Ontology Usage Analysis.
SCOVO: Using Statistics on the Web of Data.
Towards B2B Integration in Telecommunications with Semantic Web Services.
PANTO: A Portable Natural Language Interface to Ontologies.
Dually Structured Concepts in the Semantic Web: Answer Set Programming Approach.
VOLT: A Provenance-Producing, Transparent SPARQL Proxy for the On-Demand Computation of Linked Data and its Application to Spatiotemporally Dependent Data.
User-Centric Faceted Search for Semantic Portals.
Module Extraction and Incremental Classification: A Pragmatic Approach for Ontologies.
A Reasoning Framework for Rule-Based WSML.
Building a Semantic Web Image Repository for Biological Research Images.
Semantic Support for Recording Laboratory Experimental Metadata: A Study in Food Chemistry.
Querying RDF Data from a Graph Database Perspective.
Controlled Natural Language for Semantic Annotation.
Ontology Evolution with Evolva.
Word Sense Disambiguation for XML Structure Feature Generation.
Observing Linked Data Dynamics.
Web Explanations for Semantic Heterogeneity Discovery.
Toward Multi-viewpoint Reasoning with OWL Ontologies.
Using Semantic Web Technologies for Enterprise Architecture Analysis.
SWING: An Integrated Environment for Geospatial Semantic Web Services.
Resolving Inconsistencies in Evolving Ontologies.
Semantic Wiki Search.
HiBISCuS: Hypergraph-Based Source Selection for SPARQL Endpoint Federation.
Matching Semantic Service Descriptions with Local Closed-World Reasoning.
Semanta - Semantic Email Made Easy.
Exploiting Semantics from Ontologies to Enhance Accuracy of Similarity Measures.
From Symptoms to Diseases - Creating the Missing Link.
LOTUS: Adaptive Text Search for Big Linked Data.
Query Answering and Ontology Population: An Inductive Approach.
Bridging the Gap Between Formal Languages and Natural Languages with Zippers.
Supporting Linked Data Production for Cultural Heritage Institutes: The Amsterdam Museum Case Study.
Evolva: A Comprehensive Approach to Ontology Evolution.
WSMO Choreography: From Abstract State Machines to Concurrent Transaction Logic.
Finite Model Reasoning in DL-Lite.
Qanary - A Methodology for Vocabulary-Driven Open Question Answering Systems.
PCS2OWL: A Generic Approach for Deriving Web Ontologies from Product Classification Systems.
Automatic Detection and Semantic Formalisation of Business Rules.
Ways to Develop Human-Level Web Intelligence: A Brain Informatics Perspective.
Knowledge Point-Based Approach to Interlink Open Education Resources.
Towards Scalable Federated Context-Aware Stream Reasoning.
Hybrid Adaptive Web Service Selection with SAWSDL-MX and WSDL-Analyzer.
RadSem: Semantic Annotation and Retrieval for Medical Images.
Keys, Money and Mobile Phone.
Semantic Composition of Lecture Subparts for a Personalized e-Learning.
Predicting Severity of Road Traffic Congestion Using Semantic Web Technologies.
conTEXT - Lightweight Text Analytics Using Linked Data.
Accepting the XBRL Challenge with Linked Data for Financial Data Integration.
A Systematic Investigation of Explicit and Implicit Schema Information on the Linked Open Data Cloud.
Towards Portable Shopping Histories: Using GoodRelations to Expose Ownership Information to E-Commerce Sites.
A Publishing Pipeline for Linked Government Data.
SEEMP: An Semantic Interoperability Infrastructure for e-Government Services in the Employment Sector.
Using Semantics to Enhance the Blogging Experience.
A Method to Convert Thesauri to SKOS.
COALA - Correlation-Aware Active Learning of Link Specifications.
Using Semantic and Domain-Based Information in CLIR Systems.
Previewing Semantic Web Pipes.
Dynamic Assembly of Personalized Learning Content on the Semantic Web.
Nonmonotonic Ontological and Rule-Based Reasoning with Extended Conceptual Logic Programs.
Efficient Content Creation on the Semantic Web Using Metadata Schemas with Domain Ontology Services (System Description).
Combining Linked Data and Statistical Information Retrieval - Next Generation Information Systems.
How to Best Find a Partner? An Evaluation of Editing Approaches to Construct R2RML Mappings.
Neighborhood-Based Tag Prediction.
Broadening the Scope of Nanopublications.
Efficient Graph-Based Document Similarity.
Semantic Web for the Humanities.
Hafslund Sesam - An Archive on Semantics.
An Ontology-Driven Approach for Semantic Annotation of Documents with Specific Concepts.
ONKI SKOS Server for Publishing and Utilizing SKOS Vocabularies and Ontologies as Services.
Ontology-Based Service Discovery Front-End Interface for GloServ.
Pedro Ontology Services: A Framework for Rapid Ontology Markup.
Mapping Validation by Probabilistic Reasoning.
Cooperative Techniques for SPARQL Query Relaxation in RDF Databases.
K-Tools: Towards Semantic Knowledge Management.
Green-Thumb Camera: LOD Application for Field IT.
Comparing Vocabulary Term Recommendations Using Association Rules and Learning to Rank: A User Study.
Unsupervised Learning of Link Discovery Configuration.
The Creation and Evaluation of iSPARQL Strategies for Matchmaking.
The NExT System: Towards True Dynamic Adaptations of Semantic Web Service Compositions.
Automatic Location of Services.
RDSZ: An Approach for Lossless RDF Stream Compression.
Semantic Web/LD at a Crossroads: Into the Garbage Can or To Theory?
Clinical Trial and Disease Search with Ad Hoc Interactive Ontology Alignments.
Unsupervised Link Discovery through Knowledge Base Repair.
Ranking Entities in the Age of Two Webs, an Application to Semantic Snippets.
Impact of Using Relationships between Ontologies to Enhance the Ontology Search Results.
Towards Linked Open Data Enabled Data Mining - Strategies for Feature Generation, Propositionalization, Selection, and Consolidation.
Frame Detection over the Semantic Web.
Error-Tolerant RDF Subgraph Matching for Adaptive Presentation of Linked Data on Mobile.
The SPARQL Query Graph Model for Query Optimization.
Supporting the Reuse of Global Unique Identifiers for Individuals in OWL/RDF Knowledge Bases.
When to Reach for the Cloud: Using Parallel Hardware for Link Discovery.
Evaluating Scientific Hypotheses Using the SPARQL Inferencing Notation.
Assembling Rule Mashups in the Semantic Web.
Middleware for Automated Implementation of Security Protocols.
Towards Distributed Information Retrieval in the Semantic Web: Query Reformulation Using the oMAP Framework.
RDF Digest: Efficient Summarization of RDF/S KBs.
Assigning Semantic Labels to Data Sources.
Design Abstractions for Innovative Web Applications: The Case of the SOA Augmented with Semantics.
The Current State of SKOS Vocabularies on the Web.
Semantic Browsing with PowerMagpie.
Normalized Semantic Web Distance.
Learning a Cross-Lingual Semantic Representation of Relations Expressed in Text.
Adding Data Mining Support to SPARQL Via Statistical Relational Learning Methods.
Automatic Identification of Best Answers in Online Enquiry Communities.
Gleaning Types for Literals in RDF Triples with Application to Entity Summarization.
ONTOCOM Revisited: Towards Accurate Cost Predictions for Ontology Development Projects.
Provenance Management for Evolving RDF Datasets.
SWiM - A Semantic Wiki for Mathematical Knowledge Management.
The Combination of Techniques for Automatic Semantic Image Annotation Generation in the IMAGINATION Application.
A Knowledge Based Approach for Tackling Mislabeled Multi-class Big Social Data.
Linking Data, Services and Human Know-How.
Caravela: Semantic Content Management with Automatic Information Integration and Categorization (System Description).
Hybrid Reasoning with Forest Logic Programs.
Generating Tailored Textual Summaries from Ontologies.
Folksonomy Enrichment and Search.
Enhancing OLAP Analysis with Web Cubes.
Hybrid Search: Effectively Combining Keywords and Semantic Searches.
The Personal Publication Reader: Illustrating Web Data Extraction, Personalization and Reasoning for the Semantic Web.
Process-Level Composition of Executable Web Services: "On-the-fly" Versus "Once-for-all" Composition.
A Semantic Web Service Oriented Framework for Adaptive Learning Environments.
Rules with Contextually Scoped Negation.
Seven Commandments for Benchmarking Semantic Flow Processing Systems.
Survey on Common Strategies of Vocabulary Reuse in Linked Open Data Modeling.
Effective Integration of Declarative Rules with External Evaluations for Semantic-Web Reasoning.
An Annotation Tool for Semantic Documents.
An Approach for Named Entity Recognition in Poorly Structured Data.
KonneXSALT: First Steps Towards a Semantic Claim Federation Infrastructure.
Large Scale Rule-Based Reasoning Using a Laptop.
Using @Twitter Conventions to Improve #LOD-Based Named Entity Disambiguation.
SPSC: Efficient Composition of Semantic Services in Unstructured P2P Networks.
Streaming SPARQL - Extending SPARQL to Process Data Streams.
Ontology-Based Policy Specification and Management.
ReduCE: A Reduced Coulomb Energy Network Method for Approximate Classification.
Optimising XML-RDF Data Integration - A Formal Approach to Improve XSPARQL Efficiency.
AIS and Semantic Query.
A Semantic Policy Sharing Infrastructure for Pervasive Communities.
User Profiling for Semantic Browsing in Medical Digital Libraries.
e-Document Standards as Background Knowledge in Context-Based Ontology Matching.
Who the Heck Is the Father of Bob?.
Integrating Folksonomies with the Semantic Web.
Metrics-Driven Framework for LOD Quality Assessment.
The Lixto Systems Applications in Business Intelligence and Semantic Web.
OWL-Eu: Adding Customised Datatypes into OWL.
Knowledge Sharing by Information Retrieval in the Semantic Web.
Constructing a Focused Taxonomy from a Document Collection.
PowerAqua: Fishing the Semantic Web.
Exchange and Consumption of Huge RDF Data.
WaterFowl: A Compact, Self-indexed and Inference-Enabled Immutable RDF Store.
WikiFactory: An Ontology-Based Application for Creating Domain-Oriented Wikis.
An Infrastructure for Acquiring High Quality Semantic Metadata.
Semantic Sitemaps: Efficient and Flexible Access to Datasets on the Semantic Web.
Test-Driven Development of Ontologies.
RDFBroker: A Signature-Based High-Performance RDF Store.
Forgetting Concepts in DL-Lite.
Improving Interoperability Using Query Interpretation in Semantic Vector Spaces.
Semantic Annotation of Images and Videos for Multimedia Analysis.
Towards Monitoring of Novel Statements in the News.
Tackling Incompleteness in Information Extraction - A Complementarity Approach.
Query Execution Optimization for Clients of Triple Pattern Fragments.
Supporting Geo-Ontology Engineering Through Spatial Data Analytics.
Linked Data-as-a-Service: The Semantic Web Redeployed.
Efficient Semantic Matching.
A Semantic Service Environment: A Case Study in Bioinformatics.
Declarative Representation of Programming Access to Ontologies.
Predicting the Understandability of OWL Inferences.
Information Retrieval in Folksonomies: Search and Ranking.
Towards the Russian Linked Culture Cloud: Data Enrichment and Publishing.
MoKi: The Enterprise Modelling Wiki.
Feta: A Light-Weight Architecture for User Oriented Semantic Service Discovery.
A Survey of HTTP Caching Implementations on the Open Semantic Web.
Conceptual Situation Spaces for Semantic Situation-Driven Processes.
Ideas and Improvements for Semantic Wikis.
Combining a Co-occurrence-Based and a Semantic Measure for Entity Linking.
Semantic Annotation and Composition of Business Processes with Maestro.
Trusting Semi-structured Web Data.
Knowledge Applications for Life Events: How the Dutch Government Informs the Public about Rights and Duties in the Netherlands.
Tagster - Tagging-Based Distributed Content Sharing.
Route Planning Using Linked Open Data.
Semantic Information Extraction on Domain Specific Data Sheets.
FrameBase: Representing N-Ary Relations Using Semantic Frames.
Ontology-Supported Document Ranking for Novelty Search.
Mymory: Enhancing a Semantic Wiki with Context Annotations.
SPARQL for a Web of Linked Data: Semantics and Computability.
Preserving Information Content in RDF Using Bounded Homomorphisms.
Generating Synthetic RDF Data with Connected Blank Nodes for Benchmarking.
Representation and Querying of Valid Time of Triples in Linked Geospatial Data.
Identifying Complex Semantic Matches.
Evaluation of the Music Ontology Framework.
Sequential Decision Making with Medical Interpretation Algorithms in the Semantic Web.
A Core Ontology for Business Process Analysis.
Applying Semantic Social Graphs to Disambiguate Identity References.
An Approach for Identification of User's Intentions During the Navigation in Semantic Websites.
Pattern-Based Annotation of HTML-Streams.
Heuristics for Fixing Common Errors in Deployed schema.org Microdata.
Heuristics for Connecting Heterogeneous Knowledge via FrameBase.
Rabbit: Developing a Control Natural Language for Authoring Ontologies.
Ontology Integration Using Mappings: Towards Getting the Right Logical Consequences.
RMLEditor: A Graph-Based Mapping Editor for Linked Data Mappings.
The Relevance of Reasoning and Alignment Incoherence in Ontology Matching.
An Ontology-Based Information Retrieval Model.
Describing Ontology Applications.
Interlinking Cross-Lingual RDF Data Sets.
Collaborative Ocean Resource Interoperability: Multi-use of Ocean Data on the Semantic Web.
Private Record Linkage: Comparison of Selected Techniques for Name Matching.
RKBExplorer.com: A Knowledge Driven Infrastructure for Linked Data Providers.
From Capturing Semantics to Semantic Search: A Virtuous Cycle.
A Compact In-Memory Dictionary for RDF Data.
Object Property Matching Utilizing the Overlap between Imported Ontologies.
RDF Query Relaxation Strategies Based on Failure Causes.
Identifying Change Patterns of Concept Attributes in Ontology Evolution.
Generating and Summarizing Explanations for Linked Data.
Querying Trust in RDF Data with tSPARQL.
Harvesting and Structuring Social Data in Music Information Retrieval.
Synonym Analysis for Predicate Expansion.
Embedding Knowledge Patterns into OWL.
Mining Semantic Descriptions of Bioinformatics Web Resources from the Literature.
Automatic Extraction of Hierarchical Relations from Text.
Extracting Social Networks Among Various Entities on the Web.
Effects of Using a Research Context Ontology for Query Expansion.
Heaven: A Framework for Systematic Comparative Research Approach for RSP Engines.
User Evaluation Study of a Tagging Approach to Semantic Mapping.
WSMX 1.0: A Further Step toward a Complete Semantic Execution Environment.
On Storage Policies for Semantic Web Repositories That Support Versioning.
Semantic Process Retrieval with iSPARQL.
The XMediaBox: Sensemaking through the Use of Knowledge Lenses.
Requirements for and Evaluation of User Support for Large-Scale Ontology Alignment.
Formal Specification of Ontology Networks.
Putting Ontology Alignment in Context: Usage Scenarios, Deployment and Evaluation in a Library Case.
Embedding Mapping Approaches for Tensor Factorization and Knowledge Graph Modelling.
Symbol Grounding for the Semantic Web.
AquaLog: An Ontology-Portable Question Answering System for the Semantic Web.
Extending Description Logic Rules.
Predicting SPARQL Query Performance and Explaining Linked Data.
Creating Learning Material from Web Resources.
CultureSampo: A National Publication System of Cultural Heritage on the Semantic Web 2.0.
Standardized and Efficient RDF Encoding for Constrained Embedded Networks.
Semantics-Enabled User Interest Mining.
Semantics Driven Human-Machine Computation Framework for Linked Islamic Knowledge Engineering.
Querying Distributed RDF Data Sources with SPARQL.
Media, Politics and the Semantic Web.
Monitoring Research Collaborations Using Semantic Web Technologies.
Improving Ontology Matching Using Meta-level Learning.
XSPARQL: Traveling between the XML and RDF Worlds - and Avoiding the XSLT Pilgrimage.
Web Service Composition with User Preferences.
Representing, Querying and Transforming Social Networks with RDF/SPARQL.
The Web Service Modeling Toolkit.
Event Matching Using Semantic and Spatial Memories.
Query-Independent Learning to Rank for RDF Entity Search.
RDFSculpt: Managing RDF Schemas Under Set-Like Semantics.
Lightweight Spatial Conjunctive Query Answering Using Keywords.
Transductive Inference for Class-Membership Propagation in Web Ontologies.
Optimising Linked Data Queries in the Presence of Co-reference.
Squirrel: An Advanced Semantic Search and Browse Facility.
Modelling Ontology Evaluation and Validation.
A Session-Based Approach for Aligning Large Ontologies.
The Design and Implementation of Semantic Web-Based Architecture for Augmented Reality Browser.
Connecting the Smithsonian American Art Museum to the Linked Data Cloud.
Consistent Evolution of OWL Ontologies.
Assessing Linked Data Mappings Using Network Measures.
Benchmark Suites for Improving the RDF(S) Importers and Exporters of Ontology Development Tools.
REDD: An Algorithm for Redundancy Detection in RDF Models.
CSR: Discovering Subsumption Relations for the Alignment of Ontologies.
SemSearch: Refining Semantic Search.
A POP-Based Replanning Agent for Automatic Web Service Composition.
Organizing Ontology Design Patterns as Ontology Pattern Languages.
A Rule System for Querying Persistent RDFS Data.
Semanta - Semantic Email in Action.
Orchestration of Semantic Web Services for Large-Scale Document Annotation.
Iterative Entity Navigation via Co-clustering Semantic Links and Entity Classes.
Encoding Classifications into Lightweight Ontologies.
Automating RDF Dataset Transformation and Enrichment.
Hybrid Acquisition of Temporal Scopes for RDF Data.
Benchmarking Fulltext Search Performance of RDF Stores.
Ontology Change in Ontology-Based Information Integration Systems.
Linked Data Interfaces for Non-expert Users.
WSMO Studio - A Semantic Web Services Modelling Environment for WSMO.
Vague Knowledge Bases for Matchmaking in P2P E-Marketplaces.
Graph Kernels for RDF Data.
SCHEMA - An Algorithm for Automated Product Taxonomy Mapping in E-commerce.
Domain Specific Data Retrieval on the Semantic Web.
PADTUN - Using Semantic Technologies in Tunnel Diagnosis and Maintenance Domain.
A Context-Aware Approach for Integrating Semantic Web Technologies onto Mobile Devices.
Voting Theory for Concept Detection.
Supporting Open Collaboration in Science Through Explicit and Linked Semantic Description of Processes.
Evaluating Citation Functions in CiTO: Cognitive Issues.
A Novel Concept-Based Search for the Web of Data Using UMBEL and a Fuzzy Retrieval Model.
Ontology Engineering Revisited: An Iterative Case Study.
Supporting Arbitrary Custom Datatypes in RDF and SPARQL.
An Integrated Approach to Extracting Ontological Structures from Folksonomies.
Tempus Fugit.
Cicero: Tracking Design Rationale in Collaborative Ontology Engineering.
Matching Hierarchical Classifications with Attributes.
LODifier: Generating Linked Data from Unstructured Text.
Semantic Web-Based Document: Editing and Browsing in AktiveDoc.
Augmented Reality Supported by Semantic Web Technologies.
Publishing Bibliographic Records on the Web of Data: Opportunities for the BnF (French National Library).
Distinguishing between Instances and Classes in the Wikipedia Taxonomy.
Adaptive Linked Data-Driven Web Components: Building Flexible and Reusable Semantic Web Interfaces - Building Flexible and Reusable Semantic Web Interfaces.
Combining SAWSDL, OWL-DL and UDDI for Semantically Enhanced Web Service Discovery.
Finding Co-solvers on Twitter, with a Little Help from Linked Data.
Semantic Web Policies - A Discussion of Requirements and Research Issues.
RDFS with Attribute Equations via SPARQL Rewriting.
Cupboard - A Place to Expose Your Ontologies to Applications and the Community.
Automatic Argumentation Extraction.
Winnowing Ontologies Based on Application Use.
Leveraging Distributed Human Computation and Consensus Partition for Entity Coreference.
A Natural Language Query Interface to Structured Information.
Curate and Storyspace: An Ontology and Web-Based Environment for Describing Curatorial Narratives.
Enabling Real World Semantic Web Applications Through a Coordination Middleware.
Modeling and Enforcement of Business Policies on Process Models with Maestro.
Ontology-Based Data Access Using Rewriting, OWL 2 RL Systems and Repairing.
Multilingual and Localization Support for Ontologies.
Characterising Emergent Semantics in Twitter Lists.
Instance-Based Ontological Knowledge Acquisition.
Semantically Enhanced Quality Assurance in the JURION Business Use Case.
A Comparison of Data Structures to Manage URIs on the Web of Data.
From Queriability to Informativity, Assessing "Quality in Use" of DBpedia and YAGO.
EAGLE: Efficient Active Learning of Link Specifications Using Genetic Programming.
How to Trace and Revise Identities.
xOperator - An Extensible Semantic Agent for Instant Messaging Networks.
Opening the Black Box of Ontology Matching.
Personalized Concept-Based Search and Exploration on the Web of Data Using Results Categorization.
Fast Approximate A-Box Consistency Checking Using Machine Learning.
Continuously Self-Updating Query Results over Dynamic Heterogeneous Linked Data.
On Enriching Ajax with Semantics: The Web Personalization Use Case.
Annotating Relationships Between Multiple Mixed-Media Digital Objects by Extending Annotea.
Emerging Sciences of the Internet: Some New Opportunities.
Troubleshooting and Optimizing Named Entity Resolution Systems in the Industry.
On the Semantics of Functional Descriptions of Web Services.
Fuzzy Annotation of Web Data Tables Driven by a Domain Ontology.
Detecting Similar Linked Datasets Using Topic Modelling.
HDT-MR: A Scalable Solution for RDF Compression with HDT and MapReduce.
Interactive Ontology-Based User Knowledge Acquisition: A Case Study.
Debugging and Semantic Clarification by Pinpointing.
SWHi System Description: A Case Study in Information Retrieval, Inference, and Visualization in the Semantic Web.
SentiCircles for Contextual and Conceptual Semantic Sentiment Analysis of Twitter.
Facilitating Human Intervention in Coreference Resolution with Comparative Entity Summaries.
On the Discovery of Relational Patterns in Semantically Similar Annotated Linked Data.
Content Aggregation on Knowledge Bases Using Graph Clustering.
Acquisition of OWL DL Axioms from Lexical Resources.
Combining Fact and Document Retrieval with Spreading Activation for Semantic Desktop Search.
Leveraging and Balancing Heterogeneous Sources of Evidence in Ontology Learning.
Enriching a Small Artwork Collection Through Semantic Linking.
A Scalable Approach for Efficiently Generating Structured Dataset Topic Profiles.
Conceptual Spaces in ViCoS.
Access Control for HTTP Operations on Linked Data.
POWLA: Modeling Linguistic Corpora in OWL/DL.
Crowdmapping Digital Social Innovation with Linked Data.
AskNow: A Framework for Natural Language Query Formalization in SPARQL.
Collaborative and Usage-Driven Evolution of Personal Ontologies.
Building a National Semantic Web Ontology and Ontology Service Infrastructure -The FinnONTO Approach.
Managing Information Quality in e-Science Using Semantic Web Technology.
An Ontology for Software Models and Its Practical Implications for Semantic Web Reasoning.
A Minimalist Approach to Semantic Annotations for Web Processes Compositions.
WSMX: A Solution for B2B Mediation and Discovery Scenarios.
Search Result Ontologies for Digital Libraries.
Mining the Web Through Verbs: A Case Study.
A Knowledge-Based Framework for Events Representation and Reuse from Historical Archives.
Understanding Large Volumes of Interconnected Individuals by Visual Exploration.
An User Interface Adaptation Architecture for Rich Internet Applications.
SIM-DLA: A Novel Semantic Similarity Measure for Description Logics Reducing Inter-concept to Inter-instance Similarity.
Towards Fuzzy Query-Relaxation for RDF.
Applied Temporal RDF: Efficient Temporal Querying of RDF Data with SPARQL.
Bio2RDF Release 2: Improved Coverage, Interoperability and Provenance of Life Science Linked Data.
Query Rewriting in RDF Stream Processing.
LabelTranslator - A Tool to Automatically Localize an Ontology.
Beagle
LIME: The Metadata Module for OntoLex.
Involving Domain Experts in Ontology Construction: A Template Based Approach.
Leveraging Semantic Web Service Descriptions for Validation by Automated Functional Testing.
GRISINO - An Integrated Infrastructure for Semantic Web Services, Grid Computing and Intelligent Objects.
Relational Databases as Semantic Web Endpoints.
An Ontology Design Pattern for Cartographic Map Scaling.
Repairing Unsatisfiable Concepts in OWL Ontologies.
Turning the Mouse into a Semantic Device: The
Semantic-Based Automated Composition of Distributed Learning Objects for Personalized E-Learning.
The Personal Knowledge Workbench of the NEPOMUK Semantic Desktop.
An Ontology of Resources: Solving the Identity Crisis.
Linked USDL: A Vocabulary for Web-Scale Service Trading.
Q2Semantic: A Lightweight Keyword Interface to Semantic Search.
Towards a Fuzzy Description Logic for the Semantic Web (Preliminary Report).
Integrating Open Sources and Relational Data with SPARQL.
SAscha: Supporting the Italian Public Cooperation System with a Rich Internet Application for Semantic Web Services.
A Flexible API and Editor for SKOS.
Minimal Deductive Systems for RDF.
Semantically Assisted Workflow Patterns for the Social Web.
Towards Evaluating Interactive Ontology Matching Tools.
Multilingual RDF and OWL.
A Metamodel and UML Profile for Rule-Extended OWL DL Ontologies.
Combining RDF Vocabularies for Expert Finding.
Measuring the Topical Specificity of Online Communities.
Simple Algorithms for Predicate Suggestions Using Similarity and Co-occurrence.
A Structural Approach to Indexing Triples.
Temporal RDF.
HAWK - Hybrid Question Answering Using Linked Data.
A Comparison of Knowledge Extraction Tools for the Semantic Web.
A Resource List Management Tool for Undergraduate Students Based on Linked Open Data Principles.
Using Ontologies for Modeling Virtual Reality Scenarios.
Logical Linked Data Compression.
Processing Aggregate Queries in a Federation of SPARQL Endpoints.
Searching Linked Data and Services with a Single Query.
A Multilingual Semantic Wiki Based on Attempto Controlled English and Grammatical Framework.
Semi-automatically Mapping Structured Sources into the Semantic Web.
Knowledge Extraction for Information Retrieval.
Learning Driver Preferences of POIs Using a Semantic Web Knowledge System.
Creating and Using Geospatial Ontology Time Series in a Semantic Cultural Heritage Portal.
xOperator - Interconnecting the Semantic Web and Instant Messaging Networks.
DRAGO: Distributed Reasoning Architecture for the Semantic Web.
TELIX: An RDF-Based Model for Linguistic Annotation.
NLP Data Cleansing Based on Linguistic Ontology Constraints.
An Architecture to Aggregate Heterogeneous and Semantic Sensed Data.
Enriching Product Ads with Metadata from HTML Annotations.
Semantics Inside! But Let's Not Tell the Data Miners: Intelligent Support for Data Mining.
Demo: Visual Programming for the Semantic Desktop with Konduit.
Reconciling Concepts and Relations in Heterogeneous Ontologies.
Conceptual Clustering and Its Application to Concept Drift and Novelty Detection.
Detecting Incorrect Numerical Data in DBpedia.
Maintaining Mappings Valid between Dynamic KOS.
Extending HCONE-Merge by Approximating the Intended Meaning of Ontology Concepts Iteratively.
A Probabilistic Approach for Integrating Heterogeneous Knowledge Sources.
Multiple Vehicles for a Semantic Navigation Across Hyper-environments.
Concept Search.
Semantics Visualization for Fostering Search Result Comprehension.
Algorithms for Paraconsistent Reasoning with OWL.
Dynamic Service Discovery Through Meta-interactions with Service Providers.
An Argumentation Ontology for DIstributed, Loosely-controlled and evolvInG Engineering processes of oNTologies (DILIGENT).
IdentityRank: Named Entity Disambiguation in the Context of the NEWS Project.
Perplexity of Index Models over Evolving Linked Data.
The Usability of Description Logics - Understanding the Cognitive Difficulties Presented by Description Logics.
A Support Framework for Argumentative Discussions Management in the Web.
None
Towards an Ontology-Based Distributed Architecture for Paid Content.
Empirical Merging of Ontologies - A Proposal of Universal Uncertainty Representation Framework.
Product Information Meta-search Framework for Electronic Commerce Through Ontology Mapping.
Can RDB2RDF Tools Feasibily Expose Large Science Archives for Data Integration?.
Incremental SPARQL Query Processing.
Using Partial Reference Alignments to Align Ontologies.
OntoGame: Weaving the Semantic Web by Online Games.
Optimally Distributing Interactions Between Composed Semantic Web Services.
FO(ID) as an Extension of DL with Rules.
Activity Based Metadata for Semantic Desktop Search.
On Learnability of Constraints from RDF Data.
Media Meets Semantic Web - How the BBC Uses DBpedia and Linked Data to Make Connections.
Towards Competency Question-Driven Ontology Authoring.
Towards a Data Warehouse Fed with Web Services.
The Web Service Modeling Toolkit - An Integrated Development Environment for Semantic Web Services.
Locking for Concurrent Transactions on Ontologies.
dRDF: Entailment for Domain-Restricted RDF.
Knowledge Sharing on the Semantic Web.
System Description: An Orienteering Strategy to Browse Semantically-Enhanced Educational Wiki Pages.
Achieving Interoperability through Semantic Technologies in the Public Administration.
An Iterative Algorithm for Ontology Mapping Capable of Using Training Data.
GenTax: A Generic Methodology for Deriving OWL and RDF-S Ontologies from Hierarchical Classifications, Thesauri, and Inconsistent Taxonomies.
TermPicker: Enabling the Reuse of Vocabulary Terms by Exploiting Data from the Linked Open Data Cloud.
IVEA: An Information Visualization Tool for Personalized Exploratory Document Collection Analysis.
Pronto: A Non-monotonic Probabilistic Description Logic Reasoner.
Towards Semantically-Interlinked Online Communities.
Programming the Semantic Web.
Approximating Description Logic Classification for Semantic Web Reasoning.
Demo: HistoryViz - Visualizing Events and Relations Extracted from Wikipedia.
Ontology-Driven Semantic Ranking for Natural Language Disambiguation in the OntoNL Framework.
Dataset Recommendation for Data Linking: An Intensional Approach.
The Web Service Modeling Language WSML: An Overview.
Product Customization as Linked Data.
Semantic Topic Compass - Classification Based on Unsupervised Feature Ambiguity Gradation.
Building the Seshat Ontology for a Global History Databank.
A Contextualised Semantics for owl: sameAs.
WarSampo Data Service and Semantic Portal for Publishing Linked Open Data About the Second World War History.
Measuring Inconsistencies in Ontologies.
Towards Semantic Social Networks.
Guiding the Evolution of a Multilingual Ontology in a Concrete Setting.
Prexto: Query Rewriting under Extensional Constraints in DL - Lite.
The CLOCK Data-Aware Eviction Approach: Towards Processing Linked Data Streams with Limited Resources.
Unsupervised Conceptualization and Semantic Text Indexing for Information Extraction.
Knowledge Enabled Approach to Predict the Location of Twitter Users.
Bringing Mathematics to the Web of Data: The Case of the Mathematics Subject Classification.
Automatic Expansion of DBpedia Exploiting Wikipedia Cross-Language Information.
User Interests Identification on Twitter Using a Hierarchical Knowledge Base.
Enhancing Service Selection by Semantic QoS.
Desperately Searching for Travel Offers? Formulate Better Queries with Some Help from Linked Data.
Handling Inconsistencies Due to Class Disjointness in SPARQL Updates.
COV4SWS.KOM: Information Quality-Aware Matchmaking for Semantic Services.
DoSeR - A Knowledge-Base-Agnostic Framework for Entity Disambiguation Using Semantic Embeddings.
A Functional Semantic Web Architecture.
Variable-Strength Conditional Preferences for Ranking Objects in Ontologies.
Linked Data-Based Concept Recommendation: Comparison of Different Methods in Open Innovation Scenario.
Enriching an Ontology with Multilingual Information.
Towards a Semantic Service Broker for Business Grid.
Inductive Classification Through Evidence-Based Models and Their Ensembles.
Semantic Email as a Communication Medium for the Social Semantic Desktop.
Developing Ontologies for Collaborative Engineering in Mechatronics.
Simplifying Access to Large-Scale Health Care and Life Sciences Datasets.
Ranking Approximate Answers to Semantic Web Queries.
Full-Text Support for Publish/Subscribe Ontology Systems.
Semantic Reasoning: A Path to New Possibilities of Personalization.
Real-World Reasoning with OWL.
Graph-Based Ontology Classification in OWL 2 QL.
NL-Graphs: A Hybrid Approach toward Interactively Querying Semantic Data.
Distributed and Scalable OWL EL Reasoning.
Combining Information Extraction, Deductive Reasoning and Machine Learning for Relation Prediction.
WSTO: A Classification-Based Ontology for Managing Trust in Semantic Web Services.
Reducing Ambiguity in Tagging Systems with Folksonomy Search Expansion.
Leveraging Linked Data Analysis for Semantic Recommender Systems.
A Study in Empirical and 'Casuistic' Analysis of Ontology Mapping Results.
Quality Assurance in Collaboratively Created Web Vocabularies.
Instance Based Clustering of Semantic Web Resources.
The Lazy Traveling Salesman - Memory Management for Large-Scale Link Discovery.
A Core Ontology of Knowledge Acquisition.
Assisting Pictogram Selection with Semantic Interpretation.
KiWi - A Platform for Semantic Social Software (Demonstration).
Scaling Parallel Rule-Based Reasoning.
Sharing Statistics for SPARQL Federation Optimization, with Emphasis on Benchmark Quality.
Implicit Entity Linking in Tweets.
OntoComP: A Protg Plugin for Completing OWL Ontologies.
A Tableau Algorithm for Handling Inconsistency in OWL.
Enhancing Workflow with a Semantic Description of Scientific Intent.
Where Does It Break? or: Why the Semantic Web Is Not Just "Research as Usual".
Information Extraction for Learning Expressive Ontologies.
Ontology Libraries for Production Use: The Finnish Ontology Library Service ONKI.
A Heuristics Framework for Semantic Subscription Processing.
Towards Hybrid NER: A Study of Content and Crowdsourcing-Related Performance Factors.
Data Linking with Ontology Alignment.
Trusty URIs: Verifiable, Immutable, and Permanent Digital Artifacts for Linked Data.
Machine-Crowd Annotation Workflow for Event Understanding Across Collections and Domains.
What Have Innsbruck and Leipzig in Common? Extracting Semantics from Wiki Content.
Representing Mereotopological Relations in OWL Ontologies with OntoPartS.
ODEWiki: A Semantic Wiki That Interoperates with the ODESeW Semantic Portal.
Soundness of Schema Matching Methods.
Annotated RDF.
The OWL-S Editor - A Development Tool for Semantic Web Services.
An Environment for Semi-automatic Annotation of Ontological Knowledge with Linguistic Content.
Dedalo: Looking for Clusters Explanations in a Labyrinth of Linked Data.
Protocol Mediation for Adaptation in Semantic Web Services.
SCARLET: SemantiC RelAtion DiscoveRy by Harvesting OnLinE OnTologies.
Crowdsourcing Disagreement for Collecting Semantic Annotation.
Gagg: A Graph Aggregation Operator.
How to Design Better Ontology Metrics.





























